Rosa Luxemburg
The National Question
(1909)

1. The Right of Nations
to Self-Determination
  
Among other problems, the 1905 Revolution in Russia has brought into focus the 
nationality question. Until now, this problem has been urgent only in 
Austria-Hungary. At present, however, it has become crucial also in Russia, 
because the revolutionary development made all classes and all political 
parties acutely aware of the need to solve the nationality question as a matter 
of practical politics. All the newly formed or forming parties in Russia, be 
they radical, liberal or reactionary, have been forced to include in their 
programs some sort of a position on the nationality question, which is closely 
connected with the entire complex of the state’s internal and external 
policies. For a workers’ party, nationality is a question both of program and 
of class organization. The position a workers’ party assumes on the nationality 
question, as on every other question, must differ in method and basic approach 
from the positions of even the most radical bourgeois parties, and from the 
positions of the Pseudo-socialistic, petit bourgeois parties. Social Democracy, 
whose political program is based on the scientific method of historical 
materialism and the class struggle, cannot make an exception with respect to 
the nationality question. Moreover, it is only by approaching the problem from 
the standpoint of scientific socialism that the politics of Social Democracy 
will offer a solution which is essentially uniform, even though the program 
must take into account the wide variety of forms of the nationality question 
arising from the social, historical, and ethnic diversity of the Russian empire.

In the program of the Social Democratic Labor Party (RSDLP) of Russia, such a 
formula, containing a general solution of the nationality question in all its 
particular manifestations, is provided by the ninth point; this says that the 
party demands a democratic republic whose constitution would insure, among 
other things, “that all nationalities forming the state have the right to 
self-determination.”

This program includes two more extremely important propositions on the same 
matter. These are the seventh point, which demands the abolition of classes and 
the full legal equality of all citizens without distinction of sex, religion, 
race or nationality, and the eighth point, which says that the several ethnic 
groups of the state should have the right to schools conducted in their 
respective national languages at state expense, and the right to use their 
languages at assemblies and on an equal level with the state language in all 
state and public functions. Closely connected to the nationality question is 
the third point of the program, which formulates the demand for wide 
self-government on the local and provincial level in areas which are 
characterized by special living conditions and by the special composition of 
their populations. Obviously, however, the authors of the program felt that the 
equality of all citizens before the law, linguistic rights, and local 
self-government were not enough to solve the nationality problem, since they 
found it necessary to add a special paragraph granting each nationality the 
“right to self-determination.”

What is especially striking about this formula is the fact that it doesn’t 
represent anything specifically connected with socialism nor with the politics 
of the working class. “The right of nations to self-determination” is at first 
glance a paraphrase of the old slogan of bourgeois nationalism put forth in all 
countries at all times: “the right of nations to freedom and independence.” In 
Poland, the “innate right of nations” to freedom has been the classic formula 
of nationalists from the Democratic Society to Limanowski’s Pobudka, and from 
the national socialist Pobudka to the anti-socialist National League” before it 
renounced its program of independence.[2] Similarly, a resolution on the “equal 
rights of all nations” to freedom was the only tangible result of the famous 
pan-Slav congress held in Prague, which was broken up in 1848 by the pan-Slavic 
bayonets of Windischgraetz. On the other hand, its generality and wide scope, 
despite the principle of “the right of nations to self-determination” which 
obviously can be applied not only to the peoples living in Russia but also to 
the nationalities living in Germany and Austria, Switzerland and Sweden, 
America – strangely enough is not to be found in any of the programs of today’s 
socialist parties. This principle is not even included in the program of 
Austrian Social Democracy, which exists in a state with an extremely mixed 
population, where the nationality question is of crucial importance.

The Austrian party would solve the nationality question not by a metaphysical 
formula which leaves the determination of the nationality question up to each 
of the nationalities according to their whims, but only by means of a 
well-defined plan. Austrian Social Democracy demands the elimination of the 
existing state structure of Austria, which is a collection of “kingdoms and 
princely states” patched together during the Middle Ages by the dynastic 
politics of the Hapsburgs, and includes various nationalities mixed together 
territorially in a hodgepodge manner. The party rather demands that these 
kingdoms and states should be divided into territories on the basis of 
nationality, and that these national territories be joined into a state union. 
But because the nationalities are to some extent jumbled together through 
almost the entire area of Austria, the program of Social Democracy makes 
provision for a special law to protect the smaller minorities in the newly 
created national territories.

Everyone is free to have a different opinion on this plan. Karl Kautsky, one of 
the most knowledgeable experts on Austrian conditions and one of the spiritual 
fathers of Austrian Social Democracy, shows in his latest pamphlet, Nationality 
and Internationalism, that such a plan, even if it could be put into effect, 
would by no means completely eliminate the conflicts and difficulties among the 
nationalities. Nonetheless, it does represent an attempt to provide a practical 
solution of these difficulties by the party of the proletariat, and because of 
the importance of the nationality question in Austria, we shall quote it in 
full.

The nationality program of the Austrian party, adopted at the Brünn Congress in 
1899, says:
``Because national conflicts in Austria are obstructing all political progress 
and the cultural development of the nationalities, because these conflicts 
result primarily from the backwardness of our public institutions and because 
the prolongation of these conflicts is one of the methods by which the ruling 
classes insure their domination and prevent measures in the true interests of 
the people, the congress declares that:

The final settlement of the nationality and language question in Austria in the 
spirit of equality and reason is primarily a cultural demand, and therefore is 
one of the vital interests of the proletariat.

This is possible only under a truly democratic regime based on universal, 
equal, and direct elections, a regime in which all feudal privileges in the 
state and the principalities will have been abrogated. Only under such a regime 
will the working classes, the elements which really support the state and 
society, be able to express their demands.

The nurturing and development of the national peculiarities of all peoples in 
Austria are possible only on the basis of equal rights and the removal of 
oppression. Therefore, state-bureaucratic centralism and the feudal privileges 
of the principalities must be opposed.

Only under such conditions will it be possible to create harmony among the 
nationalities in Austria in place of the quarrelling that takes place now, 
namely, through the recognition of the following guiding principles:

Austria is to be transformed into a democratic federation of nationalities 
(Nationalitätenbundesstaat).

The historic Crown lands are to be replaced by nationally homogeneous 
self-ruling bodies, whose legislation and administration shall be in the hands 
of national chambers, elected on the basis of universal, equal, and direct 
franchise.

All self-governing regions of one and the same nation are to form together a 
nationally distinct union, which shall take care of this union’s affairs 
autonomously. [That is, linguistic and cultural, according to the explanation 
given in the draft by the party’s leadership.]

A special law should be adopted by the parliament to safeguard the rights of 
national minorities.

We do not recognize any national privilege; therefore we reject the demand for 
a state language. Whether a common language is needed, a federal parliament can 
decide.

The party congress, as the organ of international social democracy in Austria, 
expresses its conviction that on the basis of these guiding principles, 
understanding among peoples is possible.

It solemnly declares that it recognizes the right of each nationality to 
national existence and national development.

Peoples can advance their culture only in close solidarity with one another, 
not in petty quarrels; particularly the working class of all nations must, in 
the interest of the individual nationalities and in the general interest, 
maintain international cooperation and fraternity in its struggle and must 
conduct its political and economic struggle in closely united ranks.

In the ranks of international socialism, the Russian Workers’ Party is the only 
one whose program includes the demand that “nationalities be granted the right 
to self-determination.”``

Apart from Russian Social Democracy, we find this formula only in the program 
of the Russian Social Revolutionaries, where it goes hand in hand with the 
principle of state federalism. The relevant section of the political 
declaration of the Social Revolutionary Party states that “the wide application 
of the principle of federalism in the relations between individual 
nationalities is possible,” and stresses the “recognition of their unlimited 
right to self-determination.”

It is true that the above formula exists in another connection with 
international socialism: namely, it is a paraphrase of one section of the 
resolution on the nationality problem adopted in 1896 by the International 
Socialist Congress in London. However, the circumstances which led to the 
adoption of that resolution, and the way in which the resolution was 
formulated, show clearly that if the ninth paragraph in the program of the 
Russian party is taken as an application of the London Resolution, it is based 
on a misunderstanding.

The London resolution was not at all the result of the intention or need to 
make a statement at an international congress on the nationality question in 
general, nor was it presented or adopted by the Congress as a formula for the 
practical resolution of that question by the workers’ parties of the various 
countries. Indeed, just the opposite was true. The London Resolution was 
adopted on the basis of a motion presented to the Congress by the 
social-patriotic faction of the Polish movement, or the Polish Socialist Party 
(PPS), a motion which demanded that the reconstruction of an independent Poland 
be recognized as one of the most urgent demands of international socialism.[3] 
Influenced by the criticism raised at the Congress by Polish Social Democracy 
and the discussion concerning this in the socialist press, as well as by the 
first mass demonstration of the workers’ movement in Russia the memorable 
strike of forty thousand textile workers in Petersburg in May 1896 the 
International Congress did not consider the Polish motion, which was directed 
in its arguments and in its entire character against the Russian revolutionary 
movement. Instead, it adopted the London Resolution already mentioned, which 
signified a rejection of the motion for the reconstruction of Poland.

The Congress – the resolution states – declares itself in favor of the complete 
right of all nations to self-determination, and expresses its sympathy for the 
workers of every country now suffering under the yoke of military, national, or 
other despotism; the Congress calls on the workers of all these countries to 
join the ranks of the class-conscious workers of the whole world in order to 
fight together with them for the defeat of international capitalism and for the 
achievement of the aims of international Social Democracy.

As we can see, in its content, the London Resolution replaces the exclusive 
consideration of the Polish question by the generalization of the question of 
all suppressed nationalities, transferring the question from a national basis 
onto an inter-national one, and instead of a definite, completely concrete 
demand of practical politics, which the motion of the PPS demanded the 
reconstruction of independent Poland-the resolution expresses a general 
socialist principle: sympathy for the proletariat of all suppressed 
nationalities and the recognition of their right to self-determination. There 
can be no doubt that this principle was not formulated by the Congress in order 
to give the international workers’ movement a practical solution to the 
nationality problem. On the contrary, a practical guideline for socialist 
politics is contained not in the first part of the London Resolution quoted 
above, but in the second part, which “calls upon the workers of all countries 
suffering national oppression to enter the ranks of international Social 
Democracy and to work for the realization of its principles and goals.” It is 
an unambiguous way of emphasizing that the principle formulated in the first 
part – the right of nations to self-determination can be put into effect only 
in one way: viz., by first realizing the principles of international socialism 
and by attaining its ultimate goals.

Indeed, none of the socialist parties took the London Resolution to be a 
practical solution of the nationality question, and they did not include it in 
their programs. Even Austrian Social Democracy, for which the solution of the 
nationality problem was a question involving its very existence, did not do 
this; instead, in 1899, it created for itself independently the practical 
“nationality program” quoted above. What is most characteristic, even the PPS 
did not do this, because, despite its efforts to spread the tale that the 
London Resolution was a formula in ”the spirit” of socialism, it was obvious 
that this Resolution meant rather a rejection of its motion for the 
reconstruction of Poland, or at the very least, a dilution of it into a general 
formula without any practical character.[4] In point of fact, the political 
programs of the modern workers’ parties do not aim at stating abstract 
principles of a social ideal, but only at the formulation of those practical 
social and political reforms which the class-conscious proletariat needs and 
demands in the framework of bourgeois society to facilitate the class struggle 
and their ultimate victory. The elements of a political program are formulated 
with definite aims in mind: to provide a direct, practical, and feasible 
solution to the crucial problems of political and social life, which are in the 
area of the class struggle of the proletariat; to serve as a guideline for 
everyday politics and its needs; to initiate the political action of the 
workers’ party and to lead it in the right direction; and finally, to separate 
the revolutionary politics of the proletariat from the politics of the 
bourgeois and petit bourgeois parties.

The formula, “the right of nations to self-determination,” of course doesn’t 
have such a character at all. It gives no practical guidelines for the day to 
day politics of the proletariat, nor any practical solution of nationality 
problems. For example, this formula does not indicate to the Russian 
proletariat in what way it should demand a solution of the Polish national 
problem, the Finnish question, the Caucasian question, the Jewish, etc. It 
offers instead only an unlimited authorization to all interested “nations” to 
settle their national problems in any way they like. The only practical 
conclusion for the day to day politics of the working class which can be drawn 
from the above formula is the guideline that it is the duty of that class to 
struggle against all manifestations of national oppression. If we recognize the 
right of each nation to self-determination, it is obviously a logical 
conclusion that we must condemn every attempt to place one nation over another, 
or for one nation to force upon another any form of national existence. 
However, the duty of the class party of the proletariat to protest and resist 
national oppression arises not from any special “right of nations,” just as, 
for example, its striving for the social and political equality of sexes does 
not at all result from any special “rights of women” which the movement of 
bourgeois emancipationists refers to. This duty arises solely from the general 
opposition to the class regime and to every form of social inequality and 
social domination, in a word, from the basic position of socialism. But leaving 
this point aside, the only guideline given for practical politics is of a 
purely negative character. The duty to resist all forms of national oppression 
does not include any explanation of what conditions and political forms the 
class-conscious proletariat in Russia at the present time should recommen d as 
a solution for the nationality problems of Poland, Latvia, the Jews, etc., or 
what program it should present to match the various programs of the bourgeois, 
nationalist, and pseudo-socialist parties in the present class struggle. In a 
word, the formula, “the right of nations to self-determination,” is essentially 
not a political and problematic guideline in the nationality question, but only 
a means of avoiding that question.
II
The general and cliché-like character of the ninth point in the program of the 
Social Democratic Labor Party of Russia shows that this way of solving the 
question is foreign to the position of Marxian socialism. A “right of nations” 
which is valid for all countries and all times is nothing more than a 
metaphysical cliché of the type of ”rights of man” and “rights of the citizen.” 
Dialectic materialism, which is the basis of scientific socialism, has broken 
once and for all with this type of “eternal” formula. For the historical 
dialectic has shown that there are no “eternal” truths and that there are no 
“rights.” ... In the words of Engels, “What is good in the here and now, is an 
evil somewhere else, and vice versa” – or, what is right and reasonable under 
some circumstances becomes nonsense and absurdity under others. Historical 
materialism has taught us that the real content of these “eternal” truths, 
rights, and formulae is determined only by the material social conditions of 
the environment in a given historical epoch.

On this basis, scientific socialism has revised the entire store of democratic 
clichés and ideological metaphysics inherited from the bourgeoisie. Present-day 
Social Democracy long since stopped regarding such phrases as “democracy,” 
“national freedom,” “equality,” and other such beautiful things as eternal 
truths and laws transcending particular nations and times. On the contrary, 
Marxism regards and treats them only as expressions of certain definite 
historical conditions, as categories which, in terms of their material content 
and therefore their political value, are subject to constant change, which is 
the only “eternal” truth.

When Napoleon or any other despot of his ilk uses a plebiscite, the extreme 
form of political democracy, for the goals of Caesarism, taking advantage of 
the political ignorance and economic subjection of the masses, we do not 
hesitate for a moment to come out wholeheartedly against that “democracy,” and 
are not put off for a moment by the majesty or the omnipotence of the people, 
which, for the metaphysicians of bourgeois democracy, is something like a 
sacrosanct idol.

When a German like Tassendorf or a tsarist gendarme, or a “truly Polish” 
National Democrat defends the “personal freedom” of strikebreakers, protecting 
them against the moral and material pressure of organized labor, we don’t 
hesitate a minute to support the latter, granting them the fullest moral and 
historical right to force the unenlightened rivals into solidarity, although 
from the point of view of formal liberalism, those “willing to work” have on 
their side the right of “a free individual” to do what reason, or unreason, 
tells them.

When, finally, liberals of the Manchester School demand that the wage worker be 
left completely to his fate in the struggle with capital in the name of “the 
equality of citizens,” we unmask that metaphysical cliché which conceals the 
most glaring economic inequality, and we demand, point-blank, the legal 
protection of the class of wage workers, thereby clearly breaking with formal 
“equality before the law.”

The nationality question cannot be an exception among all the political, 
social, and moral questions examined in this way by modern socialism. It cannot 
be settled by the use of some vague cliché, even such a fine-sounding formula 
as “the right of all nations to self-determination.” For such a formula 
expresses either absolutely nothing, so that it is an empty, noncommittal 
phrase, or else it expresses the unconditional duty of socialists to support 
all national aspirations, in which case it is simply false.

On the basis of the general assumptions of historical materialism, the position 
of socialists with respect to nationality problems depends primarily on the 
concrete circumstances of each case, which differ significantly among 
countries, and also change in the course of time in each country. Even a 
superficial knowledge of the facts enables one to see that the question of the 
nationality struggles under the Ottoman Porte in the Balkans has a completely 
different aspect, a different economic and historical basis, a different degree 
of international importance, and different prospects for the future, from the 
question of the struggle of the Irish against the domination of England. 
Similarly, the complications in the relations among the nationalities which 
make up Austria are completely different from the conditions which influence 
the Polish question. Moreover, the nationality question in each country changes 
its character with time, and this means that new and different evaluations must 
be made about it. Even our three national movements beginning from the time of 
the Kosciuszko Insurrection could be seen as a triple, stereotyped repetition 
of the same historical play (that is, “the struggle of a subjugated nationality 
for independence”) only in the eyes of either a metaphysician of the 
upper-class Catholic ideology such as Szujski, who believed that Poland had 
historical mission to be the “Christ of nations,” or in the eyes of an 
ignoramus of the present-day social-patriotic “school.” Whoever cuts deeper 
with the scalpel of the researcher more precisely, of the 
historical-materialist researcher – will see beneath the surface of our three 
national uprisings three completely different socio-political movements, which 
took on an identical form of struggle with the invader in each case only 
because of external circumstances. To measure the Kosciuszko Insurrection and 
the November and January insurrections by one and the same yardstick – by the 
sacred laws of the “subjugated nation” – actually reveals a lack of all 
judgment and the complete absence of any historical and political 
discrimination.[6]

A glaring example of how the change of historical conditions influences the 
evaluation and the position of socialists with respect to the nationality 
question is the so-called Eastern question. During the Crimean war in 1855, the 
sympathies of all democratic and socialist Europe were on the side of the Turks 
and against the South Slavs who were seeking their liberty. The “right” of all 
nations to freedom did not prevent Marx, Engels, and Liebknecht from speaking 
against the Balkan Slavs and from resolutely supporting the integrity of the 
Turks. For they judged the national movements of the Slavic peoples in the 
Turkish empire not from the standpoint of the “eternal” sentimental formulae of 
liberalism, but from the standpoint of the material conditions which determined 
the content of these national movements, according to their views of the time. 
Marx and Engels saw in the freedom movement of the socially backward South 
Slavs only the machinations of Russian tsardom trying to irritate the Turks, 
and thus, without any second thoughts, they subordinated the question of the 
national freedom of the Slavs to the interests of European democracy, insisting 
on the integrity of Turkey as a bulwark of defense against Russian reaction. 
This political position was maintained in German Social Democracy as late as 
the second half of the 1890s, when the gray-haired Wilhelm Liebknecht, on the 
occasion of the struggle of the Ormian Turks, still spoke in that spirit. But 
by this time the position of German and international Social Democracy on the 
Eastern question had changed. Social Democracy began to support openly the 
aspirations of the suppressed nationalities in Turkey to a separate cultural 
existence, and abandoned all concern for the artificial preservation of Turkey 
as a whole. And at this time it was guided not by a feeling of duty toward the 
Ormians or the Macedonians as subjugated nationalities, but by the analysis of 
the material base of conditions in the East in the second half of the last 
century. By this analysis, the Social Democrats became convinced that the 
political disintegration of Turkey would result from its economic-political 
development in the second half of the nineteenth century, and that the 
temporary preservation of Turkey would serve the interests of the reactionary 
diplomacy of Russian absolutism. Here, as in all other questions, Social 
Democracy was not contrary to the current of objective development, but with 
it, and, profiting from its conclusions, it defended the interests of European 
civilization by supporting the national movements within Turkey. It also 
supported all attempts to renew and reform Turkey from within, however weak the 
social basis for such a movement may have been.

A second example of the same thing is provided by the diametrically opposite 
attitudes of Marx and Engels during the revolution of 1848 with respect to the 
national aspirations of the Czechs and the Poles. There is no doubt that from 
the point of view of the “right of nations to self-determination” the Czechs 
deserved the support of the European socialists and democrats no less than the 
Poles. Marx, however, did not pay any attention to that abstract formula, and 
hurled thunderbolts at the heads of the Czechs and their aspirations for 
freedom, aspirations which he regarded as a harmful complication of the 
revolutionary situation, all the more deserving of severe condemnation, since, 
to Marx, the Czechs were a dying nationality, doomed to disappear soon. The 
creators of The Communist Manifesto put forth these views at the same time that 
they were defending the nationalist movement of the Poles with all their 
strength, calling upon all revolutionary and progressive forces to help our 
patriots.

The sober realism, alien to all sentimentalism, with which Marx examined the 
national problems during the revolution itself, is shown by the way he treated 
the Polish and Czech questions:

“The Revolution of 1848,” wrote Marx in his articles on the revolution which 
appeared in February 1852 in the American paper, Daily Tribune,
``calling forth at once the claim of all oppressed nations to an independent 
existence, and to the right to settle their own affairs for themselves, it was 
quite natural that the Poles should at once demand the restoration of their 
country within the frontiers of the old Polish Republic before 1772. It is 
true, this frontier, even at that time, had become obsolete, if taken as the 
delimitation of German and Polish nationality; it had become more so every year 
since by the progress of Germanization; but then, the Germans had proclaimed 
such an enthusiasm for the restoration of Poland, that they must expect to be 
asked, as a first proof of the reality of their sympathies, to give up their 
share of the plunder. On the other hand, should whole tracts of land, inhabited 
chiefly by Germans, should large towns, entirely German, be given up to a 
people that as yet had never given any proofs of its capability of progressing 
beyond a state of feudalism based upon agricultural serfdom? The question was 
intricate enough. The only possible solution was in a war with Russia. The 
question of delimitation between the different revolutionized nations would 
have been made a secondary one to that of first establishing a safe frontier 
against the common enemy. The Poles, by receiving extended territories in the 
east, would have become more tractable and reasonable in the west; and Riga and 
Milan would have been deemed, after all, quite as important to them as Danzig 
and Elbing. Thus the advanced party in Germany, deeming a war with Russia 
necessary to keep up the Continental movement, and considering that the 
national reestablishment even of a part of Poland would inevitably lead to such 
a war, supported the Poles; while the reigning, middle-class party clearly 
foresaw its downfall from any national war against Russia, which would have 
called more active and energetic men to the helm, and, therefore, with a 
feigned enthusiasm for the extension of German nationality, they declared 
Prussian Poland, the chief seat of Polish revolutionary agitation, to be part 
and parcel of the German Empire that was to be.``

Marx treated the Czech question with no less political realism:

``The question of nationality gave rise to another struggle in Bohemia. This 
country, inhabited by two millions of Germans, and three millions of Slavonians 
of the Czechian tongue, had great historical recollections, almost all 
connected with the former supremacy of the Czechs. But then the force of this 
branch of the Slavonic family had been broken ever since the wars of the 
Hussites in the fifteenth century. The province speaking the Czechian tongue 
was divided, one part forming the kingdom of Bohemia, another the principality 
of Moravia, a third the Carpathian hill country of the Slovaks, being part of 
Hungary. The Moravians and Slovaks had long since lost every vestige of 
national feeling, and vitality, although mostly preserving their language. 
Bohemia was surrounded by thoroughly German countries on three sides out of 
four. The German element had made great progress on her own territory; even in 
the capital, in Prague, the two nationalities were pretty equally matched; and 
everywhere capital, trade, industry, and mental culture were in the hands of 
the Germans. The chief champion of the Czechian nationality, Professor Palacky, 
is himself nothing but a learned German run mad, who even now cannot speak the 
Czechian language correctly and without foreign accent. But, as it often 
happens, dying Czechian nationality, dying according to every fact known in 
history for the last four hundred years, made in 1848 a last effort to regain 
its former vitality an effort whose failure, independently of all revolutionary 
considerations, was to prove that Bohemia could only exist, henceforth, as a 
portion of Germany, although part of her inhabitants might yet, for some 
centuries, continue to speak a non‑German language. [Revolution and 
Konterrevolution in Deutschland, pp.57-62]``

We quote the above passages in order to stress the methods which Marx and 
Engels used with respect to the nationality question, methods not dealing in 
abstract formulae, but only in the real issues of each individual case. That 
method did not, though, keep them from making a faulty evaluation of the 
situation, or from taking a wrong, position in certain cases. The present state 
of affairs shows how deeply Marx was in error in predicting, sixty years ago, 
the disappearance of the Czech nationality, whose vitality the Austrians today 
find so troublesome. Conversely, he overestimated the international importance 
of Polish nationalism: this was doomed to decay by the internal development of 
Poland, a decay which had already set in at that time. But these historical 
errors do not detract an ounce from the value of Marx’s method, for there are 
in general no methods of research which are, a priori, protected against a 
wrong application in individual cases. Marx never claimed to be infallible, and 
nothing, in the last resort, is so contrary to the spirit of his science as 
“infallible” historical judgments. It was possible for Marx to be mistaken in 
his position with respect to certain national movements, and the author of the 
present work tried to show in 1896 and 1897 that Marx’s views on the Polish 
question, as on the Eastern question, were outdated and mistaken. But it is 
this former position of Marx and Engels on the question of Turkey and the South 
Slavs, as well as on the national movement of the Czechs and Poles, that shows 
emphatically how far the founders of scientific socialism were from solving all 
nationality questions in one manner only, on the basis of one slogan adopted a 
priori. It also shows how little they were concerned with the “metaphysical” 
rights of nations when it was a matter of the tangible material problems of 
European development.

Finally, an even more striking example of how the creators of modern socialist 
politics treated the national question is their evaluation of the freedom 
movement of the Swiss in the fourteenth century. This is part of history, 
therefore free from the influence of all the expectations and passions of day 
to day politics. The uprising of the Swiss cantons against the bloody 
oppression of the Hapsburg despotism (which, in the form of the historical myth 
of William Tell, is the object of absolute worship by the liberal-bourgeois 
romantic idealist) was appraised by Friedrich Engels in 1847 in the following 
way:

``The struggle of the early Swiss against Austria, the famous oath at Rytli, 
the heroic shot of Tell, the immortal victory at Morgarten – all this 
represented the struggle of restless shepherds against the thrust of historical 
development, a struggle of hidebound, conservative, local interests against the 
interests of the entire nation, a struggle of primitivism against 
enlightenment, barbarism against civilization. They won their victory over the 
civilization of that period, but as punishment they were cut off from the whole 
later progress of civilization.``

To this evaluation Kautsky adds the following commentary:

``A question mark could be added to the above concerning the civilizing mission 
which the Hapsburgs were carrying out in Switzerland in the fourteenth century. 
On the other hand it is correct that the preservation of the independence of 
the cantons was an event which was conservative to the nth degree, and in no 
way revolutionary, and that thenceforth the freedom of those cantons served as 
a means of preserving an element of blackest reaction in the center of Europe. 
It was those forest cantons which defeated Zwingli and his army in 1531 at the 
battle of Kappel, and thereby put a stop to the spread of Protestantism in 
Switzerland. They provided armies to all the despots of Europe, and it was the 
Swiss of the forest cantons who were the staunchest supporters of Louis XVl 
against the revolution. For this the republic raised a magnificent monument to 
them in Lucerne. [Die Neue Zeit, 1904-1905, Vol.II, p.146.]``

From the point of view of the ”right of nations to self-determination,” the 
Swiss uprising obviously deserves the sympathy of socialists on all scores. 
There is no doubt that the aspirations of the Swiss to free themselves from the 
Hapsburg yoke were an essential expression of the will of the “people” or a 
huge majority of them. The national movement of the Swiss had a purely 
defensive character, and was not informed by the desire to oppress other 
nationalities. It was intended only to throw off the oppression of a foreign 
and purely dynastic invader. Finally, this national movement formally bore all 
the external characteristics of democratism, and even revolutionism, since the 
people were rebelling against absolute rule under the slogan of a popular 
republic.

In complete contrast to this movement is the national uprising in Hungary in 
1848. It is easy to see what would have been the historical outcome of the 
victory of the Hungarians because the social and national conditions of that 
country insured the absolute domination of the Magyar minority over the mixed 
majority of the other, subjugated nationalities. A comparison of these two 
struggles for national independence - the Hungarian in 1848 and the Swiss five 
centuries earlier – is all the more significant since both were directed 
against the same enemy: the absolutism of the Austrian Hapsburgs. The method 
and the viewpoint on national politics of Marx and Engels are brought into high 
relief by this comparison. Despite all the external evidences of revolutionism 
in the Swiss movement, and despite the indisputable two-edged character of the 
Magyar movement, obvious in the flunkeyism with which the Hungarian 
revolutionaries helped the Vienna government to suppress the Italian 
revolution, the creators of scientific socialism sharply criticized the Swiss 
uprising as a reactionary event, while they supported fervently the Hungarian 
uprising in 1848. In both cases they were guided not by the formula of “the 
right of nations to self-determination,” which obviously was much more 
applicable to the Swiss than to the Magyars, but only by a realistic analysis 
of the movements from a historical and political standpoint. The uprising of 
the fragmented peasant cantons, with their regionalism against the centralist 
power of the Hapsburgs, was, in the eyes of Engels, a sign of historical 
reaction, just as the absolutism of the princely power, moving toward 
centralism, was at that time an element of historical progress. From a similar 
standpoint, we note in passing, Lassalle regarded the peasant wars, and the 
parallel rebellion of the minor knights of the nobility in Germany in the 
sixteenth century against the rising princely power, as signs of reaction. On 
the other hand, in 1848, Hapsburg absolutism was already a reactionary relic of 
the Middle Ages, and the national uprising of the Hungarians – a natural ally 
of the internal German revolution – directed against the Hapsburgs naturally 
had to be regarded as an element of historical progress.

III

What is more, in taking such a stand Marx and Engels were not at all indulging 
in party or class egoism, and were not sacrificing entire nations to the needs 
and perspectives of Western European democracy, as it might have appeared.

It is true that it sounds much more generous, and is more flattering to the 
overactive imagination of the young “intellectual,” when the socialists 
announce a general and universal introduction of freedom for all existing 
suppressed nations. But the tendency to grant all peoples, countries, groups, 
and all human creatures the right to freedom, equality, and other such joys by 
one sweeping stroke of the pen, is characteristic only of the youthful period 
of the socialist movement, and most of all of the phraseological bravado of 
anarchism.

The socialism of the modern working class, that is, scientific socialism, takes 
no delight in the radical and wonderful-sounding solutions of social and 
national questions, but examines primarily the real issues involved in these 
problems,

The solutions of the problems of Social Democracy are not in general 
characterized by “magnanimity,” and in this respect they are always outdone by 
socialist parties which are not hampered by scientific “doctrines,” and which 
therefore always have their pockets full of the most beautiful gifts for 
everyone. Thus, for example, in Russia, the Social Revolutionary Party leaves 
Social Democracy far behind in the agricultural question; it has for the 
peasants a recipe for the immediate partial introduction of socialism in the 
village, without the need of a boring period of waiting for the conditions of 
such a transformation in the sphere of industrial development. In comparison 
with such parties, Social Democracy is and always will be a poor party, just as 
Marx in his time was poor in comparison with the expansive and magnanimous 
Bakunin, just as Marx and Engels were both poor in comparison with the 
representatives of “real” or rather “philosophical” socialism. But the secret 
of the magnanimity of all socialists with an anarchist coloration and of the 
poverty of Social Democracy, is that anarchistic revolutionism measures 
“strength by intentions, not intentions according to strength”; that is, it 
measures its aspirations only by what its speculative reason, fumbling with an 
empty utopia, regards as ̶good” and “necessary” for the salvation of humanity. 
Social Democracy, on the other hand, stands firmly on historical ground in its 
aspirations, and therefore reckons with historical possibilities. Marxian 
socialism differs from all the other brands of socialism because, among other 
things, it has no pretensions to keeping patches in its pocket to mend all the 
holes made by historical development.

Actually, even if as socialists we recognized the immediate right of all 
nations to independence, the fates of nations would not change an iota because 
of this. The “right” of a nation to freedom as well as the “right” of the 
worker to economic independence are, under existing social conditions, only 
worth as much as the “right” of each man to eat off gold plates, which, as 
Nicolaus Chernyshevski wrote, he would be ready to sell at any moment for a 
ruble. In the 1840s the “right to work” was a favorite postulate of the Utopian 
Socialists in France, and appeared as an immediate and radical way of solving 
the social question. However, in the Revolution of 1848 that “right” ended, 
after a very short attempt to put it into effect, in a terrible fiasco, which 
could not have been avoided even if the famous “national work-shops” had been 
organized differently. An analysis of the real conditions of the contemporary 
economy, as given by Marx in his Capital, must lead to the conviction that even 
if present-day governments were forced to declare a universal “right to work,” 
it would remain only a fine-sounding phrase, and not one member of the rank and 
file of the reserve army of labor waiting on the sidewalk would be able to make 
a bowl of soup for his hungry children from that right.

Today, Social Democracy understands that the “right to work” will stop being an 
empty sound only when the capitalist regime is abolished, for in that regime 
the chronic unemployment of a certain part of the industrial proletariat is a 
necessary condition of production. Thus, Social Democracy does not demand a 
declaration of that imaginary “right” on the basis of the existing system, but 
rather strives for the abolition of the system itself by the class struggle, 
regarding labor organizations, unemployment insurance, etc., only as temporary 
means of help.

In the same way, hopes of solving all nationality questions within the 
capitalist framework by insuring to all nations, races, and ethnic groups the 
possibility of “self-determination” is a complete utopia. And it is a utopia 
from the point of view that the objective system of political and class forces 
condemns many a demand in the political program of Social Democracy to be 
unfeasible in practice. For example, important voices in the ranks of the 
international workers’ movement have expressed the conviction that a demand for 
the universal introduction of the eight-hour day by legal enactment has no 
chance of being realized in bourgeois society because of the growing social 
reaction of the ruling classes, the general stagnation of social reforms, the 
rise of powerful organizations of businessmen, etc. Nonetheless, no one would 
dare call the demand for the eight-hour day a utopia, because it is in complete 
accordance with the progressive development of bourgeois society.

However, to resume: the actual possibility of “self-determination” for all 
ethnic groups or otherwise defined nationalities is a utopia precisely because 
of the trend of historical development of contemporary societies. Without 
examining those distant times at the dawn of history when the nationalities of 
modern states were constantly moving about geographically, when they were 
joining, merging, fragmenting, and trampling one another, the fact is that all 
the ancient states without exception are, as a result of that long history of 
political and ethnic upheavals, extremely mixed with respect to nationalities. 
Today, in each state, ethnic relics bear witness to the upheavals and 
intermixtures which characterized the march of historical development in the 
past. Even in his time, Marx maintained that these national survivals had no 
other function but to serve as bastions of the counter-revolution, until they 
should be completely swept from the face of the earth by the great hurricane of 
revolution or world war. “There is no country in Europe,” he wrote in the Neue 
Rheinische Zeitung:

``which doesn’t have in some corner one or more of these ruins of nations, the 
remains of an ancient people displaced and conquered by a nation which later 
became a standard-bearer of historical development. These remains of 
nationalities, mercilessly trampled on by history - as Hegel says – these 
national left-overs will all become and will remain until their final 
extermination or denationalization fanatic partisans of the counter-revolution, 
since their entire existence is in general a protest against the great 
historical revolution. For ex-ample, in Scotland the Gaels were the mainstays 
of the Stuarts from 1640 to 1745; in France, it was the Bretons who were the 
mainstays of the Bourbons from 1792 to 1800; while in Spain, the Basques were 
the supporters of Don Carlos. In Austria, to take another example, the 
pan-Slavic South Slavs are nothing more than the national left-overs of a 
highly confused thousand-year-long development. [Aus dem literarischen Nachlass 
von Karl Marx, Friedrich Engels und Ferdinand Lasalle, Vol.III, p.241]``

In another article, treating the pan-Slavs’ strivings for the independence of 
all Slavic nations, Marx writes,

``The Germans and Hungarians, during the times when great monarchies were a 
historical necessity in Europe, forged all those petty, crippled, powerless 
little nations into one big state, thereby allowing them to participate in the 
development of history which, if left to themselves, they would have completely 
missed. Today, because of the huge progress of industry, trade, and 
communications, political centralization has become an even more pressing need 
than it was in the fifteenth and sixteenth centuries. What is not yet 
centralized is being centralized. [Ibid., p.255.]``

We abandoned Marx’s views on the South Slavs a long time ago: but the general 
fact is that historical development, especially the modern development of 
capitalism, does not tend to return to each nationality its independent 
existence, but moves rather in the opposite direction, and this is as well 
known today as during the time of the Neue Rheinische Zeitung.

In his most recent paper, Nationality and Internationalism, Karl Kautsky makes 
the following sketch of the historical fates of nationalities:

``We have seen that language is the most important means of social intercourse. 
As that intercourse grows with economic development, so the circle of people 
using the same language must grow as well. From this arises the tendency of 
unified nations to expand, to swallow up other nations, which lose their 
language and adopt the language of the dominant nation or a mixture.``

According to Kautsky, three great cultural communities of humanity developed 
simultaneously: the Christian, the Muslim, and the Buddhist.

``ach of these three cultural groupings includes the most variegated languages 
and nationalities. Within each one most of the culture is not national but 
international. But universal communication has further effects. It expands even 
more and everywhere establishes the domination of the same capitalist 
production ... Whenever a closely knit community of communication and culture 
exists for a fairly long time among a large number of nations, then one or a 
few nations gain ascendancy over the government, the military, the scientific 
and artistic heights. Their language becomes indispensable for every merchant 
and educated man in that international cultural community. Their culture – in 
economy, art, and literature – lends its character to the whole civilization. 
Such a role was played in the Mediterranean basin until the end of ancient 
times by Greek and Latin. In the Mohammedan world it is played by Arabic; in 
the Christian, including Jews and atheists, German, English, and French have 
become universal languages ... Perhaps economic and political development will 
add Russian to these three languages. But it is equally possible that one of 
them, English, will become the only common language ... The joining of nations 
to the international cultural community will be reflected in the growth of 
universal languages among merchants and educated people. And this union was 
never as closely knit as it is now; never was a purely national culture less 
possible. Therefore it strikes us as very strange when people talk always of 
only a national culture and when a goal of socialism is considered to be the 
endowing of the masses with a national culture ... When socialist society 
provides the masses with an education, it also gives them the ability to speak 
several languages, the universal languages, and therefore to take part in the 
entire international civilization and not only in the separate culture of a 
certain linguistic community. When we have got to the point where the masses in 
our civilized states can master one or more of the universal languages besides 
their native language, this will be a basis for the gradual withdrawal and 
ultimately the complete disappearance of the languages of the smaller nations, 
and for the union of all civilized humanity into one language and one 
nationality, just as the peoples in the eastern basin of the Mediterranean were 
united in Hellenism after Alexander the Great, and the peoples of the western 
area later merged into the Roman nationality.

The variety of languages within our circle of civilization makes understanding 
among members of the various nations difficult and is an obstacle to their 
civilized progress. [Emphasis in the following paragraph is R.L.s] But only 
socialism will overcome that obstacle, and much work will be needed before it 
can succeed in educating entire masses of people to obtain visible results. And 
we must keep in mind already today that our internationalism is not a special 
type of nationalism differs from bourgeois nationalism only in that it does not 
behave aggressively – that it leaves to each nation the same right which it 
demands for its own nation, and thereby recognizes the complete sovereignty 
(Soveränität) of each nation. Such a view, which transforms the position of 
anarchism concerning individuals onto nations, does not correspond to the close 
cultural community existing between nations of contemporary civilisation.

These last, in fact, in regard to economy and civilization, form one single 
social body whose welfare depends on the harmony of the cooperation of the 
parts, possible only by the subordination of all the parts to the whole. The 
Socialist International is not a conglomerate of autocratic nations, each doing 
what it likes, as long as it does not interfere with the equality of rights of 
the others; but rather an organism wherein the better it works, the easier it 
is for its parts to come to agreement and the more they work together according 
to a common plan.``

Such is the historical scheme as described by Kautsky. To be sure, he presents 
the matter from a different point of view than Marx does, emphasizing mainly 
the side of cultural, peaceful development, whereas Marx accents its political 
side, an external armed conquest. Both, however, characterize the fate of 
nationalities in the course of events, not as tending to separate themselves 
and become independent, but completely vice-versa. Kautsky formulates – as far 
as we know, for the first time in socialistic literature of recent times – the 
historical tendency to remove completely all national distinctions within the 
socialist system and to fuse all of civilized humanity into one nationality. 
[K. Kautsky, Nationalität und Internationaliät, pp.12-17 & p.23.]

However – that theoretician believes – at the present time capitalist 
development gives rise to phenomena which seem to work in the opposite 
direction: the awakening and intensification of national consciousness as well 
as the need for a national state which is the state form “best corresponding to 
modern conditions, the form in which it can most easily fulfil its tasks.” 
[ibid.]

The “best national state is only an abstraction which can be easily described 
and defined theoretically, but which doesn’t correspond to reality. Historical 
development toward a universal community of civilization will, like all social 
development, take place in the midst of a contradiction, but this 
contradiction, with respect to the consolidating growth of international 
civilization, lies in another area than where Kautsky seeks it, not in the 
tendency toward the idea of a “national state,” but rather where Marx indicates 
it to be, in the deadly struggle among nations, in the tendency to create – 
alongside the great areas of civilization and despite them – great capitalist 
states. The development of world powers, a characteristic feature of our times 
growing in importance along with the progress of capitalism, from the very 
outset condemns all small nations to political impotence. Apart from a few of 
the most powerful nations, the leaders in capitalist development, which possess 
the spiritual and material resources necessary to maintain their political and 
economic independence, “self-determination,” the independent existence of 
smaller and petty nations, is an illusion, and will become even more so. The 
return of all, or even the majority of the nations which are today oppressed, 
to independence would only be possible if the existence of small states in the 
era of capitalism had any chances or hopes for the future. Besides, the 
big-power economy and politics – a condition of survival for the capitalist 
states – turn the politically independent, formally equal, small European 
states into mutes on the European stage and more often into scapegoats. Can one 
speak with any seriousness of the “self-determination” of peoples which are 
formally independent, such as Montenegrins, Bulgarians, Rumanians, the Serbs, 
the Greeks, and, as far as that goes, even the Swiss, whose very independence 
is the product of the political struggles and diplomatic game of the “Concert 
of Europe”? From this point of view, the idea of insuring all “nations” the 
possibility of self-determination is equivalent to reverting from 
Great-Capitalist development to the small medieval states, far earlier than the 
fifteenth and sixteenth centuries.

The other principal feature of modern development, which stamps such an idea as 
utopian, is capitalist imperialism. The example of England and Holland 
indicates that under certain conditions a capitalist country can even 
completely skip the transition phase of “national state” and create at once, in 
its manufacturing phase, a colony-holding state. The example of England and 
Holland, which, at the beginning of the seventeenth century, had begun to 
acquire colonies, was followed in the eighteenth and nineteenth centuries by 
all the great capitalist states. The fruit of that trend is the continuous 
destruction of the independence of more and more new countries and peoples, of 
entire continents.

The very development of international trade in the capitalist period brings 
with it the inevitable, though at times slow ruin of all the more primitive 
societies, destroys their historically existing means of “self-determination,” 
and makes them dependent on the crushing wheel of capitalist development and 
world politics. Only complete formalist blindness could lead one to maintain 
that, for example, the Chinese nation (whether we regard the people of that 
state as one or several nations) is today really “determining itself.” The 
destructive action of world trade is followed by outright partition or by the 
political dependence of colonial countries in various degrees and forms. And if 
Social Democracy struggles with all its strength against colonial policy in all 
its manifestations, trying to hinder its progress, then it will at the same 
time realize that this development, as well as the roots of colonial politics, 
lies at the very foundations of capitalist production, that colonialism will 
inevitably accompany the future progress of capitalism, and that only the 
innocuous bourgeois apostles of “peace” can believe in the possibility of 
today’s states avoiding that path. The struggle to stay in the world market, to 
play international politics, and to have overseas territories is both a 
necessity and a condition of development for capitalist world powers. The form 
that best serves the interests of exploitation in the contemporary world is not 
the “national” state, as Kautsky thinks, but a state bent on conquest. When we 
compare the different states from the point of view of the degree to which they 
approach this ideal, we see that it is not the French state which best fits the 
model, at least not in its European part which is homogeneous with respect to 
nationality. Still less does the Spanish state fit the model; since it lost its 
colonies, it has shed its imperialist character and is purely “national” in 
composition. Rather do we look to the British and German states as models, for 
they are based on national oppression in Europe and the world at large – and to 
the United States of America, a state which keeps in its bosom like a gaping 
wound the oppression of the Negro people, and seeks to conquer the Asiatic 
peoples.

The following table illustrates the imperialist tendency of national conquest. 
The figures refer to the number of oppressed people in colonies belonging to 
each country.

The huge figures quoted, which include around five hundred million people, 
should be increased by the colossal addition of the countries which do not 
figure as colonies, but are actually completely dependent on European states, 
and then we should break these totals down into countless nationalities and 
ethnic groups to convey an idea of the effects to date of capitalist 
imperialism on the fates of nations and their ability to “determine themselves.”

Of course, the history of the colonial expansion of capitalism displays to some 
extent the contradictory tendency of the legal, and then political gaining of 
independence of the colonial countries. The history of the breaking away of the 
United States from England at the end of the eighteenth century, of the 
countries of South America from Spain and Portugal in the twenties and thirties 
of the last century, as well as the winning of autonomy by the Australian 
states from England, are the most obvious illustrations of this tendency. 
However, a more careful examination of these events will point at once to the 
special conditions of their origins. Both South and North America, until the 
nineteenth century, were the victims of a still primitive system of colonial 
administration, based more on the plundering of the country and its natural 
resources for the benefit of the treasures of European states than on a 
rational exploitation for the benefit of capitalist production. In these cases, 
it was a matter of an entire country, which possessed all the conditions for 
the independent development of capitalism, making its own way by breaking the 
rotting fetters of political dependence. The force of that capitalist thrust 
was stronger in North America, which was dependent on England, while South 
America, until then predominantly agricultural, met a much weaker resistance 
from Spain and Portugal, which were economically backward. Obviously, such an 
exceptional wealth of natural resources is not the rule in all colonies. On the 
other hand, the contemporary system of colonization has created a dependence 
which is much less superficial than the previous one. But the winning of 
independence by the American colonies did not remove national dependence, it 
only transferred it to another nationality – only changed its role. Take first 
the United States: the element freeing itself from the scepter of England was 
not a foreign nation but only the same English emigrants who had settled in 
America on the ruins and corpses of the redskin natives – which is true also of 
the Australian colonies of England, in which the English constitute 90 percent 
of the population. The United States is today in the vanguard of those nations 
practicing imperialist conquest. In the same way, Brazil, Argentina, and the 
other former colonies whose leading element is immigrants – Portuguese and 
Spanish - won independence from the European states primarily in order to 
exercise control over the trade in Negroes and their use on the plantations, 
and to annex all the weaker colonies in the area. Most likely the same 
conditions prevail in India, where lately there has appeared a rather serious 
“national” movement against England. The very existence in India of a huge 
number of nationalities at different degrees of social and civilized 
development, as well as their mutual dependence, should warn against too hasty 
evaluation of the Indian movement under the simple heading of “the rights of 
the nation.”

Apparent exceptions only confirm on closer analysis the conclusion that the 
modern development of capitalism cannot reconciled with the true independence 
of all nationalities.

It is true the problem appears much simpler if, when discussing nationality, we 
exclude the question of colonial partitions. Such a technique is often applied, 
consciously or unconsciously, by the defenders of the “rights of nations”; it 
also corresponds to the position with respect to colonial politics taken, for 
example, by Eduard David in the German Social Democracy or van Kol in the 
Dutch. This point of view considers colonialism in general as the expression of 
the civilizing mission of European peoples, inevitable even in a socialist 
regime. This view can be briefly described as the “European” application of the 
philosophical principle of Fichte in the well known paraphrase of Ludwig Brone: 
“Ich bin ich – was ausser mir ist Lebensmittel” (”I am myself – what is outside 
of me is the means of life”). If only the European peoples are regarded as 
nations proper, while colonial peoples are looked on as “supply depots,” then 
we may use the term “nation-state” in Europe for countries like France, 
Denmark, or Italy, and the problem of nationality can be limited to 
intra-European dimensions. But in this case, “the right of nations to 
self-determination” becomes a theory of the ruling races and betrays clearly 
its origin in the ideologies of bourgeois liberalism together with its 
“European” cretinism. In the approach of socialists, such a right must, by the 
nature of things, have a universal character. The awareness of this necessity 
is enough to indicate that the hope of realizing this “right” on the basis of 
the existing setup is a utopia; it is in direct contradiction to the tendency 
of capitalist development on which Social Democracy has based its existence. A 
general attempt to divide all existing states into national units and to 
re-tailor them on the model of national states and statelets is a completely 
hopeless, and historically speaking, reactionary undertaking.

IV

The formula of the “right of nations” is inadequate to justify the position of 
socialists on the nationality question, not only because it fails to take into 
account the wide range of historical conditions (place and time) existing in 
each given case and does not reckon with the general current of the development 
of global conditions, but also because it ignores completely the fundamental 
theory of modern socialists - the theory of social classes.

When we speak of the “right of nations to self-determination, “ we are using 
the concept of the “nation” as a homogeneous social and political entity. But 
actually, such a concept of the “nation” is one of those categories of 
bourgeois ideology which Marxist theory submitted to a radical re-vision, 
showing how that misty veil, like the concepts of the “freedom of citizens,” 
“equality before the law,” etc., conceals in every case a definite historical 
content.

In a class society, “the nation” as a homogeneous socio-political entity does 
not exist. Rather, there exist within each nation, classes with antagonistic 
interests and “rights.” There literally is not one social area, from the 
coarsest material relationships to the most subtle moral ones, in which the 
possessing class and the class-conscious proletariat hold the same attitude, 
and in which they appear as a consolidated “national” entity. In the sphere of 
economic relations, the bourgeois classes represent the interests of 
exploitation – the proletariat the interests of work. In the sphere of legal 
relations, the cornerstone of bourgeois society is private property; the 
interest of the proletariat demands the emancipation of the propertyless man 
from the domination of property. In the area of the judiciary, bourgeois 
society represents class “justice,” the justice of the well-fed and the rulers; 
the proletariat defends the principle of taking into account social influences 
on the individual, of humaneness. In international relations, the bourgeoisie 
represent the politics of war and partition, and at the present stage, a system 
of trade war; the proletariat demands a politics of universal peace and free 
trade. In the sphere of the social sciences and philosophy, bourgeois schools 
of thought and the school representing the proletariat stand in diametric 
opposition to each other. The possessing classes have their world view; it is 
represented by idealism, metaphysics, mysticism, eclecticism; the modern 
proletariat has its theory – dialectic materialism. Even in the sphere of 
so-called “universal” conditions – in ethics, views on art, on behavior – the 
interests, world view, and ideals of the bourgeoisie and those of the 
enlightened proletariat represent two camps, separated from each other by an 
abyss. And whenever the formal strivings and the interests of the proletariat 
and those of the bourgeoisie (as a whole or in its most progressive part) seem 
identical – for example, in the field of democratic aspirations - there, under 
the identity of forms and slogans, is hidden the most complete divergence of 
contents and essential politics.

There can be no talk of a collective and uniform will, of the 
self-determination of the “nation” in a society formed in such a manner. If we 
find in the history of modern societies “national” movements, and struggles for 
“national interests,” these are usually class movements of the ruling strata of 
the bourgeoisie, which can in any given case represent the interest of the 
other strata of the population only insofar as under the form of “national 
interests” it defends progressive forms of historical development, and insofar 
as the working class has not yet distinguished itself from the mass of the 
“nation” (led by the bourgeoisie) into an independent, enlightened political 
class.

In this sense, the French bourgeoisie had the right to come forth as the third 
estate in the Great Revolution in the name of the French people, and even the 
German bourgeoisie in 1848 could still regard themselves, to a certain degree, 
as the representatives of the German “nation” – although The Communist 
Manifesto and, in part, the Neue Rheinische Zeitung were already the indicators 
of a distinct class politics of the proletariat in Germany. In both cases this 
meant only that the revolutionary class concern of the bourgeoisie was, at that 
stage of social development, the concern of the class of people who still 
formed, with the bourgeoisie, a politically uniform mass in relation to 
reigning feudalism.

This circumstance shows that the ”rights of nations” cannot be a yardstick for 
the position of the Socialist Party on the nationality question. The very 
existence of such a party is proof that the bourgeoisie has stopped being the 
representative of the entire mass of the people, that the class of the 
proletariat is no longer hidden in the skirts of the bourgeoisie, but has 
separated itself off as an independent class with its own social and political 
aspirations. Because the concepts of “nations,” of “rights,” and the “will of 
the people” as a uniform whole are, as we have said, remnants from the times of 
immature and unconscious antagonism between the proletariat and the 
bourgeoisie, the application of that idea by the class-conscious and 
independently organized proletariat would be a striking contradiction – not a 
contradiction against academic logic, but a historical contradiction.

With respect to the nationality question in contemporary society, a socialist 
party must take class antagonism into account. The Czech nationality question 
has one form for the young Czech petite bourgeoisie and another for the Czech 
proletariat. Nor can we seek a single solution of the Polish national question 
for Koscielski and his stable boy in Miroslawie, for the Warsaw and Lodz 
bourgeoisie and for class-conscious Polish workers all at the same time; while 
the Jewish question is formulated in one way in the minds of the Jewish 
bourgeoisie, and in another for the enlightened Jewish proletariat. For Social 
Democracy, the nationality question is, like all other social and political 
questions, primarily a question of class interests.

In the Germany of the 1840s there existed a kind of mystical-sentimental 
socialism, that of the “true socialists” Karl Grün and Moses Hess; this kind of 
socialism was represented later in Poland by Limanowski. After the 1840s there 
appeared in Poland a Spartan edition of the same – see the Lud Polski [Polish 
People] in the early 1870s and Pobudka [Reveille] at the end of that decade. 
This socialism strove for everything good and beautiful. And on that basis, 
Limanowski, later the leader of the PPS, tried to weld together Polish 
socialism and the task of reconstructing Poland, with the observation that 
socialism is an idea that is obviously beautiful, and patriotism is a no less 
beautiful idea, and so “Why shouldn’t two such beautiful ideas be joined 
together?”

The only healthy thing in this sentimental socialism is that it is a utopian 
parody of the correct idea that a socialist regime has, as the final goal of 
the proletariat’s aspirations, taken the pledge that by abolishing the 
domination of classes, for the first time in history it will guarantee the 
realization of the highest ideals of humanity.

And this is really the content and the essential meaning of the principle 
presented to the International Congress at London [in 1896] in the resolution 
quoted. “The right of Nations to self-determination” stops being a cliché only 
in a social regime where the “right to work” has stopped being an empty phrase. 
A socialist regime, which eliminates not only the domination of one class over 
another, but also the very existence of social classes and their opposition, 
the very division of society into classes with different interests and desires, 
will bring about a society which is the sum total individuals tied together by 
the harmony and solidarity their interests, a uniform whole with a common, 
organized will and the ability to satisfy it. The socialist regime will realize 
directly the “nation” as a uniform will – insofar as the nations within that 
regime in general will constitute separate social organisms or, as Kautsky 
states, will join into one – and the material conditions for its free 
self-determination. In a word, society will win the ability to freely determine 
its national existence when it has the ability to determine its political being 
and the conditions of its creation. “Nations” will control their historical 
existence when human society controls its social processes.

Therefore, the analogy which is drawn by partisans of the “right of nations to 
self-determination” between that “right” and all democratic demands, like the 
right of free speech, free press, freedom of association and of assembly, is 
completely incongruous. These people point out that we support the freedom of 
association because we are the party of political freedom; but we still fight 
against hostile bourgeois parties. Similarly, they say, we have the democratic 
duty to support the self-determination of nations, but this fact does not 
commit us to support every individual tactic of those who fight for 
self-determination.

The above view completely overlooks the fact that these “rights,” which have a 
certain superficial similarity, lie on completely different historical levels. 
The rights of association and assembly, free speech, the free press. etc., are 
the legal forms of existence of a mature bourgeois society. But “the right of 
nations to self-determination” is only a metaphysical formulation of an idea 
which in bourgeois society is completely non-existent and can be realized only 
on the basis of a socialist regime.

However, as it is practiced today, socialism is not at all a collection of all 
these mystical “noble” and “beautiful” desires, but only a political expression 
of well-defined conditions, that is, the fight of the class of the modern 
proletariat against the domination of the bourgeoisie. Socialism means the 
striving of the proletariat to bring about the dictatorship of its class in 
order to get rid of the present form of production. This task is the main and 
guiding one for the Socialist Party as the party of the proletariat: it 
determines the position of that party with respect to all the several problems 
of social life.

Social Democracy is the class party of the proletariat. Its historical task is 
to express the class interests of the proletariat and also the revolutionary 
interests of the development of capitalist society toward realizing socialism. 
Thus, Social Democracy is called upon to realize not the right of nations to 
self-determination but only the right of the working class, which is exploited 
and oppressed, of the proletariat, to self-determination. From that position 
Social Democracy examines all social and political questions without exception, 
and from that standpoint it formulates its programmatic demands. Neither in the 
question of the political forms which we demand in the state, nor in the 
question of the state’s internal or external policies, nor in the questions of 
law or education, of taxes or the military, does Social Democracy allow the 
“nation” to decide its fate according to its own vision of self-determination. 
All of these questions affect the class interests of the proletariat in a way 
that questions of national-political and national-cultural existence do not. 
But between those questions and the national-political and national-cultural 
questions, exist usually the closest ties of mutual dependence and causality. 
As a result, Social Democracy cannot here escape the necessity of formulating 
these demands individually, and demanding actively the forms of 
national-political and national-cultural existence which best correspond to the 
interests of the proletariat and its class struggle at a given time and place, 
as well as to the interests of the revolutionary development of society. Social 
Democracy cannot leave these questions to be solved by “nations.”

This becomes perfectly obvious as soon as we bring the question down from the 
clouds of abstraction to the firm ground of concrete conditions.

The “nation” should have the “right” to self-determination. But who is that 
“nation” and who has the authority and the “right” to speak for the “nation” 
and express its will? How can we find out what the “nation” actually wants? 
Does there exist even one political party which would not claim that it alone, 
among all others, truly expresses the will of the “nation,” whereas all other 
parties give only perverted and false expressions of the national will? All the 
bourgeois, liberal parties consider themselves the incarnation of the will of 
the people and claim the exclusive monopoly to represent the “nation.” But 
conservative and reactionary parties refer no less to the will and interests of 
the nation, and within certain limits, have no less of a right to do so. The 
Great French Revolution was indubitably an expression of the will of the French 
nation, but Napoleon, who juggled away the work of the Revolution in his coup 
of the 18th Brumaire, based his entire state reform on the principle of “la 
volonté generale” [the general will].

In 1848, the will of the “nation” produced first the republic and the 
provisional government, then the National Assembly, and finally Louis 
Bonaparte, who cashiered the Republic, the provisional government, and the 
national assembly. During the [1905] Revolution in Russia, liberalism demanded 
in the name of the people a “cadet” ministry; absolutism, in the name of the 
same people, arranged the pogroms of the Jews, while the revolutionary peasants 
expressed their national will by sending the estates of the gentry up in smoke. 
In Poland, the party of the Black Hundreds, National Democracy, had a claim to 
be the will of the people, and in the name of “the self-determination of the 
nation” incited “national” workers to assassinate socialist workers.

Thus the same thing happens to the “true” will of the nation as to the true 
ring in Lessing’s story of Nathan the Wise: it has been lost and it seems 
almost impossible to find it and to tell it from the false and counterfeit 
ones. On the surface, the principle of democracy provides a way of 
distinguishing the true will of the people by determining the opinion of the 
majority.

The nation wants what the majority of the people want. But woe to the Social 
Democratic Party which would ever take that principle as its own yardstick: 
that would condemn to death Social Democracy itself as the revolutionary party. 
Social Democracy by its very nature is a party representing the interests of a 
huge majority of the nation. But it is also for the time being in bourgeois 
society, insofar as it is a matter of expressing the conscious will of the 
nation, the party of a minority which only seeks to become the majority. In its 
aspirations and its political program it seeks to reflect not the will of a 
majority of the nation, but on the contrary, the embodiment of the conscious 
will of the proletariat alone. And even within that class, Social Democracy is 
not and does not claim to be the embodiment of the will of the majority. It 
expresses only the will and the consciousness of the most advanced and most 
revolutionary section of the urban-industrial proletariat. It tries to expand 
that will and to clear a way for a majority of the workers by making them 
conscious of their own interests. “The will of the nation” or its majority is 
not therefore an idol for Social Democracy before which it humbly prostrates 
itself. On the contrary, the historical mission of Social Democracy is based 
above all on revolutionizing and forming the will of the “nation”; that is, its 
working-class majority. For the traditional forms of consciousness which the 
majority of the nation, and therefore the working classes, display in bourgeois 
society are the usual forms of bourgeois consciousness, hostile to the ideals 
and aspirations of socialism. Even in Germany, where Social Democracy is the 
most powerful political party, it is still today, with its three and a quarter 
million voters, a minority compared to the eight million voters for bourgeois 
parties and the thirty million who have the right to vote. The statistics on 
parliamentary electors give, admittedly, only a rough idea of the relation of 
forces in times of peace. The German nation then “determines itself” by 
electing a majority of conservatives, clerics, and freethinkers, and puts its 
political fate in their hands. And the same thing is happening, to an even 
greater degree, in all other countries.

V

Let us take a concrete example in an attempt to apply the principle that the 
“nation” should “determine itself.”

With respect to Poland at the present stage of the revolution, one of the 
Russian Social Democrats belonging to the editorial committee of the now 
defunct paper, Iskra, in 1906 explained the concept of the indispensable Warsaw 
constituent assembly in the following way:

``if we start from the assumption that the political organization of Russia is 
the decisive factor determining the current oppression of the nationalities, 
then we must conclude that the proletariat of the oppressed nationalities and 
the annexed countries should be extremely active in the organization of an 
all-Russian constituent assembly.

This assembly could, if it wished, carry out its revolutionary mission, and 
break the fetters of force with which tsardom binds to itself the oppressed 
nationalities.

And there is no other satisfactory, that is, revolutionary way of solving that 
question than by implementing the rights of the nationalities to determine 
their own fate. [Emphasis in the entire citation is RLs.] The task of a united 
proletarian party of all nationalities in the assembly will be to bring about 
such a solution of the nationality question, and this task can be realized by 
the Party only insofar as it is based on the movement of the masses, on the 
pressure they put on the constituent assembly.

But in what concrete form should the admitted right to self-determination be 
realized?

Where the nationality question can be more or less identified with the 
existence of a legal state – as is the case in Poland – then the organ which 
can realize the nation’s right to self-determination can and should be a 
national constituent assembly whose special task is to determine the relation 
of a given “borderland country” to the state as a whole, to decide whether it 
should belong to the state or break away from it, to decide its internal set-up 
and its future connection with the state as a whole.

And therefore the constituent assembly of Poland should decide whether Poland 
will become part of a new Russia and what its constitution should be. And the 
Polish proletariat should use all its strength to insure that its class makes 
its mark on the decision of that organ of national self-government.

If we should ask the all-Russian assembly to hand the solution of the Polish 
national question over to the Warsaw sejm, I do not believe that there is any 
need to put off calling that sejm until the Petersburg constituents should take 
up the nationality question.

On the contrary, I think that the slogan of a constituent assembly in Warsaw 
should be put forth now, at the same time as the slogan for an all-Russian 
constituent assembly. The government which finally calls a constituent assembly 
for all Russia should also call (or sanction the calling of) a special 
constituent sejm for Poland. The job of the all-Russian assembly will be to 
sanction the work of the Warsaw sejm, and in the light of the different social 
forces involved in the Petersburg constituent assembly, the more this is given 
on the basis of the real principles of democracy the more decisively and 
clearly will the Polish nation express its national will. It will do this most 
clearly in the elections to the sejm especially called to decide the future 
fate of Poland. On the basis of this sejm’s decisions, the representatives of 
the Polish and Russian proletariat in the all-Russian assembly will be able to 
energetically defend the real recognition of the right to self-determination.

Thus, the simultaneous calling of all-Russian and all-Polish constituent 
assemblies: this should be our slogan.

The presentation by the proletariat of the demand for a constituent assembly 
for Poland should not be taken to mean that the Polish nation would be 
represented in the all-Russian assembly by any delegation of the Warsaw sejm.

I think that such representation in the all-Russian assembly would not 
correspond to the interests of revolutionary development. It would join the 
proletariat and bourgeois elements of the Polish sejm by bonds of mutual 
solidarity and responsibility, in contradiction to the real mutual relations of 
their interests.

In the all-Russian assembly, the proletariat and bourgeoisie of Poland should 
not be represented by one delegation. But this would occur even if a delegation 
were sent from the sejm to an assembly which included representatives of all 
the parties of the sejm proportionally to their numbers. In this case, the 
direct and independent representation of the Polish proletariat in the assembly 
would disappear, and the very creation of real political parties in Poland 
would be made difficult. Then the elections to the Polish sejm, whose main task 
is to define the political relations between Poland and Russia, would not show 
the political and social faces of the leading parties, as elections to an 
all-Russian assembly could do; for the latter type of elections would advance, 
besides the local, partial, historically temporary and specifically national 
questions, the general questions of politics and socialism, which really divide 
contemporary societies. (Here as everywhere I speak of a definite manner of 
solving the nationality question for Poland, not touching those changes which 
may prove themselves indispensable while resolving this question for other 
nations. – Note of the author of the cited article.) [The above article 
appeared in Robotnik, the organ of the PPS, no.75, February 7, 1906.- Note of 
the editorial board of Przeglad Sozial-demokratyczny]``

This article gives a moral sanction on the part of the opportunist wing of 
Russian Social Democracy to the slogan put forth by the PPS in the first period 
of the revolution: that is, to the Warsaw constituent assembly. However, it had 
no practical result. After the dissolution of the PPS, the so-called left wing 
of that party, having publicly rejected the program of rebuilding Poland, found 
itself forced to abandon its partial program of nationalism in the form of the 
slogan of a Warsaw constituent assembly. But the article remains a 
characteristic attempt to give practical effect to the principle of “the right 
of nations to self-determination.”

In the above argument, which we quoted in full in order to be able to examine 
it from all aspects, several points strike the reader. Above all, according to 
the author, on the one hand “a constituent assembly of Poland should decide 
whether Poland should enter the formation of a new Russia and what kind of 
constitution it should have.” On the other, “the Polish proletariat should use 
its strength to insure that its class will make the greatest mark on the 
decisions of that organ of national self-government. “ Here the class will of 
the Polish proletariat is expressly opposed to the passive will of the Polish 
“nation.” The class will of the proletariat can obviously leave “its mark” on 
the decisions of the Warsaw constituent assembly only if it is clearly and 
expressly formulated; in other words, the class party of the Polish 
proletariat, the Socialist Party, must have a well-defined program with respect 
to the national question, which it can introduce in the Warsaw constituent 
assembly a program which corresponds not to the will of “the nation” but only 
to the will and interests of the Polish proletariat. Then, in the constituent 
assembly, in the national question, one will, or “the self-determination of the 
proletariat” will come out against the will or “the self-determination of the 
nation.” For Polish Socialists, the “nation’s right to self-determination” as 
an obligatory principle in fact disappears, and is replaced by a clearly 
defined political program on the national question.

The result is rather strange. The Russian Social Democratic Labor Party leaves 
the solution of the Polish question up to the Polish “nation.” The Polish 
Socialists should not pick it up but try, as hard as they can, to solve this 
question according to the interests and will of the proletariat. However, the 
party of the Polish proletariat is organizationally tied to the all-state 
party, for instance, the Social Democracy of the Kingdom of Poland and 
Lithuania is a part of the Russian Social Democratic Labor Party. Thus, Social 
Democracy of all of Russia, united both in ideas and factually, has two 
different positions. As a whole, it stands for the “nations in its constituent 
parts, it stands for the separate proletariat of each nation. But these 
positions can be quite different and may even be completely opposed to each 
other. The sharpened class antagonism in all of Russia makes it a general rule 
that in the national-political question, as in questions of internal politics, 
the proletarian parties take completely different positions from the bourgeois 
and petit bourgeois parties of the separate nationalities. What position should 
the Labor Party of Russia then take in the case of such a collision?

Let us suppose for the sake of argument, that in the federal constituent 
assembly, two contradictory programs are put forth from Poland: the autonomous 
program of National Democracy and the autonomous program of Polish Social 
Democracy, which are quite at odds with respect to internal tendency as well as 
to political formulation. What will the position of Russian Social Democracy be 
with regard to them? Which of the programs will it recognize as an expression 
of the will and “self-determination” of the Polish “nation”? Polish Social 
Democracy never had any pretensions to be speaking in the name of the “nation.” 
National Democracy comes forth as the expresser of the “national” will. Let us 
also assume for a moment that this party wins a majority at the elections to 
the constituent assembly by taking advantage of the ignorance of the petit 
bourgeois elements as well as certain sections of the proletariat. In this 
case, will the representatives of the all-Russian proletariat, complying with 
the requirements of the formula of their program, come out in favor of the 
proposals of National Democracy and go against their own comrades from Poland? 
Or will they associate themselves with the program of the Polish proletariat, 
leaving the “right of nations” to one side as a phrase which binds them to 
nothing? Or will the Polish Social Democrats be forced, in order to reconcile 
these contradictions in their program, to come out in the Warsaw constituent 
assembly, as well as in their own agitation in Poland, in favor of their own 
autonomous program, but to the federal constituent assembly, as members well 
aware of the discipline of the Social Democratic Party of Russia, for the 
program of National Democracy, that is, against their own program?

Let us take yet another example. Examining the question in a purely abstract 
form, since the author has put the problem on that basis, let us suppose, to 
illustrate the principle, that in the national assembly of the Jewish 
population of Russia for why should the right to create separate constituent 
assemblies be limited to Poland, as the author wants? – the Zionist Party 
somehow wins a majority and demands that the all-Russian constituent assembly 
vote funds for the emigration of the entire Jewish community. On the other 
hand, the class representatives of the Jewish proletariat firmly resist the 
position of the Zionists as a harmful and reactionary utopia. What position 
will Russian Social Democracy take in this conflict?

It will have two choices. The “right of nations to self-determination” might be 
essentially identical with the determination of the national question by the 
proletariat in question that is, with the nationality program of the concerned 
Social Democratic parties. In such a case, however, the formula of the “right 
of nations” in the program of the Russian party is only a mystifying paraphrase 
of the class position. Or, alternatively, the Russian proletariat as such could 
recognize and honor only the will of the national majorities of the 
nationalities under Russian subjugation, even though the proletariat of the 
respective “nations” should come out against this majority with their own class 
program. And in this case, it is a political dualism of a special type; it 
gives dramatic expression to the discord between the “national” and class 
positions: it points up the conflict between the position of the federal 
workers’ party and that of the parties of the particular nationalities which 
make it up.

A special Polish constituent assembly is to be the organ of realizing the right 
of the nation to self-determination. But that right is, in reality, severely 
limited by the author, and in two directions. First, the competence of the 
Warsaw constituent assembly is reduced to the special question of the relation 
of Poland to Russia and to the constitution for Poland. Then, even within this 
domain, the decisions of the “Polish nation” are subordinated to the sanction 
of an all-Russian constituent assembly. The assembly, however – if this 
reservation is to have any meaning at all – can either grant or deny these 
sanctions. Under such conditions the unlimited “right of the nation to 
self-determination” becomes rather problematic. The national partisans of the 
slogan of a separate Warsaw constituent assembly would not at all agree to the 
reduction of their competence to the narrow area of relations between Poland 
and Russia. They wanted to give the assembly the power over all the internal 
and external relations of the social life of Poland. And from the standpoint of 
the “right of nations to self-determination,” they would undoubtedly have right 
and logic on their side. For there seems to be no reason why 
“self-determination” should mean only the solution of the external fate of the 
nation and of its constitution, and not of all social and political matters. 
Besides, the separation of the relation of Poland to Russia and the 
constitution of Poland from the “general problems of politics and socialism” is 
a construction which is artificial to the highest degree. If the “constitution 
of Poland” is to determine – as it evidently must – the electoral law, the law 
of unions and meetings, the law of the press, etc., etc., for Poland, then it 
is not clear what political questions remain for the federal constituent 
assembly to solve with respect to Poland. From this point of view, only one of 
two points of view is possible: either the Warsaw constituent assembly is to be 
the essential organ for the self-determination of the Polish nation, and in 
this case it can be only an organ on the same level as the Petersburg 
constituent assembly; or, the constituent assembly of Warsaw plays only the 
role of a national sejm in a position of dependence on and subordination to the 
federal constituent assembly, and in this case, “the right of the nation to 
self-determination,” dependent on the sanction of the Russian “nation,” reminds 
one of the German concept: “Die Republik mit dem Grossherzog an der Spitze” 
[“The Republic with the Grand Duke at the Head”] .

The author himself helps us to guess how, in his understanding, the “right of 
the nation,” proclaimed in the introduction so charmingly in the form of a 
Warsaw constituent assembly, is finally canceled out by the competence and 
right of sanction of the Petersburg constituent assembly.

In this matter, the Menshevik journalist adopts the view that the Warsaw 
constituent assembly will be the organ of national interests, whereas the 
federal assembly will be the organ of the class and general social interests, 
the terrain of the class struggle between the proletariat and the bourgeoisie. 
Thus, the author shows so much mistrust of the Warsaw organ of the “national 
will” that he opposes the representation of that national sejm in the 
Petersburg constituent assembly, for which he demands direct elections from 
Poland to insure the best representation of the interests of the Polish 
proletariat. The defender of two constituent assemblies feels instinctively 
that even with universal and equal elections to the Warsaw assembly, its very 
individual nature would weaken the position of the Polish proletariat, while 
the combined entry of the Polish proletariat with the proletariat of the entire 
state in a general constituent assembly would strengthen the class position and 
its defense. Hence arises his vacillation between one and the other position 
and his desire to subordinate the organ of the “national” will to the organ of 
the class struggle. This is, then, again an equivocal political position, in 
which the collision between the “national” point of view and the class point of 
view takes the form of the opposition between the Warsaw and the Petersburg 
constituent assemblies. Only one question remains: since the representation in 
a federal constituent assembly is more useful for the defense of the Polish 
proletariat, then why cannot that body resolve the Polish national question, in 
order to insure the preponderance of the will and interests of the Polish 
proletariat? So many hesitations and contradictions show how desirable it would 
be for the “nation” and the working class to develop a common position.

Apart from this, we must add that the entire construction of the Warsaw 
constituent assembly as the organ of national “self-determination” is only a 
house of cards: the dependence or independence of nation-states is determined 
not by the vote of majorities in parliamentary representations, but only by 
socio-economic development, by material class interests, and as regards the 
external political affairs, by armed struggle, war, or insurrection. The Warsaw 
assembly could only really determine the fate of Poland if Poland had first, by 
means of a successful uprising, won factual independence from Russia. In other 
words, the Polish people can realize its “right” to self-determination only 
when it has the actual ability, the necessary force for this, and then it will 
realize it not on the basis of its “rights” but on the basis of its power. The 
present revolution did not call forth an independence movement in Poland; it 
did not show the least tendency to separate Poland from Russia. On the 
contrary, it buried the remains of these tendencies by forcing the national 
party (National Democracy) to renounce the program of the reconstruction of 
Poland, while the other party (the PPS) was smashed to bits and also, midway in 
the struggle, was forced to renounce this program explicitly. Thus, the “right” 
of the Polish nation to self-determination remains – the right to eat off gold 
plates.

The demand for a Warsaw constituent assembly is therefore obviously deprived of 
all political or theoretical importance and represents only a momentary 
tentative improvisation of deteriorated Polish nationalism, like a soap bubble 
which bursts immediately after appearing. This demand is useful only as an 
illustration of the application of “the right of a nation to 
self-determination” in practice. This illustration is a new proof that by 
recognizing the “right of nations to self-determination” in the framework of 
the present regime, Social Democracy is offering the “nations” either the cheap 
blessing to do what they (the “nations”) are in a position to do by virtue of 
their strength, or else an empty phrase with no force at all. On the other 
hand, this position brings Social Democracy into conflict with its true 
calling, the protection of the class interests of the proletariat and the 
revolutionary development of society, which the creators of scientific 
socialism used as the basis of their view on the nationality question.

The preservation of that metaphysical phrase in the program of the Social 
Democratic Party of Russia would be a betrayal of the strictly class position 
which the party has tried to observe in all points of its program. The ninth 
paragraph should be replaced by a concrete formula, however general, which 
would provide a solution of the nationality question in accordance with the 
interests of the proletariat of the particular nationalities. That does not in 
the least mean that the program of the Social Democratic organization of the 
respective nationalities should become, eo ipso, the program of the all-Russian 
party. A fundamental critical appraisal of each of these programs by the whole 
of the workers’ party of the state is necessary, but this appraisal should be 
made from the point of view of the actual social conditions, from the point of 
view of a scientific analysis of the general tendencies of capitalist 
development, as well as the interests of the class struggle of the proletariat. 
This alone can indicate a uniform and consistent position of the party as a 
whole and in its constituent parts.


2. The Nation-State and the Proletariat

The question of nationality cannot be solved merely by presuming that 
socialists must approach it from the point of view of the class interests of 
the proletariat. The influence of theoretical socialism has been felt 
indirectly by the workers’ movement as a whole, to such an extent that at 
present there is not a socialist or workers’ party which does not use at least 
the Marxist terminology, if not the entire Marxist way of thinking. A famous 
example of this is the present Social Revolutionary Party of Russia, in whose 
theory – as far as one can speak of such – there are at least as many elements 
borrowed from the Marxist School as there are elements inherited from the 
Narodniki and the People’s Will. In like manner, all socialist groups of the 
petit bourgeois and nationalistic type in Russia have their own fancies which 
are solely “in the interest of the proletariat and socialism.” The Polish 
Social Democracy, now in decline, had especially distinguished itself in 
comparison with the naive, patriarchal – let us say – national socialism of Mr. 
Limanowski, particularly in that the ”good-hearted” Mr. Limanowski never even 
used the name of Karl Marx, while social patriotism, from the beginning, sought 
to legitimize its program with Marxist terminology as a “class interest of the 
proletariat.”

But it is obvious that the class character of any particular demand is not 
established by merely incorporating it mechanically into the program of a 
socialist party. What this or any other party considers a ”class interest” of 
the proletariat can only be an imputed interest, concocted by subjective 
reasoning. It is very easy, for instance, to state that the workers’ class 
interest demands the establishment of a minimum-wage law. Such a law would 
protect the workers against the pressures of competition, which might come from 
a less developed locality. It would assure them of a certain minimum standard 
of living, etc. Such demands have been presented repeatedly by socialist 
circles; however, the principle has not yet been accepted by the socialist 
parties in general, for the valid reason that the universal regulation of wages 
by means of legislation is but a utopian dream under today’s anarchistic 
conditions of private economy. This is because workers’ wages, like the prices 
of any kind of commodity, are set up in the capitalistic system under the 
operation of “free competition” and the spontaneous movement of capital. 
Therefore, the legal regulation of wages can be achieved only in exceptional, 
clearly defined areas, e.g., in small communities. And since the general 
establishment of a minimum-wage law clashes with the current conditions of 
capitalism, we must admit that it is not a true proletarian interest, but 
rather a fabricated or imputed one, in spite of the fact that it can be 
supported by a completely logical argument.

Likewise, one can, in a purely abstract way, figure out various “class 
interests” for the proletariat, which, however, would have to remain as mere 
clichés in the socialist program. This is especially so, as, the more that 
other social elements attach themselves to the workers’ movement, the stronger 
is the tendency to suggest various sincere but unrealistic demands of these 
foreign elements as class interests of the proletariat. The other social 
elements referred to here include those members of society who have been 
deprived of political shelter by the failure of the bourgeois parties; in this 
category are the bourgeois and petit bourgeois intelligentsia. If the socialist 
parties had no objective criterion by which to establish just what fits the 
class interests of the proletariat, but were only directed by what certain 
people might think would be good or useful for the workers, then socialist 
programs would be a motley collection of subjective, and often completely 
utopian, desires.

Basing itself on historical foundations – on the foundations of the development 
of capitalist society – today’s Social Democracy derives its immediate 
interests (the demands of today’s proletariat) as well as its long-range goals, 
not merely from subjective reasoning about what would be “good” or “useful” for 
the proletariat, but from examining the objective development of society for a 
verification of its actual interests, as well as for material means for their 
realization. It is from this standpoint that the main alternatives for a 
practical solution to the question of nationality should be examined – those 
which are suggested by historical examples as well as those which correspond to 
the slogans popular in socialist circles.

We should first consider the idea of a nation-state. In order to evaluate this 
concept accurately, it is first necessary to search for historical substance in 
the idea, to see what is actually hiding behind the mask.

In his article on the struggles of nationalities and the social-democratic 
program in Austria, published over ten years ago, Kautsky enumerates three 
factors, which, according to him, make up the “roots of the modern national 
idea,” as found in the rise of the modern state in all of Europe. These factors 
are: the desire of the bourgeoisie to assure for itself an internal or domestic 
market for its own commodity production; second, the desire for political 
freedom – democracy; and finally, expansion of the national literature and 
culture to the populace.[1]

In Kautsky’s theory one can see, above all, his basic position, his own view of 
nationality as a historical category. According to his reasoning, the idea of 
the nation is intimately connected with a definite era of modern development. 
The market interests of the bourgeoisie, democratic currents, culture of the 
people – these are typical aspects of a bourgeois society.

Naturally, we are not speaking here of a nationality as a specific ethnic or 
cultural group. Such nationality is, of course, separate and distinct from the 
bourgeois aspect; national peculiarities had already existed for centuries. But 
here we are concerned with national movements as an element of political life, 
with the aspirations of establishing a so-called nation-state; then the 
connection between those movements and the bourgeois era is unquestionable. The 
history of the national unification of Germany is a typical example of this 
connection, as the nucleus around which the later German Reich crystallized was 
the German Zollverein and Zollparlament. Their sponsor, Friedrich List, with 
his trivial theory of “national economy,” can be more justifiably considered 
the real messiah of the national unity of Germany than the idealist Fichte, 
mentioned usually as the first apostle of German national rebirth. This 
“national” movement, which captured the imagination of the German “people and 
princes” during Fichte’s time, and which the pseudo-revolutionary 
Burschenschaften loudly ushered in (in spite of Fichte’s ardent sympathy for 
the Great French Revolution), basically represented only a medieval reaction 
against the seeds of the Revolution, which were brought to Germany by Napoleon, 
and against the elements of the modern bourgeois system. The sultry, romantic 
wind of “national rebirth” finally died out after the victorious return of 
Germany to feudal subdivision and to pre-March reaction. By contrast, the 
gospel of that vulgar agent of German industry, List, in the thirties and 
forties based the “national rebirth” on the elements of bourgeois development, 
on industry and trade, on the theory of the “domestic market.” The material 
basis for this patriotic movement, which in the thirties and forties of the 
nineteenth century aroused such strong political, educational, philosophical, 
and literary currents in Germany, was above all, the need to unify all the 
German territories (which were divided into several dozen feudal statelets and 
were criss-crossed by customs and tax barriers) into one great, integrated, 
capitalistic ”fatherland,” establishing a broad foundation for mechanized 
manufacturing and big industry.

The history of the industrial and commercial unification of Germany is so 
completely intertwined with the fate of Germany’s political unification, that 
the history of the Customs Union [Zollverein], which reflected all the 
political developments and happenings in Germany, passes over, with perfect 
continuity, into the history of the birth of the present German Reich. In 1834, 
the Customs Union was born, grouping seventeen minor states around Prussia; and 
gradually, one after another, the remaining states also joined this Union. 
However, Austria remained altogether separate from the Union, and the 
Schleswig-Holstein War finally decided the matter in favor of Prussia. In 1867, 
the last renewal of the Customs Union became superfluous in the presence of the 
new national union; and the North German Union, after the Franco-Prussian War, 
transferred its customs rights and duties by inheritance to the newly formed 
Reich. In the place of the Zollbundesrat and the Zollparlament there were now 
the Bundesrat and Reichstag. In this example from modern history, Germany 
excellently demonstrates the true economic foundation of modern nation-states.

Although the bourgeois appetite for markets for “its own” commodities is so 
elastic and extensive that it always has the natural tendency to include the 
entire globe, the very essence of the modern bourgeois “national idea” is based 
on the premise that in the eyes of the bourgeoisie of every country, its own 
nation – their “fatherland” – is called and destined by nature to serve it [the 
bourgeoisie] as a field for the sale of products. It is as if this were an 
exclusive patrimony determined by the god Mercury. At least this is how the 
national question appears where the development of capitalism takes place 
“normally,” without abrupt fluctuations, i.e., where production for the 
domestic market exceeds production for export. This is exactly what happened in 
Germany and in Italy.

However, it would be wrong to take Kautsky’s formulation literally; we cannot 
assume that the material foundation of modern national movements is only the 
vaguely understood appetite of the industrial bourgeoisie for a “native” market 
for its commodities. Moreover, a capitalistic bourgeoisie needs many other 
conditions for its proper development: a strong military, as a guarantee of the 
inviolability of this “fatherland,” as well as a tool to clear a path for 
itself in the world market; furthermore, it needs a suitable customs policy, 
suitable forms of administration in regard to communications, jurisdiction, 
school systems, and financial policy. In a word, capitalism demands for its 
proper development not only markets, but also the whole apparatus of a modern 
capitalistic state. The bourgeoisie needs for its normal existence not only 
strictly economic conditions for production, but also, in equal measure, 
political conditions for its class rule.

From all this it follows that the specific form of national aspirations, the 
true class interest of the bourgeoisie, is state independence. The nation-state 
is also simultaneously that indispensable historical form in which the 
bourgeoisie passes over from the national defensive to an offensive position, 
from protection and concentration of its own nationality to political conquest 
and domination over other nationalities. Without exception, all of today’s 
”nation-states” fit this description, annexing neighbors or colonies, and 
completely oppressing the conquered nationalities.

This phenomenon becomes understandable only when one takes into consideration 
the fact that, according to the bourgeois way of thinking, it is possible to 
have a national movement for unification and defense of one’s own nationality, 
and at the same time, to oppress another nationality (which is, of course, 
contrary to the very ideology of the “nation-state”). The German bourgeoisie in 
1848 presents a striking example of this phenomenon in its attitude toward the 
Polish question. As is known, during the revolution [of 1848], when German 
national patriotism was most evident, Karl Marx and his circle advocated Polish 
independence; however, he proved to be but a prophet crying in the wilderness. 
The German “nation-state,” from its first stages of development, did not 
conform at all with the accepted understanding of a nation-state in regard to 
nationalities. The borders of the Reich actually split the German nation, 
dividing it between Austria and the new “national” state of Germany, and 
putting together the Germans and the racially distinct peoples in territories 
annexed from Poland, Denmark, and France.

An even more striking example is Hungary, whose struggle for national 
independence was so much admired in its time. Even our own Polish revolutionary 
leaders – Bem, Wysocki, and Dembicki – had “tilted their lances” to assist 
them. But when examined from the viewpoint of nationality, this struggle was 
nothing more than an attempt to assure class rule of the Magyar minority over a 
country of nine nationalities, with the Magyars oppressing the other 
nationalities. The national “independence” of the Hungarians was bought by 
severing the Carpathian Slovaks from their brothers, the Sudeten Czechs; 
separating the Germans of Bratislava, Temesvar, and Transylvania from the 
Austrian Germans; and the Croats and Dalmatian Serbs from Croatia and the 
Slovenians.[2]

The aspirations of the Czechs are characterized by the same dichotomy. These 
aspirations arouse distrust among the Germans because, among other things, they 
are directed clearly at separating the German population of Sudetenland from 
the Germans of the Alpine countries. The primary objective of the Czechs was to 
force the Germans, as minority group under the crown of Wenceslaus (Vaclav), 
into complete dependence on the Czechs in matters of culture and 
administration. As if this were not enough, the division of the Czech lands 
created a nationality division for the Czechs themselves by uniting five and 
one-third million Czechs with three million Germans and nearly two hundred 
thousand Poles. Still separated from this “national” Czech state were two 
million Carpathian Slovaks, a group closely related to the Czechs and left at 
the mercy of the Magyars. Therefore, these Slovaks are also loudly advocating 
their cause, which has been completely neglected by the Czech nationalists.[3]

Finally, and we do not have to go far for an example, Polish bourgeois 
nationalism is directed as much against the Ruthenians as against the 
Lithuanians. The very nationality which had to endure the bitter policy of 
extermination by the partitioning powers – Prussia and Russia – now refuses the 
right of independent existence to other nationalities. According to the 
Stanczyk[4] policy in Galicia, the Poles oppressed the Ruthenians, whose 
struggle for nationality runs like a red thread through the political history 
of the development of Galicia in the second half of the last century. The 
recent movement for national rebirth of the Lithuanians was met with similar 
hostility in Polish nationalistic circles.[5]

This strange double-edged character of bourgeois patriotism, which is 
essentially based on the conflicting interests of various nationalities rather 
than on harmony becomes understandable only when one takes into consideration 
the fact that the historical basis of the modern national movements of the 
bourgeoisie is nothing more than its aspirations to class rule, and a specific 
social form in whose aspirations this expression is found: the modern 
capitalistic state – ”national,” in the sense of the dominance of the 
bourgeoisie of a certain nationality over the entire mixed population of the 
state. A democratic organization, together with general education of the people 
– these distinctly ideological elements of the nation mentioned by Kautsky – 
are merely details of a modern bourgeois state, easily attainable by the 
bourgeoisie within the framework and spirit of the state. Therefore, 
independence and state unification constitute the real axis around which the 
national movements of the bourgeoisie rotate.[6]

This matter appears quite different from the point of view of the interests of 
the proletariat. The contemporary proletariat, as a social class, is the 
offspring of the capitalist economy and the bourgeois state. The capitalist 
society and bourgeois state – taking them not as an abstract idea, but in 
tangible form as history has created them in each country – were already, from 
the very beginning, a frame of activity for the proletariat. A bourgeois state 
– national or not national – is just that foundation, together with 
capitalistic production as the ruling form of social economy, on which the 
working class grows and thrives. In this respect, there is a basic historical 
difference between the bourgeoisie and the proletariat. The bourgeoisie 
develops and is carried in the womb of the feudal class system. Aspiring to 
assure triumph for capitalism as the form of production, and for itself as the 
ruling class, the bourgeoisie creates the modern state on the ruins of the 
feudal system. Within the bounds of the development of capitalism and the rule 
of the bourgeoisie, the proletariat is next to make itself heard politically – 
still as part of the bourgeois state. But the state was already from the 
beginning its natural womb, just as the shell of an egg is for the chicken. 
Therefore, historically speaking, the idea that the modern proletariat could do 
nothing as a separate and conscious class without first creating a new 
nation-state, is the same as saying that the bourgeoisie in any country should 
first of all establish a feudal system, if by some chance it did not come about 
normally by itself, or had taken on particular forms, as for instance in 
Russia. The historical mission of the bourgeoisie is the creation of a modern 
“national” state; but the historical task of the proletariat is the abolition 
of this state as a political form of capitalism, in which they themselves, as a 
conscious class, come into existence to establish the socialist system. The 
proletariat, as part of the whole society, can take part in national movements 
of the bourgeoisie, where the bourgeois development demands the creation of a 
“nation-state,” as was the case, for example, in Germany. But then it follows 
the lead of the bourgeoisie, and does not act as an independent class with a 
separate political program. The national program of the German socialists in 
the forties advanced two ideas, directly opposing the national program of the 
bourgeoisie: unification with borders which would be based strictly on 
divisions of nationalities, and a republican form of government.

The interests of the proletariat on the nationality question are just the 
opposite of those of the bourgeoisie. The concern about guaranteeing an 
internal market for the industrialists of the “fatherland,” and of acquiring 
new markets by means of conquest, by colonial or military policies-all these, 
which are the intentions of the bourgeoisie in creating a “national” state, 
cannot be the aims of a conscious proletariat.

The proletariat, as a legitimate child of capitalistic development, takes this 
development into account as a necessary historical background of its own growth 
and political maturation. Social Democracy itself reflects only the 
evolutionary side of capitalist development, whereas the ruling bourgeoisie 
looks after this development on behalf of reaction. Social Democracy nowhere 
considers its task to be the active support of industry or trade; rather it 
struggles against military, colonial, and customs protection, just as it 
combats the whole basic apparatus of the existing class state—its 
administration, legislature, school systems, etc.[7]

The national policy of the proletariat, therefore, basically clashes with the 
bourgeois policy to the extent that in its essence it is only defensive, never 
offensive; it depends on the harmony of interests of all nationalities, not on 
conquest and subjugation of one by another. The conscious proletariat of every 
country needs for its proper development peaceful existence and cultural 
development of its own nationality, but by no means does it need the dominance 
of its nationality over others. Therefore, considering the matter from this 
point of view, the “nation”-state, as an apparatus of the domination and 
conquest of foreign nationalities, while it is indispensable for the 
bourgeoisie, has no meaning for the class interests of the proletariat.

Therefore, of these “three roots of the modern national idea,” which Kautsky 
enumerated, for the proletariat as a class only the last two are important: 
democratic organization, and education of the populace. Vital for the working 
class as conditions of its political and spiritual maturity, are the freedom of 
using its own native language, and the unchecked and unwarped development of 
national culture (learning, literature, the arts) and normal education of the 
masses, unimpaired by the pressures of the nationalists – so far as these can 
be “normal” in the bourgeois system. It is indispensable for the working class 
to have the same equal national rights as other nationalities in the state 
enjoy.[8] Political discrimination against a particular nationality is the 
strongest tool in the hands of the bourgeoisie, which is eager to mask class 
conflicts and mystify its own proletariat.

The advocates Polish nationalists1 of the “very best” social condition state at 
this point that, whatever the situation. the surest guarantee of cultural 
development and of the rights of every nationality is precisely the 
independence of the state, their own nation-state, and that therefore the 
nation-state is finally also an indispensable class interest of the 
proletariat. We are hardly concerned with determining what is or would be “the 
best” for the proletariat. Such observations have no practical value. Moreover, 
once the subject of “what would be the best” from the standpoint of the 
proletariat is approached in an abstract way, we would have to conclude that 
“the best” cure for national pressure, as well as for all types of disorders of 
a social nature, is undoubtedly the socialist system. A utopian argument must 
always lead to a utopian solution, if only by leaping to the “state of the 
future,” whereas actually the problem should be solved within the framework of 
existing bourgeois reality.

Moreover, from the point of view of methods, the above reasoning contains still 
another historical misunderstanding. The argument that an independent 
nation-state is, after all “the best” guarantee of national existence and 
development involves operating with a conception of a nation-state as a 
completely abstract thing. The nation-state as seen only from a national point 
of view, only as a pledge and embodiment of freedom and independence, is simply 
a remnant of the decaying ideology of the petite bourgeoisie of Germany, Italy, 
Hungary – all of Central Europe in the first half of the nineteenth century. It 
is a phrase from the treasury of disintegrated bourgeois liberalism. Since 
then, the development of the bourgeoisie has proved unequivocally that a modern 
nation-state is more real and tangible than the vague idea of “freedom” or 
national “independence”; that it is indeed a definite historical reality, 
neither very alluring nor very pure. The substance and essence of the modern 
state comprise not freedom and independence of the “nation,” but only the class 
dominance of the bourgeoisie, protectionist policy, indirect taxation, 
militarism, war, and conquest. The bourgeoisie used to use the obvious 
technique of trying to cover up this brutal historical truth with a light 
ideological gauze, by offering the purely negative happiness of “independence 
and national freedom.” For a time this technique paid off. But today it is only 
necessary to recall the circumstances under which this contention was advanced, 
to understand that it is simply opposed to what can and should be the class 
position of the proletariat.

In this case, as in many others, anarchism, the supposed antagonist of 
bourgeois liberalism, proved to be its worthy child. Anarchism, with 
characteristic “revolutionary” seriousness, accepted at face value the 
phraseology of the liberal ideology and, like the latter, showed only contempt 
for the historical and social content of the nation-state, which it set down as 
nothing else than an embodiment of “freedom,” of the “will of the people,” and 
of similar empty words. Bakunin, for example, wrote in 1849 about the national 
movements of Central Europe:

The first sign of life in the Revolution [of 1848] was the cry of hatred toward 
the old oppression, a cry of sympathy and love for all oppressed nationalities 
... “Away with the oppressors!” reverberated as if from one breast; “Salvation 
for the oppressed Poles, Italians, and all! No more wars of conquest; just one 
more war should be carried through to its end – a glorious revolutionary 
struggle with the purpose of eventual liberation for all peoples! Down with the 
artificial boundaries which have been forcibly erected by despotic congresses 
according to so-called historical, geographical, strategic necessities! There 
should no longer be any other barriers between the nations but those 
corresponding to nature, to justice, and those drawn in a democratic sense 
which the sovereign will of the people themselves traces on the basis of their 
national characteristics!” Such was the cry which rang out among all the 
peoples.[9]

To these dithyrambics on the subject of national independence and “the will of 
the people” Marx answered:

``Here there is no mention of reality, or insofar as it is considered at all, 
it is represented as something falsely, artificially established by “despots” 
and “diplomats.” Against this wicked reality is pitted the alleged will of the 
people with its categorical imperative of an absolute demand for “freedom,” 
“justice,” and “humanity.” ... They can demand “freedom” of this or that a 
thousand times; if the thing is impossible, it will not take place, and in 
spite of everything it will remain an “empty dream.” ... Just a word about the 
“universal brotherhood of peoples” and the establishment of boundaries which 
are traced by “the sovereign will of the people themselves on the basis of 
their national characteristics.” The United States and Mexico are two 
republics; in both of them the people are sovereign. Then how did it happen 
that between these republics, which, according to the moralistic theory should 
be “brotherly” and “federated,” a war broke out over Texas: that the “sovereign 
will” of the American people, supported by the bravery of American volunteers, 
moved the American borders (established by nature itself) a few hundred miles 
further south, claiming this action to be from “geographic, commercial, and 
strategic necessities”?[10]``

Marx’s answer to this ironic question is clear. “Nation-states,” even in the 
form of republics, are not products or expressions of the “will of the people,” 
as the liberal phraseology goes and the anarchist repeats. “Nation-states” are 
today the very same tools and forms of class rule of the bourgeoisie as the 
earlier, non-national states, and like them they are bent on conquest. The 
nation-states have the same tendencies toward conquest, war, and oppression – 
in other words, the tendencies to become “not-national.” Therefore, among the 
“national” states there develop constant scuffles and conflicts of interests, 
and even if today, by some miracle, all states should be transformed to 
“national,” then the next day they would already present the same common 
picture of war, conquest, and oppression. The example given by Marx is typical 
in this regard. Why and over what did the war between the United States and 
Mexico arise?[11] California was indispensable for the capitalistic development 
of the United States, first, as a gold treasury in the literal sense, second, 
as a gateway to the Pacific Ocean. Only by the acquisition of this land could 
the capitalism of the United States extend from ocean to ocean, entrenching 
itself and opening for itself an outlet to the West as well as to the East. For 
the backward Mexicans, California was just a simple territorial possession. The 
interests of the bourgeoisie were decisive. The “nation-state,” worshiped and 
idealized by the anarchists as the “will of the people,” served as an efficient 
tool of conquest in the interests of capitalism.

But even more striking examples of this kind are produced by the history of 
modern South America. We have already mentioned the double-edged character of 
the “national” liberation of the Spanish and Portuguese colonies at the dawn of 
the nineteenth century. Here their further political history, already as 
independent “nation-states,” interests us as a colorful illustration of 
anarchistic phrases of “national freedom” and the “will of the people.”

Brazil gained her freedom from Portugal after a hard struggle in 1825. In that 
same year a war broke out between Brazil and Argentina (which had just been 
liberated from under the scepter of Spain) over the province of Banda Oriental. 
Both of these new “nation”-states wanted to scoop up this province, which 
finally won independence itself as the Republic of Uruguay, but thanks only to 
the armed intervention of European states which had colonial interests in South 
America. France and other European countries issued an ultimatum to Argentina, 
which obstinately refused to recognize the independence of Uruguay and 
Paraguay. As a consequence, in 1845 another war broke out with the 
participation of Paraguay, Uruguay, and Brazil. In 1850, again a war was 
unleashed between Brazil and Argentina, in which Brazil, with the help of 
Paraguay and Uruguay, first defeated Argentina and then actually conquered 
Uruguay. In 1864, she formally forced this “independent” Uruguay to submission 
by armed action. Paraguay rose up against this action and declared war on 
Brazil, which was joined by Argentina and Uruguay. This war, lasting from 1865 
to 1870, finally assured Brazil, where there ruled not so much ”the will of the 
people” as the will and interests of the coffee plantation owners, the position 
of a dominant Great Power in South America. History does not touch upon the 
rule of the whites in Brazil (who make up less than one-third of the 
population) over the Negroes and the mixed population, Only after internal 
struggles was the emancipation of the slaves announced in 1871, but with 
compensation to be paid to their owners from state funds. Parliament, however, 
being the instrument of the plantation owners, did not vote these funds and 
slavery was still practiced. In 1886 the freeing of slaves over seventy years 
of age was declared; the rest were supposed to wait another seventeen years for 
freedom. But in 1888 the dynastic party, struggling to hold the throne, forced 
through parliament the general abolition of slavery without compensation, and 
this was decisive for the future of the republican movement. The plantation 
owners stood behind the republican banner en masse, and in the military coup of 
1889, Brazil was declared a republic.[12]

This is how idyllic the internal conditions and events in South America look 
since the time of the rising of the ”nation-states” and the establishment of 
the “will of the people.” A beautiful complement to this picture is offered by 
the United States of Australia. Hardly had these states emerged from the 
position of English colonies and gained their freedom – the republican form of 
government or the federal system, the very ideal of Bakuninist phraseology – 
when they began an offensive policy in regard to New Hebrides, next door to New 
Guinea, and in skillful imitation of the United States of America, declared 
their own particular national doctrine: that “Australia should belong to the 
Australians.” At the same time, the growing navy of the Australian Union is an 
emphatic commentary on this doctrine.

If, on the one hand, political independence, i.e., the nation-state, is 
necessary for capitalism and the class interest of the bourgeoisie just because 
a nation-state is a tool of domination (or control) and conquest, on the other 
hand, the working class is interested in the cultural and democratic content of 
nationalism, which is to say that the workers are interested in such political 
systems as assure a free development of culture and democracy in national life 
by means of defense, not conquest, and in the spirit of solidarity and 
cooperation of various nationalities which belong historically in the same 
bourgeois state. Equality before the law for nationalities and political 
organizations, and the assurance of national cultural development – such are 
the general forms of the program of the proletariat, a natural program 
resulting from its class position, in contrast to the nationalism of the 
bourgeoisie.
 
II

The classical confirmation and proof of these general principles is the most 
famous nationality problem within the framework of the Russian state – the 
Polish question.

In Poland, the national movement, right from the beginning, took on a 
completely different character from that of Western Europe. Those who search 
for a historical analogy for the Polish national idea in the history of today’s 
Germany and Italy, betray their own misunderstanding of the true historical 
substance of the national movements in Germany and Italy as well as in Poland. 
With us Poles the national idea was a class idea of the nobility, never of the 
bourgeoisie. The material base of Polish national aspirations was determined 
not as in Central Europe in the nineteenth century, by modern capitalist 
development, but, on the contrary, by the nobility’s idea of its social 
standing, rooted in the natural-feudal economy.

The national movements of Poland vanished together with these feudal relations; 
whereas the bourgeoisie, as the historical spokesman of capitalistic 
development, was with us, from the very beginning, a clearly anti-national 
factor. This was due not only to the specific origin of the nineteenth-century 
bourgeoisie, alien and heterogeneous, a product of colonization, an alien body 
transplanted into the Polish soil. Also decisive was the fact that Polish 
industry from its beginning, already in the 1820s and 1830s, was an export 
industry, even before it managed to control or even to create a domestic market 
within Poland. We will not quote here all the statistics of the industrial 
development of our country, but rather refer the reader to our treatise, Die 
Industrielle Entwicklung Polens [The Industrial Development of Poland] 
(published also in Russian), as well as to the work Kwestja polska a ruch 
socjalistyczny [The Polish Question and the Socialist Movement], Cracow 1905. 
Here we shall recall only the most important outlines of this development.

Export to Russia, especially of the basic branches of capitalist industry, 
i.e., the production of textiles, became the basis for the existence and 
development of Polish capitalism from its beginnings, and furthermore, also the 
basis of the Polish bourgeoisie. As a consequence, our bourgeoisie from the 
first showed political leanings, not toward the west, to the national 
unification of Galicia with the Crown, but toward the east: toward Russia. 
These leanings, after the withdrawal of the customs barrier between the Empire 
and the Polish Kingdom, increased with the development of big industry. 
However, the real rule of the bourgeois class in society began after the 
abortive January Insurrection [1863]. The new rule was inaugurated by the 
“program of organic work”[13] which meant a renunciation of national 
independence. Moreover, the class rule of the bourgeoisie in Poland not only 
did not demand the creation of a united nation-state, as in Germany and Italy, 
but, on the contrary, it arose on the foundations of the conquest and division 
of Poland. The idea of unification and national independence did not draw its 
vital juices from capitalism; on the contrary, as capitalism developed, this 
idea became historically outlived. And that very circumstance, that particular 
historical relationship of the capitalistic bourgeoisie to the national idea in 
our country, became decisive also for the fate of that idea and defined its 
social character. In Germany, in Italy, as one half-century before in South 
America, the “national rebirth” carried with it all the traits of a 
revolutionary, progressive spirit. Capitalistic development embraced this 
national idea, and historically speaking, elevated it with the political ideals 
of the revolutionary bourgeoisie: democracy and liberalism. Exactly in this 
historical sense, the national idea was only a detail of the general class 
program of the bourgeoisie – of the modern bourgeois state. In Poland there 
arose an opposition between the national idea and the bourgeois development, 
which gave the former not only a utopian but also a reactionary character. This 
opposition is reflected in the three phases of the history of the idea of 
Polish national independence.

The first is the failure of the armed struggle of the Polish nobility. Not even 
the most ardent advocates of the theory of “violence and force” in the 
philosophy of history will explain the defeat of Polish insurrectionist 
movements as mere superiority of the Russian bayonets. Whoever knows anything 
about the modern economic and social history of Poland knows that the defeat of 
the military insurectionists was prepared by the same capitalistic market 
interest which elsewhere, in the words of Kautsky, comprised one of the main 
elements of the modern national idea. The endeavors of the bourgeoisie to 
secure for themselves conditions of large-scale capitalistic production did not 
involve the demand for a nation-state; on the contrary, the bourgeoisie sought 
to exploit the annexation, and to paralyze the national movement of the 
nobility. Thus [in Poland], the idea of a nation-state, an idea essentially 
bourgeois, was sabotaged by the bourgeoisie, and met defeat in the January 
[1863] uprising.

The second phase was the inheritance of the Polish national idea by the petite 
bourgeoisie. In this incarnation, the national idea changed from an armed 
struggle to a policy of neutrality, and at the same time, began to show its 
weakness. After vegetating for twenty years away from society – in the eighties 
and nineties petit bourgeois nationalism lingered in emigration in the form of 
a half-dozen “all-Polish patriots” – finally, with the opening of the present 
revolutionary era, it has emerged as an active party on the political scene.

The National Democracy proclaimed its entrance into a politically active phase 
with a public renunciation of the program of national independence as an 
unrealizable utopia, and with writing into its program instead the double 
slogan of autonomy of the country and counter-revolution. Now, after throwing 
off the ballast of the traditional national program, “National Democracy” 
quickly becomes the true political force in the society. Having failed in its 
second petit bourgeois form, the program of the nation-state is replaced by a 
program which is practical and realizable on the basis of a bourgeois Poland – 
a program of autonomy.

Finally, the third and last phase in the history of the Polish national idea is 
its attempt to join the class movement of the proletariat. The twenty-year, 
social-patriotic experiment of the PPS was the only case in the history of the 
international workers’ movement where the slogan of the nation-state was made 
part of a socialist program. And this singular experiment ended after twenty 
years in exactly the same kind of crisis and in the same manner as the petit 
bourgeois experiment. At the time of the outbreak of the Workers’ Revolution 
[1905] in Russia, the PPS, so as to secure for itself a part in active politics 
and in the life of the society, publicly renounced the program of rebuilding 
Poland. The National Democracy renounced this program so as to take an active 
part in the middle-class counter-revolution; the PPS did so to exert pressure 
for the proletarian revolution.

The crisis, decline, and fall of the PPS, brought on by this renunciation, 
constituted the third and last bankruptcy of the idea of the Polish 
nation-state – this time wearing the mantle of the proletariat. The current 
revolution, that mightiest social upheaval of modern times, which is calling 
all embryos of life to growth and maturity, and simultaneously tearing up the 
entire foundation of society with a giant plow, rejected the last trace of the 
idea of the Polish nation-state, as if it were an empty shell from which 
historical development had removed all content, and which could only roll about 
among the rubble of social traditions during the troubles of a period of 
reaction.

The historical career of Polish nationalism, however, has not yet come to an 
end. Indeed, it has ended its life as the idea of the nation-state, but it has 
simultaneously transformed itself from a utopian specter to a realistic factor 
of social life. The Polish bourgeois-capitalistic development fettered Poland 
to Russia and condemned the idea of national independence to utopianism and to 
defeat. But the other side of this bourgeois process is the revolutionary 
development of Polish society. All the manifestations and factors of social 
progress in Poland, above all its principal factor, the Polish position 
proletariat and its part in the general revolution in the Tsarist Empire, have 
grown out of the foundations of this same bourgeois-capitalistic development. 
The social progress and development of Poland are in this way united with the 
capitalistic process by unbreakable historical ties, which united Poland and 
Russia, and which buried the Polish national idea. Consequently, all separatist 
aspirations directed at raising an artificial barrier between Poland and 
Russia, are by nature directed against the interests of social progress and 
revolutionary development; or in other words, they are manifestations of 
reaction. But at the same time, the national idea, after the final failure of 
the program of the nation-state and national independence, was reduced to a 
general and undefined idea of national separation, and, as such, Polish 
nationalism became a form of social reaction blessed by tradition. The national 
idea became a collective ideological shield for the reactionary aspirations of 
the whole camp of bourgeois classes, nobility, middle class, and petite 
bourgeoisie. Historical dialectics also proved to be far more imaginative, 
supple, and inclined to variety than the minds of the politicians, caught in 
the grip of stereotypes, and speculating in the abstract wilderness of the 
“rights of nations.” So many Russian, German, and other revolutionaries were, 
and still are, inclined to regard “national tradition” as a historic vessel, 
destined by nature for all times, to absorb and carry all sorts of 
revolutionary currents, as a sea conch, which, according to legend, when 
carried ashore and lifeless, will always repeat the distant roar of the sea 
waves when placed close to the ear. This “national tradition,” in these 
concrete historical and social conditions which created today’s Poland, becomes 
just the opposite: a vessel for all types of reaction, a natural shield for 
counter-revolution. Under the slogan of “national tradition” there took place 
the elections of the National Democracy to the first Duma, protected by the 
Cossacks from the criticisms and protests of the Polish proletariat. In the 
name of the “national idea” the National Democrats used bullets to chase away 
the Social Democratic workers from the pre-election meetings, and even killed 
several dozen workers in Warsaw, Lodz, and Pabianice.[14] Under the national 
slogan, workers’ “national unions” were organized by the National Democracy for 
counteraction against the economic struggle and the revolutionary action of the 
proletariat. Under the national slogan, National Democratic railroad workers 
broke the railroad strike, which had been started in December 1905 in Poland, 
forcing the striking workers to return to work at gun point. Under the national 
slogan. the National Democracy began a crusade against the general strike and 
other forms of strikes, claiming they were ruining the “country’s industry and 
the national wealth.” Under the national slogan, the Polish Circle in the Duma 
renounced participation in the Vyborg Manifesto deliberations, and in the 
declaration of the Vyborg Manifesto itself, after the dispersion of the Duma.

Under the national slogan, the National Democracy organized so-called “Polish 
Falcons,”[15] or, rather, armed fighting squads destined for murdering 
socialists, making strikes impossible, and so on. Mr. Dmowski, the leader of 
the National Democracy, declared in its official organ that “socialists are 
outsiders” and are thus “foreign enemies,” thereby justifying in advance the 
“national” murders of the socialists. And finally, in the name of the national 
idea, the future of the nation, and national defense, the Polish bourgeoisie, 
with the National Democracy at the head, publicly stood behind the banner of 
“neo-pan-Slavism,” in the ranks of the hirelings of absolutism and the Russian 
“national idea,” “with no reservations.” The last vestige of the political 
“national” program – Poland’s autonomy – was thus given up on the altar of 
counter-revolution. Mistreated by history, the Polish national idea moved 
through all stages of decline and fall. Having started its political career as 
a romantic, noble insurgent, glorified by international revolution, it now ends 
as a national hooligan – a volunteer of the Black Hundreds of Russian 
absolutism and imperialism.


3. Federation, Centralization, and Particularism

We must turn next to another proposed form of the solution of the nationality 
question, i.e., federation. Federalism has long been the favorite idea of 
revolutionaries of anarchic hue. During the 1848 revolution Bakunin wrote in 
his manifesto: ”The revolution proclaimed by its own power the dissolution of 
despotic states, the dissolution of the Prussian state ... Austria ... Turkey 
... the dissolution of the last stronghold of the despots, the Russian state 
... and as a final goal – a universal federation of European Republics.” From 
then on, federation has remained an ideal settlement of any nationality 
difficulties in the programs of socialist parties of a more or less utopian, 
petit bourgeois character; that is, parties which do not, like Social 
Democracy, take a historical approach but which traffic in subjective ”ideals.” 
Such, for example, is the party of Social Revolutionaries in Russia. Such was 
the PPS in its transitional phase, when it had ceased to demand the creation of 
a national state and was on the way to abandoning any philosophical approach. 
Such, finally, are a number of socialist groups in the Russian Empire, with 
which we will become acquainted more closely at the end of the present chapter.

If we ask why the slogan of federation enjoys such wide popularity among all 
revolutionaries of anarchistic coloring, the answer is not difficult to find: 
“Federation” combines ‑ at least in the revolutionary imagination of these 
socialists – “independence” and ”equality” of nations with “fraternity.” 
Consequently, there is already a certain concession from the standpoint of the 
law of nations and the nation-state in favor of hard reality, it is a sui 
generis, ideological, taking into account the circumstance, which cannot be 
overlooked that nations cannot live in the vacuum of their “rights” as separate 
and perfectly self-sufficient ”nation-states,” but that there exist between 
them some links. Historically developed connections between various 
nationalities, the material development which welded whole areas, irrespective 
of national differences, the centralization of bourgeois development – all this 
is reflected in the heads of those revolutionary improvisers; in place of 
”brute force” they place “voluntarism” in relations between nations. And since 
republicanism is self-evident in this because the very same “will of the 
people” which restores independence and equality to all nations obviously has 
so much good taste as to throw simultaneously with contempt to the dump of 
history all remnants of monarchism, consequently the existing bourgeois world 
is transformed at one stroke into a voluntary union of independent republics, 
i.e., federation. Here we have a sample of the same “revolutionary” historical 
caricature of reality by means of which the appetite of Tsarist Russia for the 
southern Slays was transformed, in Bakunin’s phraseology, into the pan-Slavic 
ideal of anarchism, “a federation of Slavic Peoples.” On a smaller scale, an 
application of this method of “revolutionary” alterations of reality was the 
program of the PPS adopted at its Eighth Congress in 1906: a republican 
federation of Poland with Russia. As long as the social-patriotic standpoint – 
in the pre-revolutionary period – was maintained in all its purity and 
consistency, the PPS recognized only the program of nation-states, and rejected 
with contempt and hatred the idea of federation offered, for instance, by the 
Russian Social Revolutionaries. When the outbreak of revolution all at once 
demolished its presuppositions, and the PPS saw itself forced to follow the 
road of concessions in favor of reality which could no longer be denied, in 
view of the obvious fact that Poland and Russia form one social entity, a 
manifestation of which was precisely the common revolution, the program of 
federation of Poland with Russia, previously held in contempt, became the form 
of that concession. At the same time, the PPS, as is usual with 
”revolutionaries” of this type, did not notice the following fact: when Social 
Democracy took for the historical basis of its program and tactics the joint 
capitalistic development of Poland and Russia, it merely stated an objective, 
historical fact, not depending on the will of the socialists. From this fact, 
the revolutionary conclusion should have been drawn in the form of a united 
class struggle of the Polish and Russian proletariat. The PPS, however, putting 
forward the program of federation of Poland with Russia, went much further: in 
place of the passive recognition of historical fate, it itself actively 
proposed a union of Poland with Russia and assumed responsibility for the 
union, and in lieu of the objective historical development, it placed the 
subjective consent of socialists in ”revolutionary” form.

But federalism as a form of political organization has, like the “nation-state” 
itself, its definite historical content, quite different from, and independent 
of, the subjective ideology attached to that form. Therefore, the idea of 
federation can be evaluated from the class standpoint of the proletariat only 
when we examine the fate and role of that idea in modern socialist development.
 
II

An outstanding tendency of capitalistic development in all countries is 
indisputably an internal, economic, and capitalist centralization, i.e., an 
endeavor to concentrate and weld into one entity the state territory from the 
economic, legislative, administrative, judicial, military, etc. viewpoints. In 
the Middle Ages, when feudalism prevailed, the link between the parts and 
regions of one and the same state was extremely loose. Thus, each major city 
with its environs, itself produced the majority of objects of daily use to 
satisfy its needs; it also had its own legislation, its own government, its 
army; the bigger and wealthier cities in the West often waged wars on their own 
and concluded treaties with foreign powers. In the same way, bigger communities 
lived their own closed and isolated life, and each area of land of a feudal 
lord or even each area of knightly estates constituted in itself a small, 
almost independent state. The conditions of the time were characterized by a 
diminution and loosening of all state norms. Each town, each village, each 
region had different laws, different taxes: one and the same state was filled 
with legal and customs barriers separating one fragment of a state from 
another. This decentralization was a specific feature of the natural economy 
and the nascent artisan production of the time.

Within the framework of the pulverization of public life, connected with the 
natural economy, and of the weak cohesion between the parts of the state 
organism, territories and whole countries passed incessantly from hand to hand 
in Central and Western Europe throughout the Middle Ages. We note also the 
patching together of states by way of purchase, exchange, pawnings, 
inheritance, and marriage; the classical example is the Hapsburg monarchy.

The revolution in production and trade relations at the close of the Middle 
Ages, the increase of goods production and moneyed economy, together with the 
development of international trade and the simultaneous revolution in the 
military system, the decline of knighthood and the rise of standing armies, all 
these were factors that, in political relations, brought about the increase of 
monarchical power and the rise of absolutism. The main tendency of absolutism 
was the creation of a centralized state apparatus. The sixteenth and 
seventeenth centuries are a period of incessant struggle of the centralist 
tendency of absolutism against the remnants of feudalist particularism. 
Absolutism developed in two directions: absorbing the functions and attributes 
of the diets and provincial assemblies as well as of the self-governing munici 
palities, and standardizing administration in the whole area of the state by 
creating new central authorities in the administration and the judiciary, as 
well as a civil, penal, and commercial code. In the seventeenth century, 
centralism triumphed fully in Europe in the form of so-called “enlightened 
despotism,” which soon passed into unenlightened, police-bureaucratic despotism.

As a result of the historical circumstance that absolutism was the first and 
principal promoter of modern state centralism, a superficial tendency developed 
to identify centralism in general with absolutism, i.e., with reaction. In 
reality, absolutism, insofar as, at the close of the Middle Ages, it combated 
feudal dispersion and particularism, was undoubtedly a manifestation of 
historical progress. This was perfectly well understood by Staszic, who pointed 
out that the [Polish] gentry commonwealth could not survive “in the midst of 
autocracies.” On the other hand, absolutism itself played only the role of a 
“stirrup drink” [parting good wishes] with regard to the modern bourgeois 
society for which, politically and socially, it paved the way by toppling 
feudalism and founding a modern, uniform, great state on its ruins. Indeed, 
independent of absolutism, and after its historical demise, bourgeois society 
continued to carry through with undiminished force and consistency the 
centralist tendency. The present centralism of France as a political area is 
the work of the Great Revolution. The very name, “Great Revolution,” exerted, 
everywhere its influence reached in Europe, a centralizing influence. Such a 
product of the Revolution’s centralism was the “République Helvétique,” in 
which, in 1798, suddenly the previously loosely confederated Swiss cantons were 
compressed. The first spontaneous action of the March [1848] revolution in 
Germany was the destruction by the popular masses of the so-called customs 
houses [Mauthäuser], the symbols of medieval particularism.

Capitalism, with its large-scale machine production, whose vital principle is 
concentration, swept away and continues to sweep away completely any survivals 
of medieval economic, political, and legal discrimination. Big industry needs 
markets and freedom of untrammeled trade in big areas. Industry and trade, 
geared to big areas, require uniform administration, uniform arrangement of 
roads and communications, uniform legislation and judiciary, as far as possible 
in the entire international market, but above all in the whole area inside each 
respective state. The abolition of the customs, and tax autonomy of the 
separate municipalities and gentry holdings, as well as of their autonomy in 
administering courts and law, were the first achievements of the modern 
bourgeoisie. Together with this went the creation of one big state machinery 
that would combine all functions: the administration in the hands of one 
central government; legislation in the hands of a legislative body – the 
parliament; the armed forces in the form of one centralized army subject to a 
central government; customs arrangements in the form of one tariff encompassing 
the entire state externally; a uniform currency in the whole state, etc. In 
accordance with this, the modern state also introduced in the area of spiritual 
life, as far as possible, a uniformity in education and schools, ecclesiastical 
conditions, etc., organized on the same principles in the entire state. In a 
word, as comprehensive a centralization as possible in all areas of social life 
is a prominent trend of capitalism. As capitalism develops, centralization 
increasingly pierces all obstacles and leads to a series of uniform 
institutions, not only within each major state, but in the entire capitalistic 
world, by means of international legislation. Postal and telegraphic services 
as well as railway communication have been for decades the object of 
international conventions.

This centralist tendency of capitalistic development is one of the main bases 
of the future socialist system, because through the highest concentration of 
production and exchange, the ground is prepared for a socialized economy 
conducted on a world-wide scale according to a uniform plan. On the other hand, 
only through consolidating and centralizing both the state power and the 
working class as a militant force does it eventually become possible for the 
proletariat to grasp the state power in order to introduce the dictatorship of 
the proletariat, a socialist revolution.

Consequently, the proper political framework in which the modern class struggle 
of the proletariat operates and can conquer is the big capitalistic state. 
Usually, in the socialist ranks, especially of the utopian trend, attention is 
paid only to the economic aspect of capitalistic development, and its 
categories – industry, exploitation, the proletariat, depressions – are 
regarded as indispensable prerequisites for socialism. In the political sphere, 
usually only democratic state institutions, parliamentarianism, and various 
“freedoms” are regarded as indispensable conditions of this movement. However, 
it is often overlooked that the modern big state is also an indispensable 
prerequisite for the development of the modern class struggle and a guarantee 
of the victory of socialism. The historical mission of the proletariat is not 
”socialism” applicable on every inch of ground separately, not dictatorship, 
but world revolution, whose point of departure is big-state development.

Therefore, the modern socialist movement, legitimate child of capitalist 
development, possesses the same eminently centralist characteristic as the 
bourgeois society and state. Consequently, Social Democracy is, in all 
countries, a determined opponent of particularism as well as of federalism. In 
Germany, Bavarian or Prussian particularism, i.e., a tendency to preserve 
Bavaria’s or Prussia’s political distinctiveness, their independence from the 
Reich in one respect or another, is always a screen for gentry or petit 
bourgeois reaction. German Social Democracy also combats, with full energies, 
the efforts, for instance, of South German particularists to preserve a 
separate railroad policy in Bavaria, Baden, Württemberg; it also energetically 
combats particularism in the conquered provinces of Alsace-Lorraine, where the 
petite bourgeoisie tries to separate itself, by its French nationalism, from 
political and spiritual community with the entire German Reich. Social 
Democracy in Germany is also a decided opponent of those survivals of the 
federal relationship among the German states inside the Reich which have still 
been preserved. The general trend of capitalist development tends not only 
toward the political union of the separate provinces within each state, but 
also toward the abolition of any state federations and the welding of loose 
state combinations into homogeneous, uniform states; or, wherever this is 
impossible, to their complete break-up.

An expression of this is the modern history of the Swiss Confederacy, as well 
as of the American Union; of the German Reich, as well as of Austria-Hungary.
 
III

The first centralist constitution of the integrated republic of Switzerland, 
created by the great revolution, was obliterated without a trace by the time of 
the Restoration, and reaction, which triumphed in Switzerland under the 
protection of the Holy Alliance, quickly returned to the independence of the 
cantons, to particularism and only a loose confederation. Domestically, this 
implementation of the ideal “of voluntary union of independent groups and state 
units” in the spirit of anarchists and other worshipers of “federation.” 
involved the adoption of an aristocratic constitution (with the exclusion of 
the broad working masses) as well as the rule of Catholic clericalism.

A new opposition trend, toward the democratization and the centralization of 
the Swiss federation, was born in the period of revolutionary seething between 
the July [1830] and March [1848] revolutions, which was manifested in 
Switzerland in the form of a tendency to create a close state union in place of 
federation, and to abolish the political rule of noble families and of the 
Catholic clergy. Here, centralism and democracy initially went hand in hand, 
and encountered the opposition of the reaction which fought under the slogan of 
federation and particularism.

The first constitution of the present Swiss Confederation of 1848 was born out 
of a bitter struggle against the so-called “Sonderbund,” i.e., a federation of 
seven Catholic cantons which, in 1847, undertook a revolt against the general 
confederation in the name of saving the independence of the cantons and their 
old aristocratic system, and clericalism. Although the rebels proudly waved the 
banner of “freedom and independence” of the cantons against the “despotism” of 
the Confederacy, in particular of “freedom of conscience” against Protestant 
intolerance (the ostensible cause of the conflict was the closing of the 
convents by the Democratic Radical parties), democratic and revolutionary 
Europe, undeceived by this, applauded wholeheartedly when the Confederacy, by 
brutal armed force, i.e., by “violence,” forced the advocates of federalism to 
bow and surrender to the Confederate authority. And when Freiligrath, the bard 
of the Neue Rheinische Zeitung, triumphantly celebrated the victory of the 
bayonets of Swiss centralism as a reveille to the March revolution – “In the 
highlands the first shot was fired, in the highlands against the parsons” it 
was the absolutist government of Germany, the pillar of Metternich’s reaction, 
that took up the cause of the federalists and the defenders of the old 
independence of the cantons. The later development of Switzerland up until the 
present has been marked by constant, progressive, legal and political 
centralization under the impact of the growth of big industry and international 
trade, railroads, and European militarism. Already the second Constitution of 
1874 extended considerably the attributes of the central legislation, the 
central government authority, and particularly of a centralized judiciary in 
comparison with the Constitution of 1848. Since the Constitution was thoroughly 
revised in 1874, centralization has progressed continuously by the addition of 
ever new individual articles, enlarging the competence of the central 
institutions of the Confederacy. While the actual political life of 
Switzerland, with its development toward a modern capitalist state, is 
increasingly concentrated in the federal institutions, the autonomous life of 
the canton declines and becomes increasingly sterile. Matters have gone even 
further. When the federal organs of legislation and uniform government, 
originating from direct elections by the people (the so-called Nazionalrat and 
the so-called Bundesrat), assume increasingly more prestige and power, the 
organ of the federal representation, i.e., of the cantons (the so-called 
Ständerat), becomes more and more a survival, a form without content, condemned 
by the development of life to slow death.[1] At the same time, this process of 
centralization is supplemented by another parallel process of making the 
cantonal constitutions uniform by means of constant revisions in the 
legislatures of the respective cantons and the mutual imitation and borrowing 
among them. As a result, the former variety of cantonal particularisms rapidly 
disappears. Until now, the main safeguard of this political separateness and 
independence of the cantons was their local civil and penal law which preserved 
the entire medley of its historical origin, tradition, and cantonal 
particularism. At present, even this stubbornly defended fortress of the 
cantons’ independence has had to yield under the pressure of Switzerland’s 
capitalist development – industry, trade, railroads and telegraphs, 
international relations – which passed like a leveling wave over the legal 
conditions of the cantons. As a result, the project of one common civil and 
penal code for the entire confederation has been already elaborated, while 
portions of the civil code have already been approved and implemented. These 
parallel currents of centralization and standardization, working from above and 
below and mutually supplementing each other, encounter, almost at every step, 
the opposition of the socially and economically most backward, most petit 
bourgeois French and Italian cantons. In a significant manner, the opposition 
of the Swiss decentralists and federalists even assumes the forms and colors of 
a nationality struggle for the French Swiss: the expansion of the power of the 
Confederacy at the expense of cantonal particularism is tantamount to the 
increase of the preponderance of the German element, and as such they, the 
French Swiss, openly combat it. No less characteristic is another circumstance, 
viz., the same French cantons which, in the name of federation and 
independence, combat state centralism, have internally the least developed 
communal self-government, while the most democratic self-governing 
institutions, a true rule of the people, prevail in those communes of the 
German cantons which advocate centralization of the Confederation. In this way, 
both at the very bottom and at the top of state institutions, both in the 
latest results of the development of present-day Switzerland and at its point 
of departure, centralism goes hand in hand with democracy and progress, while 
federalism and particularism are linked with reaction and backwardness.

In another form the same phenomena are repeated in the history of the United 
States of America.

The first nucleus of the Union of the English colonies in North America, which 
until then had been independent, which differed greatly from one another 
socially and politically, and which in many respects had divergent interests, 
was also created by revolution. The revolution was the advocate and creator of 
the process of political centralization which has never stopped up to the 
present day. Also, here, as in Switzerland, the initial, most immature form of 
development, was the same ”voluntary federation” which, according to the 
conscious and unconscious adherents of anarchistic ideas, stands at the apex of 
modern social development as the crowning summit of democracy.

In the first Constitution of the United States, elaborated in the period 
1777-1781, there triumphed completely the ”freedom and independence of the 
several colonies, their complete right of self-determination.” The union was 
loose and voluntary to such an extent that it practically did not possess any 
central executive and made possible, almost on the morrow of its establishment, 
a fratricidal customs war among its ”free and equal” members, New York, New 
Jersey, Virginia, and Maryland, while in Massachusetts, under the blessing of 
complete “independence” and “self-determination,” a civil war, an uprising of 
debt-encumbered farmers broke out, which aroused in the wealthy bourgeoisie of 
the states a vivid yearning for a strong central authority. This bourgeoisie 
was forcibly reminded that in a bourgeois society the most beautiful ”national 
independence” has real substance and “value” only when it serves the 
independent utilization of the fruits of “internal order,” i.e., the 
undisturbed rule of private property and exploitation.

The second Constitution of 1787 already created, in place of federation, a 
unified state with a central legislative authority and a central executive. 
However, centralism had still, for a long time, to combat the separatist 
tendencies of the states righters which finally erupted in the form of an open 
revolt of the Southern states, the famous 1861 war of secession Here we also 
see a striking repetition of the 1847 Swiss situation. As advocates of 
centralism, the Northern states acted representing the modern, big-capital 
development, machine industry, personal freedom and equality before the law, 
the true corollaries of the system of hired labor, bourgeois democracy, and 
bourgeois progress. On the other hand, the banner of separatism, federation, 
and particularism, the banner of each hamlet’s “independence” and “right of 
self-determination” was raised by the plantation owners of the South, who 
represented the primitive exploitation of slave labor. In Switzerland as in 
America, centralism struggled against the separatist tendencies of federalism 
by means of armed force and physical coercion, to the unanimous acclaim of all 
progressive and democratic elements of Europe. It is significant that the last 
manifestation of slavery in modern society tried to save itself, as reaction 
always does, under the banner of particularism, and the abolition of slavery 
was the obverse of the victory of centralist capitalism. After the victorious 
war against the secessionists, the Constitution of the American Union underwent 
a new revision in the direction of centralism; the remainder was, from then on, 
achieved by big capital, big power, imperialist development: railroads, world 
trade, trusts, finally, in recent times, customs protectionism, imperialist 
wars, the colonial system, and the resulting re-organization of the military, 
of taxation, and so on. At present, the central executive in the person of the 
President of the Union possesses more extensive power, and the administration 
and judiciary are more centralized than in the majority of the monarchies of 
Western Europe. While in Switzerland the gradual expansion of the central 
functions at the expense of federalism takes place by means of amendments to 
the constitution, in America this takes place in a way of its own without any 
constitutional changes, through a liberal interpretation of the constitution by 
the judicial authorities.

The history of modern Austria presents a picture of incessant struggle between 
a centralist and federalist trend. The starting point of this history, the 1848 
revolution, shows the following division of roles: the advocates of centralism 
are the German liberals and democrats, the then leaders of the revolution, 
while the obstruction under the banner of federalism is represented by the 
Slavic counter-revolutionary parties: the Galician nobility; the Czech, 
Moravian and Dalmatian diets; the pan-Slavists and, the admirers of Bakunin, 
that prophet and phrasemaker of the anarchist ”autonomy of free peoples.” Marx 
characterized the policy and role of the Czech federalists in the 1848 
revolution as follows:

``The Czech and Croat pan-Slavists worked, some deliberately and some 
unknowingly, in accordance with the clear interests of Russia. They betrayed 
the cause of revolution for the shadow of a nationality which, in the best 
case, would have shared the fate of the Polish one. The Czech, Moravian, 
Dalmatian, and a part of the Polish delegates (the aristocracy) conducted a 
systematic struggle against the German element. The Germans and a part of the 
Poles (the impoverished gentry) were the main adherents of revolutionary 
progress; fighting against them, the mass of the Slavic delegates was not 
content to demonstrate in this way the reactionary tendencies of their entire 
movement, but even debased itself by scheming and plotting with the very same 
Austrian government which had dispersed their Prague congress. They received a 
well-deserved reward for their disgraceful behavior. They had supported the 
government during the October uprising, the outcome of which finally assured a 
majority to the Slavs. This now almost exclusively Slavic assembly was 
dispersed by the Austrian soldiery exactly as the Prague congress had been and 
the pan-Slavists were threatened with imprisonment if they dared to complain. 
They achieved only this: that the Slavic nationality is now everywhere 
threatened by Austrian centralism.[2]``

Marx wrote this in 1852 during the revival of absolutist rule in Austria after 
the final collapse of the revolution and of the first era of constitutionalism 
– “a result which they owe to their own fanaticism and blindness.”

Such was the first appearance of federalism in the modern history of Austria.

In no state did the socio-historical content of the federalist program and the 
fallacy of the anarchist fantasies concerning the democratic or even 
revolutionary character of that slogan appear so emphatically also in later 
times, and, so to speak, symbolically, as in Austria. The progress of political 
centralization can be directly measured here by the program of the right to 
vote for the Vienna parliament, which, passing successively through four phases 
of gradual democratization, was increasingly becoming the main cement binding 
together the state structure of the Hapsburg monarchy. The October Patent of 
1860, which inaugurated the second constitutional era in Austria, had created 
in the spirit of federalism a weak central legislative organ, and given the 
right of electing the delegations to it not to the people, but to the diets of 
the respective crownlands. However, already in 1873, it proved indispensable 
for breaking the opposition of the Slavic federalists, to introduce voting 
rights not by the diets, but by the people themselves, to the Central 
Parliament [Reichsrat] – although it was a class, unequal, and indirect voting 
system. Subsequently, the nationality struggle and the decentralist opposition 
of the Czechs, which threatened the very existence and integrity of the 
Hapsburg monarchy, forced, in 1896, the replacement of their class voting right 
by a universal one, through the addition of a fifth curia (the so-called 
universal election curia). Recently we witnessed the final reform of the 
electoral law in Austria in the direction of universal and equal voting rights 
as the only means of consolidating the state and breaking the centrifugal 
tendencies of the Slavic federalists. Especially characteristic in this respect 
is the role of Galicia. Already from the first session of the Viennese 
Reichsrat and the Galician Diet in April 1861, the Galician nobility came 
forward as an extreme opposition against the liberal cabinet of Schmerling, 
violently opposing the liberal reforms in the name of “national autonomy” and 
the right of nations to “self-determination,” i.e., in the name of the 
autonomous rights of the Provincial Diet.

Soon the policy became crystallized in the Stanczyk program of the so-called 
Cracow party, the party of such men as Tarnowski, Popiel, Wodzicki, and 
Kozmian, and found its expression in the notorious “resolution” of the Galician 
Diet of September 28, 1868, which is a kind of Magna Carta of the “separation 
of Galicia.” The resolution demanded such a broadening of the competence of the 
Provincial Diet that for the Central Parliament there remained only the most 
important all-monarchy matters; it completely abolished the central 
administration, handing it over exclusively to the crown land authorities, and 
in the end completely separating also the crown land judiciary. The state 
connection of Galicia with Austria was reduced here to such a flimsy shadow 
that sanguine minds, who did not yet know the flexibility of Polish 
nationalism, would be ready to see in this ideal program of federalism, 
“almost” national independence or at least a bold striving toward it. However, 
to prevent any such illusions, the Stanczyk party had announced its political 
credo and begun its public career in Austria not with the above program of 
federation but with the notorious address of the Diet of December 10, 1866, in 
which it proclaimed its classical formula: “Without fear of deserting the 
national idea and with faith in the mission of Austria we declare from the 
bottom of our hearts that we stand and wish to stand by Your Majesty.” This was 
only a concise aphoristic formulation of the sanguinary crusade which the 
nobility party around Przeglad Polski (Polish Review) waged, after the January 
uprising, against the insurrection and the insurgents against the “conspiracy,” 
“illusions,” “criminal attempts”, “foreign revolutionary influences,” “the 
excesses of social anarchy,” liquidating with cynical haste the last period of 
our national movements under the slogan of “organic work” and public 
renunciation of any solidarity with Russian-dominated Poland. Federalism and 
political separatism were not in reality an expression of national aspirations 
but were, rather, their simple negation and their public renunciation. The 
other harmonious complement of the Stanczyk program of federation (read: 
separation) was opposition and obstruction in coalition with Czech and Moravian 
federalists and the German clerical-reactionary party against any liberal 
reforms in Austria: against the liberal communal law, against the liberal law 
concerning elementary schools, against the introduction of the law concerning 
direct elections by the people to the Central Parliament; on the other hand it 
supported the government in all reactionary projects, e.g., support of the 
military laws starting with Taaffe’s Law, etc. This development has been 
coupled with extreme reaction also in provincial policies, the most glaring 
expression of which is the adamant opposition against the reform of elections 
to the Provincial Diet.

Finally, the third component of Galician federalism is the policy of the Polish 
nobility toward the Ruthenians. Quite analogous to the French federalists of 
Switzerland, the Galician advocates of a potential decentralization of the 
Austrian state have been strict centralists internally in relation to the 
Ruthenian population. The Galician nobility has from the beginning stubbornly 
combated the demand of autonomy for the Ruthenians, the administrative division 
of Galicia into Eastern and Western, and the granting of equal status to the 
Ruthenian language and script along with the Polish language. The program of 
”separation” and federalism suffered a decisive defeat in Austria as early as 
1873, when direct elections to the Central Parliament were introduced, and from 
then on the Stanczyk party, in keeping with its opportunistic principles, 
abandoned the policy of obstruction and acquiesced in Austrian centralism. 
However, Galician federalism from then on appears on the stage if not as a 
program of realistic politics then as a means of parliamentary maneuvers each 
time that serious democratic reforms are considered. The last memorable 
appearance of the program of ”separating” Galicia in the public arena is 
connected with the struggle of the Galician nobility against the most recent 
electoral reform, against the introduction of universal and equal voting rights 
for the Vienna Parliament. And as if to put stronger emphasis on the 
reactionary content of the federalist program, the deputies of Austrian Social 
Democracy, in April 1906, voted unanimously against the motion concerning the 
separation of Galicia. At their head in his character as representative of the 
Austrian Workers’ Party, a representative of the all-monarchy proletarian 
policy spoke and voted against the separation of Galicia: this was Mr. Ignacy 
Daszynski, who, as a leader in the three parts of the patriotic PPS, considers 
the separation of the Kingdom of Poland from Russia as his political program. 
The Austrian Social Democracy is a determined and open advocate of centralism, 
a conscious adherent of the state consolidation of Austria and consequently a 
conscious opponent of any separatist tendencies.

“The future of the Austrian state” says Kautsky – “depends on the strength and 
influence of Social Democracy. Precisely because it is revolutionary, it is in 
this case a party upholding the state [eine staatserltaltende Partei] in this 
sense; although this sounds strange, one may apply to the Red revolutionary 
Social Democracy the words which half a century ago Grillparzer addressed to 
the hero of the Red Yellow reaction, General Radetzky: ‘In your camp is 
Austria.’” [“In deinen Lager ist Osterreich”][3] is just as in the matter of 
the “separation” of Galicia Austrian Social Democracy decisively rejects the 
program of the Czech Federalists, that is, the separation of Bohemia. Kautsky 
writes:

``The growth of the idea of autonomy for Bohemia is only a partial 
Manifestation of the general growth of reaction in all big states of the 
Continent. The program of “autonomy” would not yet make Bohemia an autonomous 
state. It would still remain a part of Austria. The Central Parliament would 
not be abolished by this. The most important matters (military affairs, 
customs, etc.) would remain in its competence. However, the separation of 
Bohemia would break the power of the Central Parliament, which today is very 
weak. It would break it not only in relation to the diets of the several 
nations but also in relation to the central government, on the model of the 
delegations. [The reference here is to delegations of Austria and Hungary which 
were elected by the Vienna and Budapest parliament and had as their task the 
arrangement of the so-called Austro-Hungarian compromise, that is, the mutual 
relationship or proportion contributed by both countries for the common 
expenses of the state and the settlement of certain matters affecting both.] 
The state council, that is, the Central Parliament of Austria, would have to be 
reduced to a miserable idol nodding its head to everything. The power of the 
central government in military and customs affairs, as well as foreign policy, 
would then become unrestricted. The separation of Bohemia would signify the 
strengthening of the rule of bourgeois peasant clericalism in the Alpine lands 
of the nobility and in Galicia; also that of the capitalist magnates in 
Bohemia. As long as these three strata must exercise their authority in the 
Central Parliament jointly, they cannot develop all their power because their 
interests are not identical; holding them together is no easy matter. Their 
strength will be increased if each of these strata can concentrate on a certain 
defined area. The clericals in Innsbruck and Linz, the Galician nobility in 
Cracow and Lemberg, the Bohemian Tories in Prague are more powerful separately 
than all together in Vienna. Just as in Germany, the reaction draws its 
strength from the particularism and weakness of the Central Parliament; here, 
just as there, giving one’s moral support to particularism means working in 
favor of reaction. Here, just as there, we are obligated to resist strongly the 
present current tending to the weakening of the Central Parliament. [Kautsky 
ends with these words:] We must combat Bohemian states’ rights [the program of 
separating off Bohemia] as a product of reaction and a means of its support. We 
must combat it since it means splitting the proletariat of Austria. The road 
from capitalism to socialism does not lead through feudalism. The program of 
separating off Bohemia is just as little a preliminary to the autonomy of 
peoples as anti-Semitism (that is, a unilateral struggle against Jewish 
capital) is a preliminary to Social Democracy.[4]``

Where the remnants of feudalism have been preserved to this day in Europe, they 
are everywhere a protection of monarchy. In Germany, a striking manifestation 
of this is the fact that the unity of the Reich is based on a universal equal 
voting right to Parliament, while all German states taken individually have 
much more reactionary state constitutions, from Prussia, with its (as Bismarck 
expressed it) ”most monstrous” tri-class electoral law, up to Mecklenburg, 
which is still in general a medieval state with a purely class constitution.

The city of Hamburg itself is an even more striking example if we believe that 
progress and democracy are connected with centralism, and reaction with 
particularism and federalism. The city of Hamburg, which forms three electoral 
districts of the German Reich, is represented in Parliament on the basis of a 
universal voting right, exclusively by social Democratic deputies. On the basis 
of the Constitution of the Reich as a whole, the Workers’ Party is, therefore, 
in Hamburg, the unique ruling party. But the very same city of Hamburg, as a 
separate little state, on the basis of its distinction, separateness, 
introduced for itself a new electoral law even more reactionary than the one in 
force until now, which makes it almost impossible to elect Social Democrats to 
the Hamburg Diet.

In Austria-Hungary we see the same. On the one hand, a federal relationship 
between Hungary and Austria is an expression not of freedom and progress but of 
monarchical reaction because it is known that the Austro-Hungarian dualism is 
maintained only by the dynastic interest of the Hapsburgs, and Austrian Social 
Democracy clearly declared itself in favor of the complete dissolution of that 
federation and the complete separation of Hungary from Austria.

However, this position resulted by no means from the inclinations of Austrian 
Social Democracy for decentralization in general, but just the reverse: it 
resulted from the fact that a federal connection between Hungary and Austria is 
an obstacle to an even greater political centralization inside Austria for the 
purpose of restoring and consolidating the latter, and here the very same 
Social Democratic Party is an advocate of as close a union of the crownlands as 
possible, and an opponent of any tendencies to the separation of Galicia, 
Bohemia, Trieste, the Trentino, and so on. In fact, the only center of 
political and democratic progress in Austria is her central policy, a Central 
Parliament in Vienna which, in its development, reached a universal 
equal-voting right, while the autonomous Diets Galician, Lower Austrian, 
Bohemian – are strongholds of the most savage reaction on the part of the 
nobility or bourgeoisie.

Finally, the last event in the history of federal relationships, the separation 
of Norway from Sweden, taken up in its time eagerly by the Polish 
social-patriotic parties (see the Cracow Naprzod [Forward]) as a joyous 
manifestation of strength and the progressiveness of separatist tendencies, 
soon changed into a new striking proof that federalism and state separations 
resulting from it are by no means an expression of progress or democracy. After 
the so-called Norwegian “revolutions,” which consisted in the dethronement and 
the expulsion from Norway of the King of Sweden, the Norwegians quietly elected 
another king for themselves, having even formally, in a popular ballot, 
rejected the project of introducing a republic. That which superficial admirers 
of all national movements and all semblances of independence proclaimed as a 
“revolution” was a simple manifestation of peasant and bourgeois particularism, 
a desire to possess for their own money a “king of their own” instead of one 
imposed by the Swedish aristocracy, and, therefore, a movement which had 
nothing in common whatever with a revolutionary spirit. At the same time, the 
history of the disintegration of the Swedish-Norwegian union again proved how 
far, even here, the federation had been an expression of purely dynastic 
interests, that is, a form of monarchism and reaction.
 
IV

The idea of federalism as a solution of the nationality question, and in 
general, an “ideal” of the political system in international relations, raised 
sixty years ago by Bakunin and other anarchists, finds at present refuge with a 
number of socialist groups in Russia. A striking illustration of that idea, as 
well as of its relation to the class struggle of the proletariat at the present 
time, is given by the congress of those federalist groups of all Russia held 
during the recent [1905] revolution and whose deliberations have been published 
in a detailed report. [See the Proceedings of the Russian National Socialist 
Parties, April 16-20, 1907, Knigoi Izdatielstvo, Sejm (St. Petersburg: 1908).]

First of all, a characterization of the political complexion and of the 
“socialism” of these groups is interesting. In the Congress, there participated 
Georgian, Armenian, Byelo-Russian, Jewish, Polish, and Russian federalists. The 
Georgian Socialist Federalist Party operates mainly – according to its own 
report – not among the urban population but in the countryside, because only 
there does there exist in a compact mass the national Georgian element; these 
number about 1.2 million and are concentrated in the gubernias of Tiflis, 
Kutai, and partially, Batum. This party is almost completely recruited from 
peasants and petty gentry. “In its striving for an independent regulation of 
its life” – declares the delegate of the Georgian Socialist Federalist Party – 
“without counting on the centralist bureaucracy, whether this be absolutistic 
or constitutional or even social-democratic (!), the Georgian peasantry will 
probably find sympathy and help on the part of that petty Georgian gentry which 
lives on the land and by the size of its possessions and also its way of life 
differs little from the peasantry.” Therefore, the party considers that “even 
independently of considerations of a basic (!) nature, merely the practical 
conditions of Georgian agriculture demand the treatment of the agrarian 
question as a class question, peasant or gentry only as an over-all national 
question, as a social (!) problem, as a problem of work(!).” Starting with 
these assumptions, the Georgian Federalists, in harmony with the Russian Social 
Revolutionaries, strive for the “socialization of land which is to be achieved 
under the rule of the capitalistic or bourgeois system.” A beautiful addition 
to this program is the reservation that “socialization” cannot be extended to 
orchards, vineyards and other “special cultivations,” or to farms, because 
these are areas “demanding a certain contribution of work and material means 
which cannot be returned in one year or in several years” and which would be 
difficult for a Georgian peasant to renounce.” Consequently, there remains 
private property for “cultivations” and “socialism” for grain-planting - of 
which there is little in the Caucasus – as well as for dunes, marginal lands, 
bogs, and forests.

The main thing on which the Socialist Federalists put emphasis is the 
reservation that the agricultural question in Georgia should be decided not in 
a constituent assembly nor in a central parliament, but only in autonomous 
national institutions, because “however life will decide this question, in 
principle, only this is unquestionable, that the land in a Georgian territory 
should belong first of all to the Georgian people.” The question, how it 
happens that the “socialist” party is joined, en masse, by the petty gentry and 
bourgeoisie, the delegates of the Georgian Federalists explained by saying that 
this happens only because “there is no other party which would formulate the 
demands of these strata.”

The Armenian Revolutionary Federation, that is, Dashnaktsutyun, founded at the 
beginning of the 1890s for the purpose of liberating the Armenians from Turkey, 
was exclusively concerned with “militarizing the people,” i.e., the preparation 
of fighting detachments and armed expeditions into Turkey, the import of 
weapons, the direction of attacks on Turkish troops, etc. Only recently, at the 
beginning of the current century, the Armenian Revolutionary Federation 
expanded its activity into the Caucasus and assumed at the same time a social 
aspect. The cause for the revolutionary outburst of the movement and the 
terroristic action in the Caucasus was the confiscation of the estates of the 
Armenian clergy for the [tsarist] treasury in 1903. Besides its main combat” 
action, the party began, against the background of those events, a propaganda 
among the rural population in the Caucasus as well as a struggle against 
tsardom. The agrarian program of Dashnaktsutyun demands the expropriation of 
gentry estates without compensation, and surrendering there to the communes for 
equal distribution. This reform is to be based on the still rather general 
communal property in the central part of the Transcaucasus. Recently, there 
arose a “young” trend among the Armenian Federalists maintaining that the 
Dashnaktsutyun party is simply a bourgeois, nationalistic organization of a 
rather doubtful socialistic aspect – an organization linking within itself 
completely heterogeneous social elements, and in its activity and action on 
completely heterogeneous socio-political territory, such as Turkey on the one 
side and the Caucasus on the other. This party recognizes, according to its own 
report, the principle of federalism both as a basis of nation-wide relations 
and the basis on which should be thoroughly reconstructed the conditions in the 
Caucasus, and finally, as an organizing principle for the party.

A Byelorussian organization was formed in 1903 under the name of the 
Byelorussian Revolutionary Hromada. Its cardinal programmatic demand was 
separation from Russia, and in the sphere of economics, the nationalization of 
the land. In 1906, this program underwent a revision and from then on the party 
has been demanding a federal republic in Russia, with territorial autonomy for 
Lithuania and a diet in Vilna, as well as a non-territorial national cultural 
autonomy for the remaining nationalities inhabiting Lithuania, while on the 
agrarian question the following demands were adopted: lands held by the 
treasury, by the church, and by the monasteries, as well as big landed property 
above eighty to one hundred dessiatins are to be confiscated and turned into a 
land fund out of which, first of all, the landless and small peasants should be 
supplied on the basis of hereditary property, with the aim of eliminating 
pauperism as well as developing the productive forces of the country. The 
socialization of land cannot yet be mentioned because of the low intellectual 
level of the Byelorussian peasant. Thus, the task of the party is the creation 
and maintenance of a peasant farm in a normal size of eight dessiatins, as well 
as the consolidation of lands. Furthermore, forests, bodies of water, and bogs 
are to be nationalized. Hronmada carries on its activity among the Byelorussian 
peasants who inhabit, to the number of about seven millions, the gubernias of 
Vilna, Minsk, Grodno, and part of Witebsk.

The Jewish Federalist group, “Sierp” [“The Sickle”], organized only a few years 
ago by Jewish dissidents from the Russian Social Revolutionary Party, demands 
non-territorial autonomy for all nationalities in the Russian state; out of 
them would be created voluntary state political associations combining together 
into a state federation, in order to strive in that way for its ultimate goal, 
territorial (!) autonomy for the Jews. It directs its activity mainly to the 
organizing of Jewish workers in Witebsk, Ekaterinoslav, Kiev, etc., and it 
expects the implementation of its program to arise from the victory of the 
socialist parties in the Russian state.

It is superfluous to characterize the remaining two organizations, the PPS 
“revolutionary faction,” and the Russian Party of Social Revolutionaries, since 
they are sufficiently known by origin and character.

Thus appears that Diet of Federalists cultivating at present that antiquated 
idea of federation rejected by the class movement of the proletariat. It is a 
collection of only petit bourgeois parties for whom the nationalist program is 
the main concern and the socialist program an addition; it is a collection of 
parties mainly representing – with the exception of the revolutionary fraction 
of the Polish Socialist Party and the Jewish Federalists – the chaotic 
aspirations of a peasantry in opposition, and the respective class proletarian 
parties that came into being with the revolutionary storm, in clear opposition 
to the bourgeois parties. In this collection of petit bourgeois elements, the 
party of the Russian terrorists is a trend, not only the oldest one, but also 
the one furthest left. The others manifest, much more clearly, that they have 
in common with the class struggle of the proletariat.

The only common ground which links this variegated collection of nationalists 
has been the idea of federation, which all of them recognize as a basis of 
state and political, as well as party, relations. However, out of this strange 
harmony, antagonism arises immediately from all sides the moment the question 
turns to practical projects of realizing that common ideal. The Jewish 
Federalists bitterly complain of the “haughtiness” of the nations endowed by 
fate with a “territory” of their own, particularly the egoism of the Polish 
Social Patriots, who presented the greatest opposition to the project of 
non-territorial autonomy; at the very same time, these Jewish nationalists 
questioned in a melancholy way whether the Georgian Federalists would admit any 
other nationality to their territory, which they claimed as the exclusive 
possession of the Georgian nationality. The Russian Federalists, on the other 
hand, accuse the Jewish ones, saying that, from the standpoint of their 
exceptional situation, they want to impose on all nationalities a 
non-territorial autonomy. The Caucasian, Armenian, and Georgian Federalists 
cannot agree concerning the relationship of the nationalities in a future 
federal system, specifically on the question of whether other nationalities are 
to participate in the Georgian territorial autonomy, “or whether such counties 
as Akhalkalak, inhabited mainly by Armenians, or Barchabin, with a mixture of 
population, will form individual autonomous territories, or will create an 
autonomy for themselves according to the composition of their population.” The 
Armenian Federalists, on their part, demand the exclusion of the city of Tiflis 
from the autonomous Georgian territory, inasmuch as it is a center primarily 
inhabited by Armenians. On the other hand, all the Georgian and Armenian 
Federalists recognize that at present, since the Tatar-Armenian slaughter, the 
Tatars must be excluded from the federation of autonomous Caucasian peoples as 
“a nationality immature from the cultural point of view”! Thus, the 
conglomeration of nationalists agreeing unanimously to the idea of federation 
changes into as many contradictory interests and tendencies; and the “ideal” of 
federalism, which constitutes in the theoretical and super-historical 
abstraction of anarchism, the most perfect solution of all nationality 
difficulties, on the first attempt at its implementation appears as a source of 
new contradictions and antagonisms. Here it is strikingly proved that the idea 
of federalism allegedly reconciling all nationalities is only an empty phrase, 
and that, among the various national groups, just because they don’t stand on a 
historical basis, there is no essentially unifying idea which would create a 
common ground for the settlement of contradictory interests.

But the same federalism separated from the historical background demonstrates 
its absolute weakness and helplessness not only in view of the nationality 
antagonisms in practice but also in view of the nationality question in 
general. The Russian Congress had as its main theme an evaluation and 
elucidation of the nationality question and undertook it unrestricted by any 
“dogmas” or formulae of the “narrow doctrine of Marxism.” What elucidation did 
it give to one of the most burning questions of present political life? “Over 
the whole history of mankind before the appearance of socialism” – proclaimed 
the representative of the Social Revolutionary Party in his speech at the 
opening of the Congress – “one may place as a motto the following words from 
the Holy Scripture: ‘And they ordered him to say “shibboleth” and he said 
”sibboleth” and they massacred him at the ford of the river.’ Indeed, the 
greatest amount of blood spilled in international struggle was spilled because 
of the fact that one nation pronounced ‘shibboleth’ and the other ‘sibboleth.’” 
After this profound introduction from the philosophy of history, there followed 
a series of speeches maintained at the same level, and the debates about the 
nationality questions culminated in the memorandum of the Georgian Federalists 
which proclaimed:

``”in primitive times, when the main task of people was hunting wild animals as 
well as creatures like themselves there were neither masters nor slaves. 
Equality in social relations was not violated; but later, when people came to 
know the cultivation of the soil, rather than killing and eating their captives 
they began to keep them in captivity. What, therefore, was the reason out of 
which slavery arose? Obviously not only material interests as such, but also 
this circumstance: that man was by his physical nature a hunter and a 
warrior(!). And despite the fact that man has already long since become an 
industrial animal, he is to this very day a predator, capable of tearing apart 
his neighbor for minor material considerations. This is the source of unending 
wars and the domination of classes. Naturally the origin of class domination 
was influenced also by other causes, for instance, man’s ability to become 
accustomed to dependence. But undoubtedly if man were not a warrior, there 
would be no slavery.”``

There follows a bloody picture of the fate of the nationalities subject to 
tsardom and then again a theoretical elucidation:

``“Somebody may tell us that bureaucratic rule rages not only in the 
borderlands but in Russia itself. From our point of view this is completely 
understandable. A nation subjugating other nations eventually falls into 
slavery itself. For instance, the more Rome expanded its domination, the more 
the plebeians were losing their freedom. Another example: during the great 
French Revolution the military victories of the Republican Army annihilated the 
fruit of the revolution – the Republic (!). The Russians themselves enjoyed 
incomparably greater freedom before they united in one powerful state, that is, 
at the time of the rule of die separate princes.” Thus, the memorandum ends its 
historio-philosophical lecture; freedom does not agree with the clatter of 
arms. Conquest was the main cause which brought into being both slavery as well 
as the rule of some social classes over others.``

That is all that the Federalists of the present time are able to say about the 
nationality question. It is literally the same phraseology from the standpoint 
of “justice”, “fraternity”, “morality” and similar beautiful things which 
already, sixty years ago, was proclaimed by Bakunin. And just as the father of 
anarchism was blind to the Revolution of 1848, its inner springs, its 
historical tasks, the present last of the Mohicans of federalism in Russia 
stand helpless and powerless before the revolution in the tsarist system.

The idea of federation, by its nature and historical substance reactionary, is 
today a pseudo-revolutionary sign of petit bourgeois nationalism, which 
constitutes a reaction against the united revolutionary class struggle of the 
proletariat in the entire Empire.



4. Centralization and Autonomy

We have noted the general centralizing tendency of capitalism in the bourgeois 
states. But local autonomy also grows simultaneously out of the objective 
development and out of the needs of bourgeois society.

Bourgeois economy requires as great a uniformity as possible in legislation, 
the judiciary, administration, the school system, etc., in the entire area of 
the state, and as far as possible, even in international relations. But the 
same bourgeois economy, in carrying out all these functions, demands accuracy 
and efficiency quite as much as uniformity. The centralism of the modern states 
is of necessity connected with a bureaucratic system. In the medieval state, in 
a serf economy, public functions were connected with landed property; these 
were the “concrete rights,” a kind of land tax. The feudal lord of estates was 
at the same time and by the same token a civil and criminal judge, the head of 
the police administration, the chief of military forces in a certain territory, 
and collector of taxes. These functions connected with owning real estate were, 
like the land itself, the object of transactions, gift, sale, inheritance, and 
so on. Absolutism, which increased toward the end of the Middle Ages, paving 
the way for capitalism by its struggle against feudal dispersal of state 
authority, separated public functions from land ownership and created a new 
social category for the execution of these functions, namely crown officials. 
With the development of modern capitalistic states, the performance of public 
functions passed completely into the hands of paid hirelings. This social group 
increased numerically and created the modern state bureaucracy. On the one 
hand, the transfer of public functions to hired personnel – completely devoted 
to their work and directed by one powerful political center – corresponds with 
the spirit of bourgeois economy, which is based on specialization, division of 
labor, and a complete subordination of manpower to the purpose of maintaining 
the social mechanism: on the other hand, however, the centralist bureaucracy 
has serious drawbacks hampering the economy.

Capitalist production and exchange are characterized by the highest sensitivity 
and elasticity, by the capacity, and even the inclination for constant changes 
in connection with thousands of social influences which cause constant 
fluctuations and undulations in market conditions, and in the conditions of 
production themselves. As a result of these fluctuations, the bourgeois economy 
requires subtle, perceptive administration of public services such as the 
centralized bureaucracy, with its rigidity and routine, is not able to afford. 
Hence, already as a corrective to the centralism of the modern state, there 
develops, in bourgeois society, along with legislation by representative 
assemblies, a natural tendency toward local autonomy, giving the possibility of 
a better adjustment of the state apparatus to social needs. For local autonomy 
takes into account the manifold variety of local conditions and also brings 
about a direct influence and cooperation of society through its public 
functions.

However, more important than the deficiencies inseparable from the rule of 
bureaucracy, by which the theory of bourgeois liberalism usually explains the 
necessity for autonomy, there is another circumstance. The capitalist economy 
brought forth, from the moment of the inception of mass factory production, a 
whole series of entirely new social needs imperiously demanding satisfaction. 
Above all the penetration of big capital and the system of hired labor, having 
undermined and ruined the entire traditional social structure, created a plague 
unknown before, namely mass unemployment and pauperization for the proletariat. 
Since capital needs a reserve labor force and since public security must be 
preserved, society, in order to hold in check the proletarian masses deprived 
of means of livelihood and employment, cannot but take care of them. In this 
way, modern public welfare comes into being as a social function within the 
framework of capitalistic production.

The agglomeration of big masses of industrial proletarians in the worst 
material conditions in the modern industrial centers created for the adjacent 
bourgeois classes a threat of infectious diseases and brought about another 
urgent social need: public concern for health, and in connection with this, the 
whole management of the sewage system and supply of water as well as public 
regulation of building construction.

The requirements of capitalist production and of bourgeois society brought 
about for the first time the problem of popular education. The system of 
schools accessible to broad masses, not only in the big cities but also in the 
provinces and among the rural population, brought the idea that the creation 
and regulation of schools was a public function.

The movement of goods and persons in the whole area of the state as a normal 
phenomenon and a condition of the existence of capitalist production brought 
forth the need for constant public concern about roads and means of 
communication, not only in the form of trunk-line railroads and maritime 
traffic, important from the point of view of military strategy and world trade, 
but also of vehicular roads, highways, bridges, river navigation, and 
subsidiary railroads. The creation and maintenance of these indispensable 
conditions of internal communication became one of the most urgent economic 
needs of bourgeois society.

Finally, public safety of persons and property as a matter of general concern 
and social need is also a clearly modern product, connected with the 
requirements of capitalist economy. In medieval society, safety was guaranteed 
by some special areas of legal protection: for the rural population, the area 
of the respective feudal dominion, for the burghers, the protective walls of 
the city and the statutes and “freedoms” of each city separately. The knights 
were supposed to guarantee their own safety. Modern society, based on the 
production of goods, needs safety of persons and property as a universal social 
guarantee for everybody in the entire territory of the state without 
discrimination. The central government cannot satisfy all these needs. There 
are some the government cannot take care of at all, like the local affairs in 
the remote parts of the country; understandably, the government tends to 
transmit the expenses of managing such affairs to the local population.

Local autonomy, therefore, originates in all modern states very early, above 
all in the form of transferring the material burden of a series of social 
functions to the population itself.

On the other hand, capitalism stratifies and links into one economic and social 
organism the biggest state areas, and, to a certain extent, the entire world. 
At the same time, however, in order to promote its interests, to perfect and 
integrate the bourgeois economy, capitalism splits the [autonomous] states and 
creates new centers, new social organisms, as, for instance, big cities and 
provincial regions, etc. A contemporary modern city is tied by numberless 
economic and political bonds not only to the state but to the entire world. The 
accumulation of people, the development of municipal transportation and 
economy, turns the city into a separate small organism; its needs and public 
functions are more numerous and varied than were those of a medieval city, 
which with its handicraft production, was almost entirely independent both 
economically and politically.

The creation of different states and of new urban areas provided the framework 
for the modern municipal government – a product of new social needs. A 
municipal or provincial government is necessary in order to comply with the 
needs of these specific social organisms into which capitalism, following the 
economic principle of the contradictory interests of the city and the village, 
transformed the city on the one hand and the village on the other. Within the 
framework of the special capitalistic connection between industry and 
agriculture, that is, between city and village, within the framework of the 
close mutual dependence of their production and exchange, a thousand threads 
linking the daily interests of the population of each major city with the 
existence of the population of the neighboring villages there goes, in a 
natural way, a provincial autonomy as in France – departmental, cantonal, or 
communal. Modern autonomy in all these forms is by no means the abolition of 
state centralism but only its supplementation; together they constitute the 
characteristic form of the bourgeois state.

Besides political unification, state sovereignty, uniform legislation, and 
centralized state government, local autonomy became, in all these countries, 
one of the basic policy issues both of the liberals and of the bourgeois 
democracy. Local autonomy, growing out of the modern bourgeois system in the 
manner indicated, has nothing in common with federalism or particularism handed 
down from the medieval past. It is even its exact opposite. While the medieval 
particularism or federalism constitutes a separation of the political functions 
of the state, modern autonomy constitutes only an adaptation of the 
concentrated state functions to local needs and the participation in them of 
the people. While, therefore, communal particularism or federalism in the 
spirit of

Bakunin’s ideal is a plan for splitting the territory of a big state into small 
areas partly or completely independent of each other, modern autonomy is only a 
form of democratization of a centralized big state. The clearest illustration 
of this point of modern autonomy which grew in the chief modern states on the 
grave the former particularism and in clear opposition to it.
 
II

State administrative and bureaucratic centralism was initiated in France by 
absolutism during the ancien régime. By the suppression of communal 
independence in the cities, especially in Paris, by subjugating the largest 
feudal possessions and incorporating them into the crownlands, finally by 
concentrating administration in the hands of the state council and royal 
supervisors, there was created already in the time of Richelieu a powerful 
apparatus of state centralism. The former independent feudal fiefs were reduced 
to the condition of provinces; some of them were governed by assemblies whose 
power, however, was more and more of an illusion.

The Great Revolution undertook its work in two directions. On the one hand, 
continuing the tendency toward political centralization, it completely 
abolished the territorial remnants of feudalism; on the other, in place of the 
provincial administration of bureaucrats assigned by the government, it created 
a local administration with representatives elected by the people. The 
Constituent Assembly wiped from the map of France the historical division of 
the country into provinces, as well as the medieval division into 
administratively diverse cities and villages. On the tabula rasa which was thus 
left the Constituent Assembly, following the idea of Siéyès, introduced a new, 
simple, geometrical division into square departments. The departments, in turn, 
are subdivided into arrondissements, cantons, and communes, each governed by a 
body elected by public vote. The constitution of the Directory of the Year III 
made certain changes in details, maintaining however, the foundations of the 
great reform effected by the Constituent Assembly; it was this reform which had 
given to modern history an epoch-making model of modern autonomy, which grew up 
on the grave of feudal decentralization and was imbued with an entirely new 
idea, namely, democratic representation by election.

There followed a hundred years of change in the history of autonomy in France. 
This history and the whole political fate of democracy in the country 
oscillated, in a characteristic manner, between two poles. The slogan of the 
aristocratic, monarchical reaction is, throughout this time, decentralization, 
in the sense of returning to the independence of the former historical 
provinces, while the slogan of liberalism and democracy is close adherence to 
political centralism and at the same time, the rights of representation of the 
local population, especially in the commune. The first blow to the work of the 
Revolution in that field was dealt by Napoleon, who was crowned by the 
so-called Statute of Pluvois 28 of the year VIII (Feb. 17, 1800), his coup 
d’état of 18th Brumaire. This statute, taking advantage of the general 
confusion and chaos caused especially in the provinces by the 
counter-revolution during the time of the Directory, for which the democratic 
autonomy was blamed, hastily compressed the work of the Revolution into the 
framework of bureaucracy. Maintaining the new territorial division of France in 
line with political centralism, Napoleon abolished, by one stroke of the pen, 
any participation of the people in local autonomy and gave over the entire 
power into the hands of officials assigned by the central government: prefect, 
sub-prefect, and mayor. In the department, the Napoleonic prefect was, in a 
considerable measure, a resurrection of the supervisor from the happy times of 
the ancien régime. Napoleon expressed this reversion with characteristic 
frankness when he said, “Avec mes préfets, mes gens d’armes et mes prêtres, je 
ferai tout ce que je voudrai.” [“With the help of my prefects, police, and 
priests I will do whatever I like.”]

The Restoration kept the system of its predecessor in general, according to a 
current expression. “The Bourbons slept on a bed that had been made by 
Napoleon.” However, as soon as the aristocratic emigration returned home its 
battle cry was decentralization, a return to the system of the provinces. The 
notorious chambre introuvable had scarcely assembled when one of the extreme 
Royalists, Barthe Lebastrie, at a meeting of January 13, 1816, solemnly 
announced the indispensability of decentralization. On many later occasions the 
leaders of the right, Corbière, De Bonald, La Bourdonnaye, de Villèle, 
Duvergier de Hauranne, argued “the impossibility of reconciling the monarchy 
with republican uniformity and equality.” Under this standard, the aristocracy 
fought simply for a return to its former position in the provinces from the 
economic and political point of view. At the same time, it denounced political 
centralism as “a gre:nid for revolution, a hotbed of innovations and 
agitation.” Here we already hear literally the same arguments under cover of 
which the right, half a century later, tried to mobilize the provincial 
reaction against the revolutionary Paris Commune.

Therefore, the first timid attempt at the reform of the local administration 
with application of the principle of election, that is, the project of 
Martignaque, called forth a storm in the honorable pre-July assembly and was 
rejected clearly as the “beginning of revolution.” The enraged representatives 
of the landed aristocracy demanded only the broadening of the competence of the 
prefect and sub-prefect and making them dependent on the central authority. 
However, the days of the Restoration were already numbered and the defeat of 
Martignaque’s project became the prologue of the July Revolution. The July 
Monarchy, which was only an improved edition of the Restoration in the spirit 
of the rule of the richest bourgeoisie, introduced insignificant changes in 
local autonomy; it provided a shadow of the system of election. The law of 1831 
on the communes and the law of 1833 on the departments gave the right of 
suffrage for municipal and departmental councils to a small minority of the 
most highly taxed as well as to the bureaucracy and bourgeois intelligentsia, 
without, however, any broadening of the attributes of these councils.

The revolution of 1848 restored the work of its great predecessor, introduced 
universal suffrage for departmental councils, and made the meetings of the 
councils public. After the June days, the party of the aristocratic-clerical 
right violently demanded the return to decentralization as a weapon against the 
hydra of socialism. In 1849-1851, the departmental councils unanimously 
demanded the extension of their competence and extraordinary powers in case of 
civil war, for use against Paris. Thiers, at that time still a liberal, on the 
contrary, insisted on centralism as the most certain preventive means against 
socialism. (The very same Thiers, it is true, in 1871, himself waved the banner 
of federalism and decentralization to mobilize the provinces against the Paris 
Commune.) The Second Republic, in liquidating the work of the February 
Revolution, prepared in 1851 a project for the reform of local administration 
which restored completely the system of Napoleon I, with an all-powerful 
prefect, and in this way built here, as in general, a bridge on which Napoleon 
III entered. The latter undertook an even more thorough revision of the 
February achievements, put local administration even further back than the 
reforms of Napoleon I, and abolished the openness of the meetings of the 
departmental councils and their right to elect their own cabinet; from then on 
the government appointed mayors quite arbitrarily, i.e., not from within the 
communal council. Finally, Napoleon III expanded the power of the prefects (by 
the laws of 1852 and 1861) to such an extent that he made them completely 
independent of the government. These omnipresent departmental satraps, 
dependent directly on Louis Napoleon, became, by virtue of their function of 
“directors” of elections to Parliament, the main pillars of the Second Empire.

The course of the above history until the beginning of the Second Empire was 
characterized by Marx in broad strokes in his The Eighteenth Brumaire of Louis 
Bonaparte in the following way:

``This executive power with its enormous bureaucratic and military 
organization, with its ingenious state machinery, embracing wide strata, with a 
host of officials numbering half a million, besides an army of another 
half-million, this appalling parasitic body, which enmeshes the body of French 
society like a net and chokes all its pores, sprang up in the days of the 
absolute monarchy, with the decay of the feudal system, which it helped to 
hasten. The seignorial privileges of the landowners and towns became 
transformed into so many attributes of the state power, the feudal dignitaries 
into paid officials, and the motley pattern of conflicting medieval plenary 
powers into the regulated plan of a state authority whose work is divided and 
centralized as in a factory. The first French Revolution, with its task of 
breaking all separate local, territorial, urban, and provincial powers in order 
to create the civil unity of the nation, was bound to develop what the absolute 
monarchy had begun: centralization, but at the same time the extent, the 
attributes, and the agents of governmental power. Napoleon perfected this state 
machinery. The Legitimist Monarchy and the July Monarchy added nothing but a 
greater division of labor, growing in the same measure as the division of labor 
within bourgeois society created new groups of interests, and, therefore, new 
material for state administration. Every common interest was straightaway 
severed from society, counterposed to it as a higher general interest, snatched 
from the activity of society’s members themselves and made an object of 
governmental activity, from a bridge, a schoolhouse, and the communal property 
of a village community to the railways, the national wealth, and the national 
university of France. Finally, in its struggle against the revolution, the 
parliamentary republic found itself compelled to strengthen, along with the 
repressive measures, the resources and centralization of governmental power. 
All revolutions perfected this machine instead of smashing it. The parties that 
contended in turn for domination regarded the possession of this huge state 
edifice as the principal spoils of the victor.

But under the absolute monarchy, during the first Revolution, under Napoleon, 
bureaucracy was only the means of preparing the class rule of the bourgeoisie. 
Under the Restoration, under Louis Philippe, under the parliamentary republic, 
it was the instrument of the ruling class, however much it strove for power of 
its own.

Only under the second Bonaparte does the state seem to have made itself 
completely independent. As against civil society, the state machine has 
consolidated its position so thoroughly that the chief of the Society of 
December 10 suffices for its head, an adventurer blown in from abroad, raised 
on the shield by a drunken soldiery, which he has bought with liquor and 
sausages, and which he must continually ply with sausage anew.[1]``

The bureaucratic system of Napoleon III stirred up, especially toward the end 
of his reign, a strong opposition; this opposition comes through clearly in the 
statements of certain local administrations. The most striking example was the 
famous “Nancy Manifesto,” which demanded extreme decentralization and under 
whose banner there rallied, in 1865, the whole legitimist-clerical opposition 
of the last phase of the Empire. In the name of “freedom and order” the 
Manifesto demanded the liberation of the Commune from the super-vision of the 
prefect, the appointment of the mayor from among the communal councilors, and 
the complete elimination of the arrondissement councils. On the other hand, the 
Manifesto demanded establishing cantonal councils and assigning to them the 
distribution of taxes, and finally, revising the boundaries between departments 
in the spirit of returning to the historical boundaries of the provinces and 
making the departments so revised independent concerning budget and the entire 
administration. This program, which aimed “to create preventive measures 
against revolutions,” to save “freedom compromised by three revolutions,” was 
accepted by all liberal conservatives of the Odilon Barrot type, and its 
advocates were headed by all the leaders of legitimism, i.e., the Bourbon 
party: Béchard, Falioux, Count Montalembert, and finally, the Pretender to the 
crown himself, Count Chambord, who, in his Manifesto of 1871 raised 
“administrative decentralization” to the role of a leading programmatic demand 
on the banner of the white lilies.

The Nancy program provoked sharp resistance from two sides – from the Empire 
and from the extreme Left, Republicans, Democrats, and Socialists. The latter, 
condemning the counter-revolutionary tendency of legitimist “decentralization,” 
said, in the words of Victor Hugo: “Gentlemen, you are forging a chain and you 
say: ‘This is freedom.’” “Therefore,” they exclaimed, “we do not want your 
departmental councils as a legislative authority, nor your permanent 
departmental commissions as administrative authority in which a triple 
feudalism would prevail: the landed interest, the church, and industry, 
interested in keeping the people in ignorance and misery.”[2] Under the pretext 
of freedom, France was to be handed over as prey to bishops, landed 
aristocracy, and factory owners – this is the opinion of contemporary democracy 
and socialists about the 1865 program. Louis Blanc was an especially inflexible 
opponent of decentralization, even to the departments, which he considered an 
artificial creation, though he fervently encouraged the widest self-government 
of the Commune as the natural historical organization and the foundation of the 
state.

In the revolutionary camp the advocates of decentralization, who indeed went 
further than the legitimists, were only adherents of Proudhon, such as 
Desmaret, who distinctly proclaimed the slogan of federalism both in 
application to “the United States of Europe” and to communes and districts 
within the state, as an ideal solution of the social question because it was a 
way of “annihilating power by dividing it.” That the adherents of this 
anarchistic manner of disposing of the bourgeois state have not yet died out in 
France is proved by the book which appeared in 1899, Le principe sauveur par un 
girondin [Cited by Avalov, p.228], in which the author sharply polemicizes 
against the centralism and homogeneity of the modern state, advocating, instead 
of departmental autonomy, the complete dissolution of the state in the spirit 
of federation. New voices in the same spirit have been heard even in later 
years – and enthusiasts for “historical” decentralization still crop up from 
the camp of the Royalists, as is demonstrated by the legitimist pamphlet from 
the time of the Dreyfus affair, La decentralization et la monarchie nationale.

The opposition between the views of the contemporary socialists and the 
anarchistic Proudhon was formulated as early as 1851 by Louis Blanc in his 
pamphlet, La République une et indivisible, in which in a thunderous voice he 
warned the republic against the danger of federalism, opposing to the 
antagonisms of thirty-seven thousand tiny parliaments “la grande tradition 
montagnarde en fait de centralization politique” and “une administration 
surveillée”. As a matter of fact, France at that moment was less threatened by 
the danger of federalism than by its opposite: the coup d’etat of Louis 
Bonaparte and the absolute rule of his prefects.

The same grouping of parties with regard to local administration was also 
reflected in the notorious national assembly in Bordeaux after the fall of the 
Empire. After the destruction of the Paris Commune the main question concerning 
decentralization was whether it could serve as a preventitive against the 
revolutionary movements of the proletariat. First of all, the Third Republic 
hastened to expand the competence of the departments, equipping them – in 
accordance with the leading idea of reaction since the time of the Restoration 
– with special powers against the revolution. The so-called “Loi Tréveneuc” of 
February 15, 1872, bears the significant title “Loi relative au rôle eventuel 
des conseils généraux dans des circonstances exceptionnelles.” On the other 
hand, the powers of the communes were, after a temporary expansion, again 
restricted: whereas in 1871 the communal councils had received the power of 
electing their mayor, after three years they were again deprived of this right, 
and the government of the Third Republic appointed thirty-seven thousand mayors 
through its prefects, thus showing itself a faithful exponent of the 
monarchical traditions.

However, in the foundation of the Third Republic there occurred certain social 
changes which, despite all external obstacles, pushed the matter of local 
autonomy on to completely new paths. Although the independence of the urban and 
rural communes might have been abhorrent to the bourgeois reaction, intimidated 
by the great traditions of the Paris Commune from 1793 to 1871, it eventually 
became an indispensable need, especially since the inception of big industry 
under the wings of the Second Empire. It was then that railroads began to be 
built on a large scale. The artificially fostered and protected big industry 
not only flourished in Paris but in the fifties and sixties it spread into the 
provinces and suburban areas where capitalism sought cheap factory sites and 
cheap labor. Enterprises, industrial centers, financial fortunes mushroomed in 
the hothouse temperature of the Empire, suppressing small industry and 
introducing mass factory labor of women and children. The Paris Stock Exchange 
occupied second place in Europe. Together with this explosion of “original 
accumulation,” as yet unbridled by any protective law – there was still no 
factory inspection – or by labor organization and struggle, there took place in 
France an unparalleled accumulation of mass poverty, disease, and death. 
Suffice it to mention that there were cases when female factory workers were 
paid one sou, i.e., five centimes per day, in a period of general unparalleled 
high prices of the prime necessities of life.[3] The short period of this 
exploiting economy made bourgeois society painfully aware of the lack of any 
public activity to prevent glaring poverty, infectious diseases, danger to life 
and property on public roads, etc. As early as 1856, much was written and 
spoken about the necessity of an official inquiry concerning pauperism in 
France. In 1858, such an inquiry “confidentially” ordered by the government 
predictably came to naught.

The state of public education corresponded more or less with these economic 
conditions. School courses for adults, subsidized by the government under Louis 
Philippe by the tiny sum of 478 francs on the average annually, were, during 
the Empire, deprived of this subsidy and neglected. A certain historian 
described the state of elementary schools in 1863 as follows:

``Thousands of communes are without schools for girls; villages are deprived of 
any schools at all; a large number of others stay briefly in school and do not 
learn anything useful; there are no schools for adults and not a single library 
in the villages; the annual figures show that there is more than 27 percent 
illiteracy; that living conditions of the male and female teachers are 
miserable; that 5,000 female teachers receive less than 400 francs annual 
wages, some receive seventy-five francs per year. Not a single one is entitled 
to retirement pay. Not a single male teacher enjoys a retirement pay which 
would assure him of one franc daily subsistence.``

Among the workers in Paris, the inquiry ordered by the Chamber of Commerce in 
1860 ascertained that fifty thousand, i.e., about 13 percent of the working 
population, was completely illiterate. The Third Republic, whose mission it was 
to build a durable home for the bourgeoisie and first of all to liquidate the 
bankrupt estate taken over from the Empire, found itself faced with a number of 
new tasks: military reform, and in connection with this, a health reform; also 
a reform, or rather creation of public education; reform of transportation, 
completely neglected by the Empire, which was solely occupied with decorating 
and reforming Paris to turn it into a model capital of the Monarchy. Moreover, 
the Third Republic faced the task of acquiring means for these reforms. This 
meant an increase of taxes. However, these went primarily for military 
expenditures, for colonial policy, and especially for the maintenance of the 
bureaucratic apparatus. Without the participation of the local population, 
above all of the communes, the Third Republic would never have been able to 
solve these tasks.

At the same time, big industry’s revolutionizing of conditions under the Empire 
completely changed the role of the department. When Louis Blanc, in the 
national assembly in 1871, declared that the department is an artificial 
product of administrative geometry, this was doubtless an anachronistic view. 
Indeed, in their beginning, emerging from the hands of the constituent 
assembly, the departments were an entirely “free improvisation” of the genius 
of the Revolution, a simple network of symmetrical figures on the map of 
France; and it was exactly in this abolition of all historical boundaries of 
the provinces that the powerful innovating thought, that great “tradition 
montagnarde“ consisted, which, on the ruins of the medieval system, created a 
politically unified modern France. For decades, during the Restoration and 
later, the departments did not have any life of their own; they were used by 
the central government only as branch offices, as the sphere of action of the 
clerk-prefect whose only palpable expression was the obligatory “hôtels de 
préfecture”. However, in modern France, new local needs have brought, in the 
course of time, new institutions surrounding these fortresses of the central 
bureaucracy. The new “departmental interests” which have gained increasing 
recognition are centered around shelters, hospitals, schools, local roads, and 
the procurement of “additional centimes” necessary to meet the costs.

The originally empty framework of the departments, drawn on the grave of the 
medieval particularism of the provinces, became in the course of time, through 
the development of bourgeois France, filled with new social content: the local 
interests of capitalism. The local administration of France by all-powerful 
prefects could suffice in the second half of the nineteenth century only for 
the artificial maintenance of the Empire. The Third Republic was eventually 
forced, in its own interests, to admit the local population to participation in 
this administration and to change the communes and departments from exclusive 
instruments of the central government into organs of democratic autonomy.

However, this shift could be effected only within the Third Republic. In the 
same way that the republican form of government was consolidated in France 
ultimately thanks only to circumstances which permitted the social nucleus of 
this clearly bourgeois political form to be husked from its ideological cocoon, 
from the illusion of “social republic” created by three revolutions in the 
course of almost half a century, so the local self-government had first to be 
liberated from the traditional ideology hostile to it. As late as the 1871 
National Assembly, some advocates of liberalism abhorred the “reactionary” idea 
of autonomy which they persistently identified with feudal decentralization. 
The Monarchist, d’Haussonville, warned his party, reminding it that already 
during the Great Revolution the appearance of adhering to federalism was 
sufficient to send people to the guillotine, while Duvergier de Hauranne 
declared that France was faced with a dilemma: either uniform administration 
represented in each department by a prefect, or a federation of autonomous 
departments. These were the last reverberations of an opinion which weighed on 
people’s minds for three-quarters of a century. Only when, with the fall of the 
Second Empire and the triumph of the Third Republic, the attempts of the 
aristocratic clerical reaction were defeated once and for all and the phantom 
of the federalism of the “historic provinces” was relegated to the realm of 
disembodied spirits did the idea of the relative independence of the 
departments cease to give an impression of federalism which frightened away 
bourgeois liberalism and democracy. And only when the last flicker of the Paris 
Commune revolutionary tradition died out in the cinders of the 1871 Commune and 
under the withered lawn of the “Confederates’ Wall” [“Mur des Fédérés”] at Père 
Lachaise, where the corpses and half-dead bodies of the Commune’s heroes were 
dumped, only then did the idea of communal self-government cease to be 
synonymous with social upheaval in the minds of the bourgeoisie, and the 
Phrygian cap cease to be the symbol of the City Hall. In a word, only when both 
departmental and communal autonomy were able to demonstrate their proper 
historical social value as genuinely modern institutions of the bourgeois 
state, growing out of its own needs and serving its interests, did the 
progressive development of local autonomy in France become possible. The 
organic statute of 1871, supplemented by the law of 1899, at last authorized 
representatives of departments chosen by general elections of the people to 
participate in the administration with a determining voice, and the statute of 
1884 gave a similar right to the communal councils, returning to them the power 
of choosing their own mayor. Slowly and reluctantly, and only in recent times, 
the modern autonomy of France has liberated itself from the iron bonds of 
bureaucracy.

The history of self-government in England followed entirely different paths. 
Instead of the revolutionary change-over from medieval to modern society, we 
sec here, on the contrary, an early compromise which has preserved to this day 
the old remnants of feudalism. Not so much by the shattering of old forms as by 
gradually filling them with new content, bourgeois England has carved out a 
place for itself in medieval England. And perhaps in no other area is this 
process so typical and interesting as in the area of local self-government. At 
first glance, and according to a commonplace expression, England appears as the 
country with the oldest local self-government, nay, as the cradle, the 
classical homeland of self-government, on which the liberalism of the continent 
sought to model itself. In reality, that age-old self-government of England 
belongs to the realm of myths, and the famous old English self-government has 
nothing in common with self-government in the modern sense. Self-government was 
simply a special system of local administration which originated at the time of 
the flowering of feudalism and bears all the hallmarks of its origin. The 
centers of that system are the county, a product of the feudal conditions after 
the Norman Conquest, and the parish, a product of medieval, ecclesiastical 
conditions; while the main person, the soul of the whole county administration, 
is the justice of the peace, an office created in the fourteenth century along 
with the three other county offices: the sheriff, conducting the elections to 
parliament, administering judgments in civil lawsuits, etc.; the coroner, 
conducting inquests in cases of violent death; and finally, the commander of 
the county militia. Among these officials only the secondary figure of the 
coroner is elective; all other officers are appointed by the Crown from among 
the local landed aristocracy. Only landed proprietors with a specified income 
could be appointed to the office of justice of the peace. All these officers 
fulfilled their duties without remuneration, and the purely medieval aspect is 
further indicated by the fact that in their competence they combined judicial 
and executive power. The justice of the peace did everything in the county as 
well as in the parish, as we shall presently see. He ran the courts, assigned 
taxes, issued administrative ordinances, in a word, he represented in his 
person the whole competence of public authority entirely in accordance with the 
feudal attributions of the landed proprietor; the only difference here was his 
appointment by the Crown. The justice of the peace, once appointed, became an 
omnipotent holder of public power: justices of the peace were entirely 
independent of the central government, and in general, not responsible, because 
the old system of English self-government obviously knows nothing of another 
basic feature of modern administration: the judicial responsibility of 
officials and the supervision by the central authority over local offices. Any 
participation of the local population in this administration was out of the 
question. If, therefore, the ancient English self-government may be regarded as 
a kind of autonomy, this can be done only in the sense that it was a system of 
unrestricted autonomy of the landed aristocracy, who held in their hands the 
complete public power in the county.

The first undermining of this medieval system of administration coincides with 
the reign of Elizabeth, i.e., the period of that shattering revolution in rural 
property relations which inaugurated the capitalistic era in England. Violent 
expropriations of the peasantry by the aristocracy on the broadest scale, the 
supersession of agriculture by sheep-herding, the secularization of church 
estates which were appropriated by the aristocracy, all this suddenly created 
an immense rural proletariat, and in consequence, poverty, beggary, and public 
robbery. The first triumphal steps of capital shook the foundations of the 
whole society and England was forced to face a new threat – pauperism. There 
began a crusade against vagrancy, beggary, and looting, which extends in a 
bloodstained streak until the middle of the nineteenth century. Since, however, 
prisons, branding with hot irons, and even the gallows proved an entirely 
insufficient medicine against the new plague, summary convictions came into 
being in England and also “public philanthropy”; next to the gallows at the 
cross-roads arose the parish workhouse. The modern phenomenon of mass pauperism 
was the first problem transcending the powers and means of the medieval system 
of administration as carried out by the self-government of the aristocracy. The 
solution adopted was to shift the new burden to new shoulders of the middle 
classes, the wealthy bourgeoisie. Now the mold-covered church parish was called 
to a new role – care of the poor. In the peculiar English administration, the 
parish is not only a rural but also an urban organization, so that to this day 
the parish system overlaps the modern administrative network in the big cities, 
creating a great chaos of competences.

At the end of the sixteenth century, a tax for the poor was introduced in the 
parish, and this tax gradually became the cornerstone of the tax system of the 
commune. The poor rates grew from £900,000 sterling at the end of the 
seventeenth century to £7,870,801 sterling in 1881. The collection and 
administration of these funds, the organization of assistance and workhouses, 
called forth a new organization of the communal office: and to it there also 
fell presently another important public function which was likewise caused b 
the needs of the nascent capitalist economy: supervision of roads. This 
organization also comprised, from then on, besides the rector who was at the 
head and two church wardens elected by the commune, two overseers of the poor, 
designated by the justice of the peace, and one surveyor of the highways, also 
designated by the justice of the peace. As we see, this was still the use of 
the old self-government apparatus for modern purposes. The landed aristocracy 
in the persons of the justices of the peace preserved power in their hands; 
only the material burden fell on the bourgeoisie. The commune had to carry the 
burden of the poor tax; however, it didn’t have any voice in the apportionment 
of the tax. The latter function was an attribute of the justice of the peace 
and of the communal overseers subject to him.

In such a state the local administration survived until the nineteenth century. 
A few attempts at admitting the population to participation in this 
administration were undertaken at the beginning of that century but came to 
nothing.

In the meantime, capitalism in England entered new paths: big machine industry 
celebrated its triumphal entry and undertook an assault on the old fortress of 
self-government, which the crumbling structure could not withstand.

The violent growth of factory industry at the end of the eighteenth and the 
beginning of the nineteenth century caused a complete upheaval in the 
conditions of England’s social life. The immense influx of the rural 
proletariat to the cities soon brought about such a concentration of people and 
such a housing shortage in the industrial cities that the workers’ districts 
became abhorrent slums, dark, stinking, filthy, plague-ridden. Sickness among 
the population assumed terrifying proportions. In Scotland and Ireland an 
outbreak of typhoid took place regularly after each price increase and each 
industrial crisis. In Edinburgh and Glasgow, for instance as stated by Engels 
in his classic work, The Condition of the Working Class in England in 1844, in 
the year 1817, 6,000 persons fell ill; in 1826 and 1837, 10,000 each; in 1842, 
in Glasgow alone, 32,000, i.e., 12 percent of the entire population. In 
Ireland, in 1817, 39,000 persons fell ill with typhoid, in 1819, 60,000; in the 
main industrial cities of counties Cork and Limerick, one-seventh and 
one-fourth respectively of the entire population fell victim in those years to 
the epidemic. In London and Manchester, malaria was endemic. In the latter 
city, it was officially stated that three-quarters of the population needed 
medical help every year, and mortality among children up to five reached, in 
the industrial city of Leeds in 1832, the terrifying figure of 5,286 out of a 
population of 100,000. The lack of hospitals and medical help, housing 
shortages, and undernourishment of the proletariat became a public threat.

In no less a degree, the intellectual neglect of the mass of the people became 
a public plague when big industry, having concentrated immense crowds of the 
proletariat under its command, made them a prey of spiritual savages. The 
textile industry especially, which was the first to introduce mass labor of 
women and children at the lowest age and which made impossible any home 
education, however rudimentary, made the filling of this gap, i.e., the 
creation of elementary schools, a public need. However, the state performed 
these tasks to a minimal degree. At the beginning of the fourth decade [of the 
century], out of the budget of England amounting to £55 million, public 
education is allotted the ridiculous sum of £40,000. Education was left mainly 
to private initiative, especially of the church, and became mostly an 
instrument of bigotry and a weapon of sectarian struggle. In Sunday schools, 
the only ones accessible to working-class children, the latter were often not 
even taught reading and writing, as occupations unworthy of Sunday; while in 
the private schools, as was demonstrated by a parliamentary inquiry, the 
teachers themselves often did not know how to read or write. In general, the 
picture revealed by the famous Children Employment Commission showed the new 
capitalistic England as a scene of ruin and destruction, a wreckage of the 
entire antiquated, traditional, social structure. The great social reform was 
accomplished for the purpose of establishing tolerable living conditions for 
the new host, i.e., for the capitalistic bourgeoisie. The elimination of the 
most threatening symptoms of pauperism, the provision of public hygiene, 
elementary education, etc. became an urgent task. However, this task could be 
achieved only when both in state policy and in the entire administration the 
exclusive rule of the landed aristocracy was abolished and yielded to the rule 
of the industrial bourgeoisie. The election reform of 1832, which broke the 
political power of the Tories, is also the date from which begins 
self-government in England in the modern sense, i.e., self-government based on 
the participation of the population in the local administration, and on paid, 
responsible officials in the role of executor of its will under the supervision 
and control of the central authority. The medieval division of the state into 
counties and parishes corresponded to the new grouping of the population and 
local needs and interests as little as the medieval offices of the justice of 
the peace and parish councils. But while the revolutionary French liberalism 
swept from the country the historic provinces and in their place erected a 
homogeneous France with new administrative divisions, the conservative English 
liberalism created only a new administrative network – inside, beside, and 
through the old divisions, without formally abolishing them. The peculiarity of 
English self-government consists in the fact that, unable to utilize the 
completely in adequate framework of traditional self-government, it created a 
new kind of base: special communal associations of the population for each of 
the basic functions of self government.

Thus, the law of 1834 establishes new “poor law unions”, comprising several 
parishes whose population jointly elects, on the basis of a six-class electoral 
law, in accordance with the taxes paid, a separate board of guardians for each 
union. This body decides the whole matter of welfare, building of workhouses, 
issuing doles, etc.; it also hires and pays the officials who carry out its 
decisions. The old office of the parish overseer of the poor changed from an 
honorary to a paid one, and was reduced to the function of imposing and 
collecting taxes assigned by the board.

According to the same model, but quite independently, the law of 1847 created a 
new, broad organization to take care of public health and supervision of 
buildings, cleanliness of streets and houses, water supply, and food marketing. 
Also for this purpose new associations of the local population with 
representatives elected by it were established. On the basis of the Public 
Health Act of 1875, England – with the exception of the capital – is divided 
into urban and rural sanitary districts. The organ of representation is, in the 
urban districts, the city council; in the boroughs, special local boards of 
health; and in the rural districts health is supervised by the board of 
guardians. All these boards decide all matters pertaining to health and hire 
salaried officers who carry out the resolutions of the board.

The administration of local transportation also followed the same lines but 
independently of the two bodies mentioned above. For this purpose, highway 
districts were created, composed of several parishes whose population elects 
separate highway boards. In many rural districts, transportation is the concern 
of the local board of health, or the board of guardians which administers both 
transportation and poor relief. The highway boards or the boards of guardians 
decide about transportation enterprises and hire a paid district-surveyor as 
the official carrying out their orders. And so the office of the former 
honorary highway surveyor vanished.

Finally, education was also entrusted to a specail self-governing organization. 
Individual parishes, cities and the capital form as many school districts. 
However, the board of education of the council of state has the right to 
combine several urban parishes into one district. Every district elects a 
school board entrusted with supervision of elementary education: it makes 
decisions concerning tuition-free schooling and the hiring of officials and 
teachers.

In this way there came into being, quite independently from the old 
organization of self-government, new, multiple, autonomous organizations which, 
precisely because they originated not by way of a bold revolutionary reform but 
as discrete patchwork, formed an extremely complex and involved system of often 
overlapping areas of competence. However, it is characteristic for the classic 
country of capitalist economy that the axis around which this modern 
self-government was crystallized – so far clearly on the lowest level in the 
rural commune – was the organization of public welfare, the organization for 
combating pauperism: the “poor” was, in England, to the middle of the 
nineteenth century, the official synonym for the worker, just as in a later 
time of orderly and modernized conditions, the sober expression “hands” became 
such a synonym. Beside this new organization of self-government, the old 
counties with their justices of the peace became a relic. The justice of the 
peace fell to the subordinate role of participant in the local council, and 
supervision of administration was left him only to a certain extent in matters 
of highways. When, however, the local administration passed from the hands of 
the justice appointed by the Crown to the elected representatives of the local 
population, the administrative decentralization by no means increased, but on 
the contrary, was eliminated. If, in the old days, the justice of the peace was 
an all-powerful master in the council, entirely independent of the central 
government, at present, the local government is subject on the one hand to the 
uniform parliamentary legislation, and on the other to strict control by the 
central administrative authorities. The Local Government Board specially 
created for this purpose controls the activity of the local boards of guardians 
and boards of health through visiting inspectors, while the school boards are 
subject to the board of education of the state council.

Also, urban self-government in England is a product of most recent times. Only 
slight traces survived to modern times of the communal independence of the 
medieval city. The modern city, an outcome of the capitalist economy of the 
nineteenth century, made a new urban organization indispensable: initiated by 
the law of 1835, it was not finally established until 1882.

The history of self-government in Germany and Austria lacks such distinctive 
features as that of France or England; however, it generally followed the same 
lines. In both countries, the division into cities and rural communes resulting 
from the medieval development brought about a highly developed self-government 
of the cities and their political independence, and also created the political 
split, perhaps the greatest in Europe, of the state territory into independent 
feudal areas. After the sixteenth century, and especially in the eighteenth 
century, during the time of enlightened absolutism, the cities completely lost 
their independence and fell under the authority of the state. At the same time, 
the rural communes lost their traditional self-governing institutions, having 
completely fallen, through the growth of serfdom, under the authority of 
landowners. Although much later than in France, absolutism nevertheless, as the 
creator of a unified state authority and territory, triumphed in Germany in the 
eighteenth century. At the beginning of the nineteenth century, bureaucratic 
centralism is everywhere victorious.

However, before long, in connection with the rising big-industrial production 
and the aspiration of the bourgeoisie to introduce modern conditions into the 
state, the development of local self-government on new principles begins. The 
first general law of this kind originated in Austria during the March 
Revolution. Actually, however, the foundations of the present self-government 
were laid in Austria by the statute of 1862; in the respective crownlands, 
particular communal laws came into being later through legislation of the Diet.

In Germany, there prevails French law, partly derived from Napoleonic times, 
which does not distinguish between the urban and rural commune: for instance, 
in the Rhineland, in the Bavarian Palatinate, Hesse, Thuringia, etc. On the 
other hind, the Prussian model prevailing in western and eastern Germany is an 
independent product. Although the Prussian urban law dates already from 1808, 
the actual period of the development of the present self-government in Prussia 
fell in the sixties and the main reforms in the seventies and eighties. Among 
the main areas of urban administration – province, district (Kreis), and 
commune – only the last has well-developed, self-governing institutions, i.e., 
extensive power of the representatives elected by the population; in the 
remaining ones, representative bodies (Kreistag, Provinzallandtag) exist but 
they are rather modernized, medieval class diets and their competence is 
extremely limited by the competence of officials appointed by the Crown, such 
as Regierungspräsident in the province, and Landrat in the district.

Local self-government in Russia constitutes one of the most outstanding 
attempts of absolutism which, in the famous “liberal reforms” after the 
Sebastopol catastrophe, aimed at adjusting the institutions of oriental 
despotism to the social needs of modern capitalist economy. Between the peasant 
reform and the reform of the courts at the threshold of the “renewed” Russia of 
Alexander II, stands the law which created the territorial institutions. 
Modeled on the newly established self-governing institutions of Prussia, the 
system of the Russian “zemstvo” is a parody of English self-government; it 
entrusts the entire local administration to the wealthy nobility, and at the 
same time subjects this self-government of the nobility to strict police 
supervision and the decisive authority of tsarist bureaucracy.

The law governing elections to the county and gubernial territorial councils 
happily combines, in the tri-curial system and indirect elections, the class 
principle with the census principle. It makes the county marshal of the 
nobility the ex-officio chairman in the district council, and securing in it to 
the nobility curia half of the seats suspends over all resolutions of the 
council, like a Damocles sword, the threatening veto of the governor.

As a result of this peculiarity of Russia’s social development, which, in the 
period before 1905 made not the urban bourgeoisie, but certain strata of the 
nobility the advocates of “liberal dreams” however pale, even this parody of 
self-governing institutions represented by the Russian zemstvos has become, in 
the hands of the nobility, a framework for serious social and cultural 
activity. However, the sharp clash that immediately arose between liberalism, 
nestling in the territorial administration, on the one hand, and the 
bureaucracy and government on the other, glaringly illuminated the genuine 
contradiction between modern self-government and the medieval state apparatus 
of absolutisni. Beginning a few years after the introduction of the zemstvos, 
the collision with the power of the governors extends like a red thread through 
the history of self-government in Russia, oscillating between the deportation 
of recalcitrant council chairmen to more or less distant regions; and the 
boldest dreams of Russian liberals in the form of an all-Russian Congress of 
zemstvos which was supposed to be transformed into a constituent assembly that 
would abolish absolutism in a peaceful manner.

The few years of the action of the [1905] revolution solved this historical 
collision, violently moving the Russian nobility to the side of reaction and 
depriving the parody of territorial self-government of any mystifying 
resemblances to liberalism. Thus was clearly demonstrated the impossibility of 
reconciling the democratic self-government indispensable In a bourgeois society 
with the rule of absolutism, as well as the impossibility of grafting modern 
bourgeois democracy onto the class action of the territorial nobility and its 
institutions. Local self-government in the modern sense in only one of the 
details of the general political program whose implementation in the entire 
state constitutes the task of the revolution.

In particular, the Kingdom of Poland and Lithuania must participate in this 
political reform. This Kingdom is at sent a unique example of a country with a 
highly developed bourgeois economy which, however, is deprived of any traces of 
local self-government.

In ancient Poland, a country of natural economy and gentry rule, there 
obviously was no local self-government. Polish district and provincial councils 
possessed only functions connected with elections to the sejm. Although cities 
possessed their Magdeburg laws, imported from Germany and standing outside the 
national law, in the seventeenth and eighteenth centuries, with the complete 
decline of cities, the majority of them fell under the law of serfdom or 
regressed to the status of rural settlements and communes, and in consequence 
urban self-government disappeared.

The Duchy of Warsaw, which was an experiment of Napoleon, was endowed with a 
system of self-government bodily transferred from France, not the one which was 
the product of revolution, but a self-government squeezed in the clamps of the 
Statute of Pluvois 28. The Duchy was divided into departments, counties, and 
communes with “municipal” self-governments and “prefects” who appointed 
municipal councillors from a list of candidates elected at county diets, which 
was a slavish copy of the Napoleonic “listes de confiance” in the department. 
These bodies, destined mainly to impose state taxes, had only advisory 
functions otherwise, and lacked any executive organs.

In the Congress Kingdom, the French apparatus was completely abolished; only 
the departments remained, renamed “voyvodship.” However, they still had no 
self-governing functions, only a certain influence on the election of judges 
and administrative officials. After the November Insurrection [1830], even this 
remnant of self-governing forms was abolished, and with the exception of the 
short period of Wielopolski’s experiment in 1861, when provincial and county as 
well as urban councils were created on the basis of indirect, multilevel 
elections and without any executive organs, the country to this day remains 
without any form of self-government. A weak class commune crippled by the 
government is the only relic in this field. Consequently, the Kingdom of Poland 
represents at present, after a hundred years of the operation of Russian 
absolutism, some analogy to that tabula rasa which the Great Revolution created 
in France in order to erect on this ground a radical and democratic reform of 
self-government unrestricted by any historical survivals.

III

Karl Kautsky characterizes the basic attitude of Social Democracy to the 
question of autonomy as follows:

``The centralization of the legislative process did not by any means involve 
the complete centralization of administration. On the contrary. The same 
classes which needed unification of the laws were obliged thereafter to bring 
the state power under their control. However, this took place only incompletely 
under the parliamentary form of government, in which the government is 
dependent on the legislature. The administration, with the whole bureaucratic 
apparatus at its disposal, was nominally subordinate to the central 
legislature, but the executive often turned out to be stronger in practice. The 
administration influences the voters in the legislature through its bureaucracy 
and through its power in local matters; it corrupts the legislators through its 
power to do them favors. However, the strongly centralized bureaucracy shows 
itself less and less able to cope with the increasing tasks of the state 
administration. It is overcome by them. The results are: fumbling, delays, 
postponing the most important matters, complete misunderstanding of the rapidly 
changing needs of practical life, massive waste of time and labor in 
superfluous pencil work. These are the rapidly increasing shortcomings of 
bureaucratic centralism.

Thus there arises, along with the striving for uniformity of legislation, after 
the several provincial legislatures have been superseded by a central 
parliament, a striving for decentralization of administration, for local 
administration of the provinces and communes. The one and the other are 
characteristic of the modern state.

“This self-government does not mean the restoration of medieval particularism. 
The commune [Gemeinde] and likewise the province) does not become a 
self-sufficient entity as it once was. It remains a component part of the great 
whole, the nation, [Here used as synonymous with “state.” – Kautsky] and has to 
work for it and within the limits that it sets. The rights and duties of the 
individual communes as against the state are not laid down in special treaties. 
They are a product of the general system of laws, determined for all by the 
central power of the state; they are determined by the interests of the whole 
state or the nation, not by those of the several communes.” – K. Kautsky, Der 
Parlamentarismus, die Volksgesetzgebung und die Sozialdemokratie, p.48.

If Comrade Stampfer will keep separate the centralization of administration and 
the centralization of the legislative process, he will find that the paths 
being followed by German and Austrian Social Democracy respectively are not 
diverging at all, but are going in the same direction as the whole of modern 
democracy. Opposition to all special privileges in the country, strengthening 
of the central legislature at the expense of the provincial parliaments as well 
as of the government administration; weakening of the central administration 
both through the strengthening of the central legislature and through the 
devolution of self-administration to the communes and provinces – this latter 
process taking, in Austria, in accordance with its own local conditions, the 
form of self-administration of the nationalities – but a self-administration 
regulated for the whole country by the central legislature along uniform lines: 
that is, in spite of all historical and other social differences, in Germany 
and Austria the position of Social Democracy on the question of centralism and 
particularism.[5]``

We have quoted the above extensive argument of Kautsky on the question we are 
examining but not because we unreservedly share his views. The leading idea of 
this argument: the division of modern state centralism into administrative and 
legislative, the rejection of the former and the absolute reognition of the 
latter, appears to us somewhat too formalistic and not quite precise. Local 
autonomy – provincial, municipal, and communal – does not at all do away with 
administrative centralism: autonomy covers only strictly local matters, while 
the administration of the state as a whole -mains in the hands of the central 
authority, which, even in such democratic states as Switzerland, shows a 
constant tendency to extend its competence.

An outstanding feature of modern administration in contradistinction to 
medieval particularism is precisely the strict supervision by central 
institutions and the subordination of the local administration to the uniform 
direction and control the state authorities. A typical illustration of this 
arrangement is the dependence of the modern self-governing officials in England 
on the central offices and even the special creation over them of a central 
Local Government Board which eliminates genuine administrative decentralization 
represented by the old system in which, it will be recalled, the all-powerful 
justices of the peace were entirely independent of the central government. In 
the same way, the most recent development of self-government in France paves 
anew the way to democratization, and at the same time gradually eliminates the 
independence of the prefect from the central ministries, a system that had 
characterized the government of the Second Empire.

The above phenomenon also completely corresponds to the general direction of 
political development. A strong central government is an institution peculiar 
not only to the epoch of absolutism at the dawn of bourgeois development but 
also to bourgeois society itself in its highest stage, flowering, and decline. 
The more external policy – commercial, aggressive, colonial – becomes the axis 
of the life of capitalism, the more we enter into the period of imperialistic 
“global” policy, which is a normal phase of the development of bourgeois 
economy, and the more capitalism needs a strong authority, a powerful central 
government which concentrates in its hands all the resources of the state for 
the protection of its interests outside. Hence, modern autonomy, even in its 
widest application, finds definite barriers in all those attributes of power 
which are related to the foreign policy of a state.

On the other hand, autonomy itself puts up barriers to legislative 
centralization, because without certain legislative competences, even narrowly 
outlined and purely local, no self-government is possible. The power of issuing 
within a certain sphere, on its own initiative, laws binding for the 
population, and not merely supervising the execution of laws issued by the 
central legislative body, constitutes precisely the soul and core of 
self-government in the modern democratic sense – it forms the basic function of 
municipal and communal councils as well as of provincial diets or departmental 
councils. Only when the latter in France acquired the right of deciding in the 
last instance about their problems instead of submitting their opinions in a 
consultative capacity, and particularly when they acquired the right of 
drafting their independent budget, only from that time dates the real beginning 
of the autonomy of the departments. In the same way, the foundation of urban 
self-government in Germany is the right of establishing the budget of the 
towns, and in connection with this the independent fixing of supplements to the 
state taxes and also the introduction of new communal taxes (although within 
limits fixed by state law). Further, when, for instance, the city council of 
Berlin or Paris issues binding regulations concerning the building code, 
insurance duties for home industry, employment and unemployment aid, the city 
sewage-disposal system, communications, etc., all these are legislative 
activities. The axis of the incessant struggle between local representatives 
and organs of the central administration is the democratic tendency constantly 
to expand the legislative competence of the elected organs and to reduce the 
administrative competence of the appointed organs.

The attitude to local autonomy – its legislative and administrative functions – 
constitutes the theoretical basis of the political fight which has been going 
on for a long time between Social Democracy on the one hand and the government 
and the bourgeois parties on the other. The latter hold a uniform view on the 
matter in question except for a small group of extreme-left progressives. While 
the theory of bourgeois reaction maintains that local self-government is, by 
its nature, only a localization of state administrations, that the commune, 
district, or province as a financial unit is called to administer the state 
property, Social Democracy defends the view that a commune, district, or 
province is a social body called upon to take care – in a local sphere – of a 
number of social matters and not only financial ones. The practical conclusion 
of these two theories is that the bourgeois parties insist that electoral 
rights to self-governing bodies should be limited by a property qualification, 
while Social Democracy calls for a universal and equal electoral right for the 
whole population. Generally speaking, the progress of modern self government 
toward democracy can be measured by the expansion of the groups of population 
which participate in self-government by way of elections, as well as by the 
degree to which their representative bodies extend their competence. The 
transfer of some activities from the administration to the legislative, 
representative bodies is a measure extending the latter’s competence. It seems 
therefore that the centralized state apparatus can be separated from local 
self-government, and modern self-government from feudal and petit bourgeois 
particularism. This can be done, in our opinion, not by a formalistic approach, 
whereby the legislative and the administrative powers are separated, but by 
separating some spheres of social life – namely those which constitute the core 
of a capitalist economy and of a big bourgeois state – from the sphere of local 
interests.

In particular, Kautsky’s formula including national autonomy under the general 
heading of local self-government would, in view of his theory about legislative 
centralization lead Social Democracy to refuse to recognize regional diets on 
the ground that they were a manifestation of legislative decentralization, 
i.e., medieval particularism. Kautsky’s arguments are in their essence 
extremely valuable as an indication concerning the general tendency in Social 
Democratic policy, concerning its basic standpoint toward centralism and big 
power policy on the one hand and particularistic tendencies on the other. But 
precisely from the same foundations from which, in all capitalistic states, 
grows local self-government, there also grows in certain conditions national 
autonomy, with local legislation as an independent manifestation of modern 
social development, which has as little in common with medieval particularism 
as the present-day city council has with a parliament of the ancient Hanseatic 
republic.



5. The National Question and Autonomy

Capitalism transforms social life from the material foundations up to the top – 
the cultural aspects. It has produced a whole series of entirely new economic 
phenomena: big industry, machine production, proletarization, concentration of 
property, industrial crises, capitalist monopolies, modern industry, labor of 
women and children, etc. Capitalism has produced a new center of social life: 
the big city, as well as a new social class: the professional intelligentsia. 
Capitalist economy with its highly developed division of labor and constant 
progress of technology needs a large specialized staff of employees with 
technical training: engineers, chemists, architects, electricians, etc. 
Capitalist industry and commerce need a whole army of lawyers: attorneys, 
notaries, judges, etc. Bourgeois management, especially in big cities, has made 
health a public matter and developed for its service large numbers of 
physicians, pharmacists, midwives, dentists, as well as public hospitals with 
appropriate staffs. Capitalist production requires not only specially trained 
production managers but universal, elementary, popular education, both to raise 
the general cultural level of the people which creates ever growing needs, and 
consequently demand for mass articles, and to develop a properly educated and 
intelligent worker capable of operating large-scale industry. Hence, bourgeois 
society everywhere, popular education and vocational training are 
indispensable. Consequently we see public schools and numerous elementary, 
secondary, and college teachers, libraries, reading rooms, etc.

Capitalistic production and participation in the world market are impossible 
without appropriately extensive, speedy, and constant communication – both 
material and cultural. Bourgeois society has thus created on the one hand 
railroads and modern postal and telegraph services, and on the other based on 
these material foundations – a periodical press, a social phenomenon which 
before was entirely unknown. To work for the press there has come into being in 
bourgeois society a numerous category of professional journalists and 
publicists. Capitalism has made any manifestation of human energy, including 
artistic creativity, an object of commerce, while on the other hand, by making 
art objects accessible to the broad masses of the people through mass 
production, it has made art an everyday need of at least urban society. 
Theater, music, painting, sculpture, which, in the period of natural economy 
had been a monopoly and private luxury of individual, powerful sponsors, are in 
bourgeois society a public institution and part and parcel of the normal daily 
life of the urban population. The worker’s cultural needs are met in the 
taverns or beer gardens and by cheap book illustrations and junky ornaments; he 
adorns his person and his lodging with artistic tawdriness, while the 
bourgeoisie has at its disposal philharmonics, first-rate theaters, works of 
genius, and objects of elegance. However, the one and the other kind of 
consumption calls forth a numerous class of artists and artistic producers.

In this way capitalism creates a whole new culture: public education, 
development of science, the flowering of learning, journalism, a specifically 
geared art. However, these are not just mechanical appendages to the bare 
process of production or mechanically separated lifeless parts. The culture of 
bourgeois society itself constitutes a living and to some extent autonomous 
entity. In order to exist or develop, this society not only needs certain 
relationships of production, exchange, a nd communication, but it also creates 
a certain set of intellectual relations within the framework of contradictory 
class interests. If the class struggle is a natural product of the capitalist 
economy then its natural needs are the conditions that mike this class struggle 
possible; hence not only modern political forms, democracy, parliamentarianism, 
but also open public life, with an open exchange of views and conflicting 
convictions, an intense intellectual life, which alone makes the struggle of 
classes and parties possible. Popular education, journalism, science, art – 
growing at first within the framework of capitalist production – become in 
themselves an indispensable need and condition of existence of modern society. 
Schools, libraries, newspapers, theaters, public lectures, public discussions 
grow into the normal conditions of life, into the indispensable intellectual 
atmosphere of each member of the modern, particularly urban society, even 
outside the connection of these phenomena with economic conditions. In a word, 
the vulgar material process of capitalism creates a whole new ideological 
“superstructure” with an existence and development which are to some extent 
autonomous.

However, capitalism does not create that intellectual spirit in the air or in 
the theoretical void of abstraction, but in a definite territory, a definite 
social environment, a definite language, within the framework of certain 
traditions, in a word, within definite national forms. Consequently, by that 
very culture it sets apart a certain territory and a certain population as a 
cultural national entity in which it creates a special, closer cohesion and 
connection of intellectual interests.

Any ideology is basically only a superstructure of the material and class 
conditions of a given epoch. However, at the same time, the ideology of each 
epoch harks back to the ideological results of the preceding epochs, while on 
the other hand it has its own logical development in a certain area. This is 
illustrated by the sciences as well as by religion, philosophy, and art.

The cultural and aesthetic values created by capitalism in a given environment 
not only assume a certain national quality through the main organ of cultural 
production, i.e., the language, but merge with the traditional culture of 
society, whose history becomes saturated with its distinct cultural 
characteristics; in a word, this culture turns into a national culture with an 
existence and development of its own. The basic features and foundations of 
modern culture in all bourgeois countries are common, international, and the 
tendency of contemporary development is doubtless toward an ever greater 
community of international culture. However, within the framework of this 
highly cosmopolitan, bourgeois culture, French is clearly distinguished from 
English culture, German from Dutch, Polish from Russian, as so many separate 
types.

The borderlines of historical stages and the historical “seams” are least 
detectable in the development of an ideology.[1] Because the modern capitalist 
culture is an heir to and continuator of earlier cultures, what develops is the 
continuity and monolithic quality of a national culture which, on the surface, 
shows no connection with the period of capitalist economy and bourgeois rule. 
For the phrasemonger of the “National Democracy,” or mindless “sociologist” of 
social patriotism, the culture of present-day Poland is, in its core, the same 
unchanged “culture of the Polish nation” as at the time of Batory or Stanislas 
Augustus, while Straszewicz, Swiatochowski, and Sienkiewicz are direct-line 
spiritual heirs of Rey of Nagtowice, Pasek, and Mickiewicz. In fact, however, 
the literature and the press in modern, bourgeois Poland are appallingly 
trivial; Polish science and the entire Polish culture are appallingly poor: 
they belong in a new historical stage completely alien in spirit and content to 
the old culture of feudal Poland, mirrored in its last monumental work, Pan 
Tadeusz. Present-day Polish culture, in all its destitution, is a modern 
product of the same capitalist development that chained Poland to Russia and 
placed at the head of society, in the role of ruling class, a rabble of 
heterogeneous money-makers without a past, without a revolutionary tradition, 
and professional traitors to the national cause. The present-day bourgeois 
learning, art, and journalism of Poland are in spirit and content ideological 
hieroglyphs from which a materialist historian reads the history of the fall of 
gentry Poland, the history of “organic work,” conciliation, National Democracy, 
deputations, memoranda, up to the “national” elections to the tsarist Duma 
under a state of emergency, and “national” teens to murder Polish Socialist 
workers. Capitalism created modern Polish national culture, annihilating in the 
same process Polish national independence.

Capitalism annihilated Polish national independence but at the same time 
created modern Polish national culture. This national culture is a product 
indispensable within the frame-work of bourgeois Poland; its existence and 
development are a historical necessity, connected with the capitalistic 
development itself. The development of capitalism, which chained Poland to 
Russia by socio-economic ties, undermined Russian absolutism, united and 
revolutionized the Russian and Polish proletariat as a class called upon to 
overthrow absolutism, and in this way created, under the Tsars, the 
indispensable preconditions for achieving political freedom. But within the 
framework and against the background of this general tendency toward the 
democratization of the state, capitalism at the same time knit more closely the 
socio-economic and cultural-national life of the Polish kingdom, thus preparing 
the objective conditions for the realization of Polish national autonomy.

As we have seen, the requirements of the capitalist system lead with historic 
necessity in all modern states to the development of local self-government 
through the participation of the people in carrying out socio-political 
functions on all levels, from the commune to the district and province. Where, 
however, inside a modern state there exist distinct nationality districts 
constituting at the same time territories with certain economic and social 
distinctions, the same requirements of the bourgeois economy make 
self-government on the highest, country-wide level, indispensable. On this 
level, local self-government is also transformed, as a result of a new factor, 
national-cultural distinctness, into a special type of democratic institution 
applicable only in quite specific conditions.

The Moscow-Vladimir industrial district, with its economic achievements, local 
specific interests, and concentration of population, differs certainly as much 
from the vast Russian space surrounding it as does the Kingdom of Poland. 
However, the factor distinguishing our country from the central district of 
Russia in a decisive way, is the distinctness of the cultural-national 
existence, which creates a whole sphere of separate common interests besides 
purely economic and social ones. Just as an urban or village commune, district, 
department or gubernia, province or region must possess, in keeping with the 
spirit of modern self-government, a certain range of local legislation 
contained within the framework of state laws, national self-government, in the 
spirit of democracy, must be based on the representation of the people and 
their power of local legislation within the framework of state laws, to satisfy 
the national socio-economic and cultural-national needs.

The entire modern culture is, above all, a class, bourgeois culture. Learning 
and art, school and theater, professional intelligentsia, the press – all 
primarily serve the bourgeois society, are imbued with its principles, its 
spirit, its tendency. But the institutions of the bourgeois system, like the 
capitalist development itself, are, in the spirit of the historical dialectic, 
twofold, double-edged phenomena: the means of class development and rule are at 
the same time so many means for the rise of the proletariat as a class to the 
struggle for emancipation, for the abolition of bourgeois rule. Political 
freedom, parliamentarianism are, in all present-day states, tools for building 
up capitalism and the interests of the bourgeoisie as the ruling class. 
However, the same democratic institutions and bourgeois parliamentarianism are, 
at a certain level, an indispensable school of the proletariat’s political and 
class maturity, a condition of organizing it into a Social Democratic party, of 
training it in open class struggle.

The same applies to the sphere of the intellect. The basic school, elementary 
education, is necessary for bourgeois society in order to create appropriate 
mass consumption as well as an appropriate contingent of able working hands. 
But the same school and education become the basic tools of the proletariat as 
a revolutionary class. The social, historical, philosophical, and natural 
sciences are today the ideological products of the bourgeoisie and expressions 
of its needs and class tendencies. But on a certain level of its development 
the working class recognizes that for it also “knowledge is power” – not in the 
tasteless sense of bourgeois individualism and its preachings of 
“industriousness and diligence” as a means of achieving “happiness,” but in the 
sense of knowledge as a lever of class struggle, as the revolutionary 
consciousness of the working masses. Finally, socialism, which links the 
interest of the workers as a class with the development and future of mankind 
as a great cultural brotherhood, produces a particular affinity of the 
proletarian struggle with the interests of culture as a whole, and causes the 
seemingly contradictory and paradoxical phenomenon that the conscious 
proletariat is today in all countries the most ardent and idealistic advocate 
of the interests of learning and art, the same bourgeois culture of which it is 
today the disinherited stepchild.

The national autonomy of the Kingdom of Poland is primarily necessary for the 
Polish bourgeoisie to strengthen its class rule and to develop its institutions 
in order to exploit and oppress with no restrictions whatsoever. In the same 
way as the modern state-political parliamentary institutions, and, as their 
corollary, the institutions of local self-government are on a certain level an 
indispensable tool of bourgeois rule and a close harmonization of all state and 
social functions with the interests of the bourgeoisie, in a narrower sense, 
national autonomy is an indispensable tool of the strict application of the 
social functions in a certain territory to the special bourgeois interests of 
that territory. Absolutism, which safe-guarded the crudest although the most 
important vital interest of the ruling classes, viz., the limitless 
exploitation of the working strata, naturally, at the same time, sacrificed to 
its own interests and working methods all subtle interests and forms of 
bourgeois rule, i.e., treated them with Asiatic ruthlessness. Political liberty 
and self-government will eventually give the Polish bourgeoisie the possibility 
of utilizing a number of presently neglected social functions – schools, 
religious worship, and the entire cultural-spiritual life of the country – for 
its own class interests. By manning all offices of the administration, 
judiciary, and politics, the bourgeoisie will be able to assimilate genuinely 
these natural organs of class rule with the spirit and home needs of bourgeois 
society, and so turn them into flexible, accurate, and subtle tools of the 
Polish ruling classes. National autonomy, as a part of all-state political 
freedom, is, in a word, the most mature political form of bourgeois rule in 
Poland.

However, precisely for this reason, autonomy is an indispensable class need of 
the Polish proletariat. The riper the bourgeois institutions grow, the deeper 
they penetrate the social functions, the more ground they cover within the 
variegated intellectual and aesthetic sphere, the broader grows the battlefield 
and the bigger the number of firing lines wherefrom the proletariat conducts 
the class struggle. The more unrestrictedly and efficiently the development of 
bourgeois society proceeds, the more courageously and surely advances the 
consciousness, political maturity, and unification of the proletariat as a 
class.

The Polish proletariat needs for its class struggle all the components of which 
a spiritual culture is made; primarily, its interests, essentially based on the 
solidarity of nations and striving toward it, require the elimination of 
national oppression, and guarantees against such oppression worked out in the 
course of social development. Moreover, a normal, broad, and unrestricted 
cultural life of the country is just as indispensable for the development of 
the proletariat’s class struggle as for the existence of bourgeois society 
itself.

National autonomy has the same aims as are contained in the political program 
of the Polish proletariat: the overthrow of absolutism and the achievement of 
political freedom in the country at large; this is but a part of the program 
resulting both from the progressive trends of capitalist development and from 
the class interests of. the proletariat.
 
II

The national separateness of a certain territory in a modern state is not by 
itself a sufficient basis for autonomy; the relationship between nationality 
and political life is precisely what calls for closer examination. 
Theoreticians of nationalism usually consider nationality in general as a 
natural, unchangeable phenomenon, outside social development, a conservative 
phenomenon resisting all historical vicissitudes, In accordance with this view 
bourgeois nationalism finds the main sources of national vitality and strength 
not in the modern historical formation, i.e., urban, bourgeois culture, but, on 
the contrary, in the traditional forms of life of the rural population. The 
peasant mass with its social conservatism appears to the romantics of 
nationalism as the only genuine mainstay of the national culture, an unshakable 
fortress of national distinctness, the stronghold of the proper national genius 
and spirit. When, in the middle of the last century, there began to flourish, 
in connection with the nationalist trend in the politics of Central Europe, 
so-called folklorism, it turned above all to the traditional forms of peasant 
culture as to the treasury in which every nation deposits “the threads of its 
thoughts and the flowers of its feelings.” In the same way at present, the 
recently awakened Lithuanian, Byelorussian, and Ukrainian nationalism bases 
itself entirely on the rural population and its conservative forms of 
existence, significantly starting the cultivation of this age-old and virgin 
national field with spreading primers and the Holy Scripture in the national 
language and national orthography. Already, in the 1880s, when the 
pseudo-socialistic and pseudo-revolutionary Glos [Voice] was published in 
Warsaw, the Polish National Democracy too, following its infallible reactionary 
instinct, turned its peculiar national sentiments, happily married to the 
anti-Semitism of the urban bourgeoisie, toward the rural population. Finally, 
in the same way, the most re-cent “nationalist” current in Russia, the party of 
Mr. Korfanty and Company, is based mainly on the conservatism of the rural 
population of Upper Silesia, exploited as a foundation for economic and 
political success by the reactionary Polish petite bourgeoisie.

On the other hand, the problem of which social strata constitute the proper 
guardians of national culture has recently caused an interesting exchange of 
views in the Social Democratic camp.

In the study of the “nationality question, “ quoted by us several times, Karl 
Kautsky, criticizing the work of the Austrian party publicist Otto Bauer on the 
same subject, says:

``Class differences lead Bauer to the paradoxical opinion that only those 
portions of a nation constitute a nation which participate in the culture: 
consequently, until now, only the ruling and exploiting classes.

”In the period of the Staufers” – writes Bauer – “the nation existed only in 
the cultural community of knighthood ... A homogeneous national character 
produced by the homogeneity of cultural influences, was only the character of 
one class of the nation ... The peasant did not share in anything that united 
the nation. Therefore the German peasants do not at all constitute the nation; 
they are the Hintersassen of the nation. In a society based on the private 
ownership of the means of production, the ruling classes constitute the nation 
– formerly the knighthood, today the educated people, as a community of people 
in whom uniform education developed by the nation’s history, with the help of a 
common language and national education, develops an affinity of characters. On 
the other hand the broad popular masses do not constitute the nation.”[2]``

According to Bauer only the socialist system, by making the masses of the 
working people participants in the entirety of the culture, will turn these 
masses into a nation. Kautsky replies to these arguments as follows:

``This is a very subtle thought with a very right core but in the nationality 
question it leads to a false road, for it treats the concept of nation in such 
a way as to make simply impossible the understanding of the force of the 
national thought in all classes in the present, and the bases of the present 
national contradictions of entire nations. Bauer conflicts here with the 
observation made by Renner[3] that it is precisely the peasant who is the 
preserver of nationality. Renner demonstrates that in Austria (including 
Hungary), during the last century, a number of cities changed their 
nationality, becoming Hungarian or Czech rather than German. On the other hand 
German cities, specifically Vienna, absorbed an immense influx of foreign 
nationalities and assimilated them to the German nation. However, in the 
countryside the linguistic boundaries have practically not shifted. Actually, 
in Austria’s major cities, the process of Germanization has achieved its goal; 
at the beginning of the nineteenth century they had all been German cities, 
with the exception at the most of Galicia, Croatia, and the Italian towns. By 
contrast, the peasant population is the one that remained national; the 
tendencies toward making Austria a national state shattered against the 
peasantry. The peasant firmly adheres to his nationality as to any tradition, 
while the city dweller, especially the educated one, assimilates much more 
easily.[4]``

In the course of his study, Kautsky is forced to considerably revise his 
reasoning. Examining more closely the foundations of modern national movements, 
he points out that precisely the bourgeois development calling into existence a 
new social class, the professional intelligentsia, creates in this form the 
main fact of the contemporary national idea and a pillar of national life. It 
is true that the same development simultaneously leads the social and cultural 
life of present-day nationalities, and particularly of the intelligentsia to 
international paths, and from this standpoint Kautsky rightly reverses the 
perspective outlined by Bauer, by explaining that the task of the great 
socialist reform in the future will not be the nationalization, i.e., the 
national separation of the working masses, but, on the contrary, blazing the 
trail for one universal, international culture in which distinct nationalities 
will disappear. However, in present-day conditions, the role of the urban, or 
strictly speaking, bourgeois element, is decisive for the fate of 
nationalities. If Kautsky in agreement with Renner points to a whole series of 
Slavic critics Germanized at the beginning of the nineteenth century in the 
Hapsburg monarchy as an example of the national non-resistance of the urban 
element, these facts may actually serve only as an illustration of the petit 
bourgeois conditions of the pre-capitalist era by which doubtless the urban 
life in the Slavic lands of Austria was characterized at the beginning of the 
nineteenth century. The further development of events, a definite swing of the 
same type of critics to their own nationality in the last few decades, which is 
confirmed by Kautsky and Renner, is, on the other hand, a striking example of 
how far the rise of its own bourgeois development in a country, its own 
industry, its own big city life, its own “national” bourgeoisie and 
intelligentsia, as it occurred for example in Bohemia, can form the basis for a 
resistant national policy and for an active political life connected with it.

The emphasis on the peasant element in connection with the fate of nationality 
is correct so far as the quite passive preservation of national peculiarities 
in the ethnic group is concerned: speech, mores, dress, and also, usually in 
close connection with this, a certain religion. The conservatism of peasant 
life makes possible the preservation of nationality within these narrow bounds 
and explains the resistance for centuries to any denationalization policy, 
regardless of either the ruthlessness of the methods or the cultural 
superiority of the aggressive foreign nationality. This is proved by the 
preservation of speech and national type among the South Slavic tribes of 
Turkey and Hungary, the preservation of the peculiarities of the Byelorussians, 
Ruthenians, Lithuanians in the Russian empire, of the Masurians and Lithuanians 
in East Prussia, or the Poles in Upper Silesia, etc.

However, a national culture preserved in this traditional-peasant manner is 
incapable of playing the role of an active element in contemporary 
political-social life, precisely because it is entirely a product of tradition, 
is rooted in past conditions, because – to use the words of Marx – the peasant 
class stands in today’s bourgeois society outside of culture, constituting 
rather a “piece of barbarism” surviving in that culture. The peasant, as a 
national “outpost,” is always and a priori a culture of social barbarism, a 
basis of political reaction, doomed by historical evolution. No serious 
political-national movement in present-day conditions is possible solely on a 
national peasant foundation. And only when the present urban 
classes-bourgeoisie, petite bourgeoisie, and bourgeois-intelligentsia – become 
the promoters of the national movement, will it be possible to develop, in 
certain defined circumstances, the seeming phenomenon of the national 
contradictions and national aspirations of “entire nations,” referred to by 
Kautsky.

Thus, local autonomy in the sense of the self-government of a certain 
nationality territory is only possible where the respective nationality 
possesses its own bourgeois development, urban life, intelligentsia, its own 
literary and scholarly life. The Congress Kingdom demonstrates all these 
conditions. Its population is nationally homogeneous because the Polish element 
has a decisive preponderance over other nationalities in the country’s whole 
area, with the exception of the Suwalki gubernia in which the Lithuanians 
prevail. Out of the overall population of 9,402,253 the Poles constitute 
6,755,503, while of the remaining nationalities the Jews and Germans are mainly 
concentrated in the cities where, however, they do not represent a foreign 
bourgeois intelligentsia, but, on the contrary, are considerably assimilated by 
Polish cultural life, while the Russians, except in the Lublin and Siedlce 
regions, represent mainly the influx of bureaucratic elements alien to Polish 
society. The percentage of total population of these nationalities in the 
respective provinces, with the exception of Suwalki, appears, according to the 
census of 1897, as follows:

Thus, in all the gubernias except two, and in the country as a whole, the 
Polish element constitutes more than 70 percent of the population; it is, 
moreover, the decisive element in the socio-cultural development of the country.

However, the situation looks different when we turn to the Jewish nationality.

Jewish national autonomy, not in the sense of freedom of school, religion, 
place of residence, and equal civic rights, but in the sense of the political 
self-government of the Jewish population with its own legislation and 
administration, as it were parallel to the autonomy of the Congress Kingdom, is 
an entirely utopian idea. Strangely, this conviction prevails also in the camp 
of extreme Polish nationalists, e.g., in the so-called “Revolutionary Faction” 
of the PPS, where it is based on the simple circumstance that the Jewish 
nationality does not possess a “territory of its own” within the Russian 
empire. But national autonomy conceived in accordance with that group’s own 
standpoint, i.e., as the sum of freedoms and rights to self-determination of a 
certain group of people linked by language, tradition, and psychology, is in 
itself a construction lying beyond historical conditions, fluttering in 
mid-air, and therefore one that can be easily conceived, as it were, “in the 
air,” i.e., without any definite territory. On the other hand, an autonomy that 
grows historically together with local self-government, on the basis of modern 
bourgeois-democratic development, is actually as inseparable from a certain 
territory as the bourgeois state itself, and cannot be imagined without it to 
the same extent as “non-territorial” communal or urban self-government. It is 
true that the Jewish population was completely under the influence of modern 
capitalistic development in the Russian empire and shares the economic, 
political, and spiritual interests of particular groups in that society. But on 
the one hand, these interests were never territorially separated so as to 
become specifically Jewish capitalist interests; rather, they are common 
interests of the Jewish and other people in the country at large. On the other 
hand, this capitalist development does not lead to a separation of bourgeois 
Jewish culture, but acts in an exactly opposite direction, leading to the 
assimilation of the Jewish bourgeois, urban intelligentsia, to their absorption 
by the Polish or Russian people. If the national distinctness of the 
Lithuanians or Byelorussians is based on the backward peasant people, the 
Jewish national distinctness in Russia and Poland is based on the socially 
backward petite bourgeoisie, on small production, small trade, small-town life, 
and – let us add parenthetically – on the close relation of the nationality in 
question to religion. In view of the above, the national distinctness of the 
Jews, which is supposed to be the basis of non-territorial Jewish autonomy, is 
manifested not in the form of metropolitan bourgeois culture, but in the form 
of small-town lack of culture. Obviously any efforts toward “developing Jewish 
culture” at the initiative of a handful of Yiddish publicists and translators 
cannot be taken seriously.

The only manifestation of genuine modern culture in the Russian framework is 
the Social Democratic movement of the Russian proletariat which, because of its 
nature, can best replace the historical lack of bourgeois national culture of 
the Jews, since it is itself a phase of genuinely international and proletarian 
culture.

Different, though no less complicated, is the question of autonomy in 
Lithuania. For nationalist utopians, obviously the existence of a certain 
territory inhabited by a population of distinct nationality is a sufficient 
reason to demand for the nationality in question, in the name of the right of 
all nationalities to self-determination, either an independent republic, or one 
federated with Russia, or the “broadest autonomy.” Each of these programs was 
advanced in turn by the former “Lithuanian Social Democracy,” then by the PPS 
in its federative phase, and finally by the recently organized “Byelorussian 
Socialist Commune” which, at its Second Congress in 1906, adopted a somewhat 
vague program of a “federal republic in Russia with a territorial-autonomous 
diet in Vilna for the territory of the Western country.”[5] Whether the 
“Byelorussian Commune” demands the proclamation of the “Western country” as one 
of the republics into which the Russian Empire is to be split, or a 
“territorial autonomy” for that “Western country” is difficult to figure out; 
since an “autonomous” diet is demanded for Vilna, it would seem that the latter 
version is intended, or else, what is in complete harmony with the whole 
utopian-abstract treatment of the question, no basic distinctions are made 
between an independent republic, a federal system, and autonomy, but only 
qualitative distinctions. Let us examine the matter from the standpoint of 
territorial autonomy. The “Western country,” according to the terminology in 
the Russian administrative division, is a preponderantly agrarian and 
small-industry district comprising areas with considerable variations in 
conditions. Apart from the local interests of the rural, municipal, and 
provincial self-governments, this territory is much less of as distinct 
production and trading district, with a less distinctive character and a less 
distinct grouping of interests, than the Kingdom of Poland or the industrial 
Moscow district. On the other hand it is a distinct nationality district. But 
it is precisely with regard to this question of nationality that the greatest 
difficulties arise from the standpoint of potential autonomy. The “Western 
country,” i.e., the territory of former Lithuania, is an area occupied by 
several different nationalities, and the first question that arises is: which 
nationality is to be served by the territorial-national autonomy that is at 
stake, which language, which nationality is to be decisive in the schools, 
cultural institutions, the judiciary, legislation, and in filling local 
offices? The Lithuanian nationalists obviously demand autonomy for the 
Lithuanian nationality. Let us look at the actual conditions of that 
nationality.

According to the census of 1897 – the last one that has taken place and whose 
results in the area of nationality relations have been available to the public 
since 1905 – the genuine Lithuanian nationality in the Russian empire numbers 
1,210,510 people. This population inhabits mainly the Vilna, Kovno, Grodno, and 
Suwalki gubernias. Besides, there live almost exclusively in the Kovno 
gubernia, 448,000 persons of Samogitian nationality, who by no means identify 
with the Lithuanians. If we were to outline the territory that might serve as a 
basis for an autonomous Lithuania, we would have to eliminate part of the 
present “Western country,” and on the other hand go beyond its borders and 
include the Suwalki gubernia which today belongs to the Congress Kingdom. We 
would obtain a territory approximately corresponding to the voyvodship of Vilna 
and Troki which, in pre-partition Poland, constituted “Lithuania proper.” The 
Lithuanian population is distributed in that territory as follows: out of the 
sum total of 1,200,000 Lithuanians almost half, i.e., 574,853, are concentrated 
in the Kovno gubernia. The second place with regard to the concentration of 
Lithuanians is occupied by the Suwalki gubernia, where 305,548 live; somewhat 
fewer are to be found in the Vilna gubernia, viz., 297,720 persons; finally, an 
insignificant number of Lithuanians, about 3,500, inhabit the northern portion 
of the Grodno gubernia. Actually, the Lithuanian population is doubtless more 
numerous, because in the census the language used by the respective populations 
was the main point taken into consideration, while a sizable proportion of 
Lithuanians use the Polish language in everyday life. However, in the present 
case, from the standpoint of nationality as a basis of national autonomy, 
obviously only the population wherein national distinctness is expressed in a 
distinct native language can be taken into account.

The distribution of the Lithuanian population becomes apparent only when we 
ascertain its numerical ratio to the remaining population in the same 
territory. The over-all population figure in the gubernias mentioned (always 
according to the 1897 census) is as follows:

Out of a total population of 5,322,093 in that territory, the Lithuanians 
constitute less than 23 percent. Even if we were to include, as do the 
Lithuanian nationalists, the entire Samogitian population with the Lithuanians, 
we would obtain the ratio of 31 percent, i.e., less than a third of the total 
population. Obviously, setting up the former “Lithuania proper” as the area of 
the Lithuanian nationality is, in present-day conditions, an entirely arbitrary 
and artificial construction.

The total population of the four “north-western” gubernias included because of 
the Byelorussian nationality is as follows:

Together with the population of the four gubernias inhabited by Lithuanians, 
this adds up to the considerable figure of 12,171,007. However, among this 
population, the Byelorussians constitute less than half, i.e., about 5.85 
million (5,855,547). Even considering only the figures, the idea of fitting 
Lithuania’s autonomy to the Byelorussian nationality seems questionable. 
However, this difficulty becomes much greater if we take into consideration the 
socio-economic conditions of the respective nationalities.

In the territory inhabited by them the Byelorussians constitute an exclusively 
rural, agrarian element. Their cultural level is extremely low. Illiteracy is 
so widespread that the “Byelorussian Commune” was forced to establish an 
“Education Department” to spread elementary education among the Byelorussian 
peasants. The complete lack of a Byelorussian bourgeoisie, an urban 
intelligentsia, and an independent scholarly and literary life in the 
Byelorussian language, renders the idea of a national Byelorussian autonomy 
simply impractical.

The social conditions among the Lithuanian nationals are similar. To a 
preponderant degree farming is the occupation of the Lithuanians. In the 
cultural heart of Lithuania, the Vilna gubernia, the Lithuanians constitute 
19.8 percent of the total population, and 3.1 percent of the urban population. 
In the Suwalki gubernia, the next with regard to Lithuanian concentration, the 
Lithuanians constitute as much as 52.2 percent of the gubernia population, but 
only 9.2 per-cent of the urban population. It is true that the cultural 
conditions among the Lithuanians are quite different from those in Byelorussia. 
The education of the Lithuanian population is on a relatively high level, and 
the percentage of illiterates is almost the lowest in the Russian Empire. But 
the education of Lithuanians is preponderantly a Polish education, and the 
Polish language, not the Lithuanian, is here the instrument of culture, which 
fact is closely connected with the fact that the possessing classes, the rural 
landed gentry, and the urban intelligentsia are genuinely Polish or Polonized 
to a high degree. The same situation prevails to a considerable degree in 
Ruthenia. Indeed, in Lithuania and Ruthenia the only nationality culturally fit 
to manage national autonomy is the Polish, with its urban population and its 
intelligentsia. Therefore, if the national autonomy of the “Western country” 
were to be considered, it would have to be neither a Lithuanian nor a 
Byelorussian autonomy, but a Polish one: the Polish language, the Polish 
school, Poles in public offices would be the natural expression of the 
autonomous institutions of the country.

Given this situation, culturally and nationally, Lithuania and Ruthenia would 
constitute only an extension of the Kingdom, not a separate autonomous region; 
they would form, with the Kingdom, a natural and historical region, with Polish 
autonomy over the Kingdom plus Lithuania.

Such a solution of the question is opposed by several decisive considerations. 
First of all, from the purely national point of view, this would be the rule of 
a small Polish minority over a majority of Lithuanians, Byelorussians, Jews, 
and others. In Lithuania and Ruthenia, the Jews and the Poles make up most of 
the urban population; together they occupy what would be the natural social 
centers of autonomous institutions. But the Jewish population decisively 
outnumbers the Polish, whereas in the Congress Kingdom there are 6,880,000 
Poles (according to the 1897 census) and only 1,300,000 Jews. The percentage of 
each in the four gubernias of Lithuania proper in terms of the over-all 
population is as follows:

Only in the Suwalki gubernia is the Jewish population smaller than the Polish, 
but even here this ratio is quite different when we take the towns into 
consideration: then the Poles constitute 27 percent, the Jews 40 percent of the 
urban population. It should also be taken into consideration that Jews in the 
Kingdom, if assimilated – more so in the urban areas – reinforce the Polish 
nationality; whereas in Lithuania the assimilation process, which is anyway 
much slower, occurs – when it does at all – among Jews who belong to the 
Russian culture; in both cases confusion among nationalities grows and the 
question of autonomy becomes more and more entangled. Suffice it to say that in 
the heart of Lithuania and the seat of the planned autonomous diet, Vilna, out 
of the 227 schools counted in 1900, 182 are Jewish!

Another consideration no less important is the circumstance that the Polish 
nationality is in Lithuania and Ruthenia precisely the nationality of the 
ruling strata: the gentry landowners and the bourgeoisie; while the Lithuanian 
and particularly the Byelorussian nationality is represented mostly by landless 
peasantry. Therefore, the nationality relationship is here – generally speaking 
– a relationship of social classes. Handing over the country’s autonomous 
institutions to the Polish nationality would here mean the creation of a new 
powerful instrument of class domination without a corresponding strengthening 
of the position of the exploited classes, and would cause conditions of the 
kind that would be brought about by the proposed autonomy of Galicia for the 
Ruthenians.

Consequently, both for nationality and for social reasons the joining of 
Lithuania to the autonomous territory of the Kingdom or the separation of 
Lithuania and Ruthenia into an autonomous region with an unavoidable 
preponderance of the Polish element is a project which Social Democracy must 
combat in principle. In this form, the project of Lithuania’s national autonomy 
altogether falls through as utopian, in view of the numerical and social 
relations of the nationalities involved.

III

Another outstanding example of the difficulties encountered by the problem of 
nationality autonomy in practice is to be found in the Caucasus. No corner of 
the earth presents such a picture of nationality intermixture in one territory 
as the Caucasus, the ancient historical trail of the great migrations of 
peoples between Asia and Europe, strewn with fragments and splinters of those 
peoples. That territory’s population of over nine million is composed 
(according to the 1897 census) of the following racial and nationality groups:

The territorial distribution of the largest nationalities involved is as 
follows: The Russians, who constitute the most numerous group in the whole 
Caucasus, are concentrated in the north, in the Kuban and Black Sea districts 
and in the northwest part of Tersk. Moving southward, in the western part of 
the Caucasus the Kartvelians are located; they occupy the Kutai and the 
south-eastern part of the Tiflis gubernias. Still further south, the central 
territory is occupied by the Armenians in the southern portion of the Tiflis, 
the eastern portion of the Kars and the northern portion of the Erivan 
gubernias, squeezed between the Georgians in the north, the Turks in the west 
and the Tatars in the east and south, in the Baku, Elizabetpol and Erivan 
gubernias. In the east and in the mountains are located mountain tribes, while 
other minor groups such as Jews and Germans live, intermingled with the 
autochthonous population, mainly in the cities. The complexity of the 
nationality problem appears particularly in the linguistic conditions because 
in the Caucasus there exist, besides Russian, Ossetian, and Armenian, about a 
half-dozen languages, four Lezgin dialects, several Chechen, several 
Circassian, Mingrel, Georgian, Sudanese, and a number of others. And these are 
by no means dialects, but mostly independent languages incomprehensible to the 
rest of the population.

From the standpoint of the problem of autonomy, obviously only three 
nationalities enter into consideration: Georgians, Armenians, and Tatars, 
because the Russians inhabiting the northern part of the Caucasus constitute, 
with regard to nationality, a continuation of the state territory of the purely 
Russian population.

The relatively most numerous nationality group besides the Russians are the 
Georgians, if we include among them all varieties of Kartvelians. The 
historical territory of the Georgians is represented by the gubernias of Tiflis 
and Kutai and the districts of Sukhum and Sakatali, with a population of 
2,110,490. However, the Georgian nationality constitutes only slightly more 
than half of that number, i.e., 1,200,000; the remainder is composed of 
Armenians to the number of about 220,000, concentrated mainly in the 
Akhalkalats county of the Tiflis gubernia, where they constitute over 70 
percent of the population; Tatars to the number of 100,000; Ossetians, over 
70,000; Lezgins represent half of the population in the Sakatali district; and 
Abkhazes are preponderant in the Sukham district; while in the Borchalin county 
of the Tiflis gubernia a mixture of various nationalities holds a majority over 
the Georgian population.

In view of these figures the project of Georgian nationality autonomy presents 
manifold difficulties. Georgia’s historical territory, taken as a whole, 
represents such a numerically insignificant population – scarcely 1,200,000 – 
that it seems insufficient as a basis of independent autonomous life in the 
modern sense, with its cultural needs and socio-economic functions. In an 
autonomous Georgia, with its historical boundaries, a nationality that 
comprises only slightly more than half of the entire population would be called 
on to dominate in public institutions, schools, and political life. The 
impossibility of this situation is felt so well by the Georgian nationalists of 
revolutionary hue that they, a priori, relinquish the historical boundaries and 
plan to curtail the autonomous territory to an area corresponding to the actual 
preponderance of the Georgian nationality.

According to that plan, only sixteen of Georgia’s counties would be the basis 
of the Georgian autonomy, while the fate of the four remaining ones with a 
preponderance of other nationalities would be decided by a “plebiscite” of 
those nationalities. This plan looks highly democratic and revolutionary; but 
like most anarchist-inspired plans which seek to solve all historic 
difficulties by means of the “will of nations” it has a defect, which is that 
in practice the plebiscite plan is even more difficult to implement than the 
autonomy of historical Georgia. The area specified in the Georgian plan would 
include scarcely 1,400,000 people, i.e., a figure corresponding to the 
population of a big modern city. This area, cut out quite arbitrarily from 
Georgia’s traditional framework and present socio-economic status, is not only 
an extremely small basis for autonomous life but moreover does not represent 
any organic entity, any sphere of material life and economic and cultural 
interests, besides the abstract interests of the Georgian nationality.

However, even in this area, the Georgians’ nationality claims cannot be 
interpreted as an active expression of autonomous life, in view of the 
circumstance that their numerical preponderance is linked with their 
pre-eminently agrarian character.

In the very heart of Georgia, the former capital, Tiflis, and a number of 
smaller cities have an eminently international character, with the Armenians, 
who represent the bourgeois stratum, as the preponderant element. Out of 
Tiflis’s population of 160,000 the Armenians constitute 55,000, the Georgians 
and Russians 20,000 each; the balance is composed of Tatars, Persians, Jews, 
Greeks, etc. The natural centers of political and administrative life as well 
as of education and spiritual culture are here, as in Lithuania, seats of 
foreign nationalities. This circumstance, which makes Georgia’s nationality 
autonomy an insoluble problem, impinges simultaneously on another Caucasian 
problem: the question of the autonomy of the Armenians.

The exclusion of Tiflis and other cities from the autonomous Georgian territory 
is as impossible from the standpoint of Georgia’s socio-economic conditions as 
is their inclusion into that territory from the standpoint of the Armenian 
nationality. If we took as a basis the numerical preponderance of Armenians in 
the population, we would obtain a territory artificially patched together from 
a few fragments: two southern counties of Tiflis gubernia, the northern part of 
Erivan gubernia, and the north-eastern part of Kars gubernia, i.e., a territory 
cut off from the main cities inhabited by the Armenians, which is senseless 
both from the historical standpoint and from the standpoint of the present 
economic conditions, while the size of the putative autonomous area would be 
limited to some 800,000. If we went beyond the counties having a numerical 
preponderance of Armenians we would find the Armenians inextricably mixed in 
the north with the Georgians; in the south – in the Baku and Elizabetpol 
gubernias – with the Tatars; and in the west, in the Kars gubernia, with the 
Turks. The Armenians play, in relation to the mostly agrarian Tatar population 
which lives in rather backward conditions, partly the role of a bourgeois 
element.

Thus, the drawing of a boundary between the main nationalities of the Caucasus 
is an insoluble task. But even more difficult is the problem of autonomy in 
relation to the remaining multiple nationalities of the Caucasian mountaineers. 
Both their territorial intermingling and the small numerical size of the 
respective nationalities, and finally the socio-economic conditions which 
remain mostly on the level of largely nomadic pastoralism, or primitive 
farming, without an urban life of their own and with no intellectual creativity 
in their native language, make the functioning of modern autonomy entirely 
inapplicable.

Just as in Lithuania, the only method of settling the nationality question in 
the Caucasus, in the democratic spirit, securing to all nationalities freedom 
of cultural existence without any among them dominating the remaining ones, and 
at the same time meeting the recognized need for modern development, is to 
disregard ethnographic boundaries, and to introduce broad local self-government 
– communal, urban, district, and provincial – without a definite nationality 
character, that is, giving no privileges to any nationality. Only such a 
self-government will make it possible to unite various nationalities to jointly 
take care of the local economic and social interests, and on the other hand, to 
take into consideration in a natural way the different proportions of the 
nationalities in each county and each commune.

Communal, district, provincial self-government will make it possible for each 
nationality, by means of a majority decision in the organs of local 
administration, to establish its schools and cultural institutions in those 
districts or communes where it possesses numerical preponderance. At the same 
time a separate, empire-wide, linguistic law guarding the interests of the 
minority can establish a norm in virtue of which national minorities, beginning 
with a certain numerical minimum, can constitute a basis for the compulsory 
founding of schools in their national languages in the commune, district, or 
province; and their language can be established in local public and 
administrative institutions, courts, etc., at the side of the language of the 
preponderant nationality (the official language). Such a solution would be 
workable, if indeed any solution is possible within the framework of 
capitalism, and given the historical conditions. This solution would combine 
the general principle of local self-government with special legislative 
measures to guarantee cultural development and equality of rights of the 
nationalities through their close co-operation, and not their mutual separation 
by barriers of national autonomy.
 
IV

An interesting example of a purely formalistic settlement of the nationality 
question for the entire Russian empire is provided by the project of a certain 
K. Fortunatov published by the group “Trud i Borba” [Work and Struggle], an 
attempt at a practical solution of the problem in accordance with the 
principles of the Russian revolutionary socialists.[6] On the basis of the 
census, the author first arranges a map of the empire according to 
nationalities, taking as a basis the numerical preponderance of each 
nationality in the respective gubernias and counties. The numerically strongest 
nationality is the Great Russians who are preponderant in thirty gubernias of 
European Russia. They are followed by the Little Russians who have a majority 
in the Ukraine in the gubernias of Poltawa, Podolia, Kharkov, Kiev, and 
Volhynia, and are represented also in the gubernias of Ekaterinoslav, 
Chernigov, Kherson, Kuban, and Taurida, while in Bessarabia the Moldavians and 
in the Crimea the Tatars are preponderant. Apart from the Poles, the third 
nationality is the Byelorussians, who have a majority in five gubernias: 
Mogilev, Minsk, Vilna, Witebsk, and Grodno, with the exception of eight 
counties (Bialystok, inhabited mainly by Poles; Bielsk, Brzesc, and Kobryn, in 
which the Little Russians are preponderant; the Dzwinsk, Rezyca, and Lucin 
counties, where the Latvians are in the majority; and finally Troki, in which 
the Lithuanians prevail). On the other hand, the Krasne county of Smolensk 
gubernia has to be included in Byelorussia because of the preponderance of that 
nationality. The Lithuanians and Samogitians prevail in the Kovno and Suwalki 
gubernias, with the exception of the Suwalki and Augustow counties in which the 
Poles are in the majority. The Latvians in Courland and the Estonians in 
Estonia have a decisive majority, and between them they divide Livonia into 
practically two equal parts, southern and northern. Including the Congress 
Kingdom, with the exception of the Suwalki gubernia, we obtain, in sixty-two 
gubernias of European Russia, the following picture of nationality relations:

Having examined the territorial distribution of nationalities in the Caucasus 
according to gubernias and counties, the author in turn moves to Asiatic 
Russia. In Siberia, the Russian element is in a decisive majority, forming 80.9 
percent of the population besides the Buriats, 5 percent; Yakuts, 4 per-cent; 
Tatars, 3.6 percent; other nationalities, 6.5 percent. Only in the Yakut 
gubernia do the Russians constitute a minority of 11.5 percent while the Yakuts 
form 82.2 percent of the whole. In Central Asia, the most numerous 
nationalities are the Kirgis, who are in a majority in all gubernias with the 
exception of the three southern ones: Trans-Caspia, in which the Turkomans 
number 65 percent, Samarkana, inhabited by the Uzbekhs (58.8 percent) and 
Tadzikhs (26.9 percent), and the Fergan Valley, in which the Sarts form half, 
the Uzbekhs 9.7 percent, the Kirgis 12.8 percent of the population.

Thus, taking as a basis the gubernias and counties with a preponderance of one 
nationality or another, Mr. Fortunatov ranges the following scheme of 
nationality districts in the whole empire, as shown in the appendix below.

In this scheme we are struck by great numerical differences, e.g., between the 
tremendous Great Russian and Little Russian districts and such tiny ones as the 
Lithuanian, Estonian, or individual Caucasian, let alone the Yakut. This 
circumstance apparently offends the sense of symmetry of the admirers of the 
principle of “Federation.” It also evokes in them some doubts as to whether 
nationalities so unequal in strength and size could enter into idyllic 
coexistence as autonomous districts possessing equal rights. Therefore, our 
statistician, without much thought, obviates the evil with scissors and glue by 
combining several small districts into one and simultaneously dismembering two 
big ones into smaller ones. Apparently taking a population of six to nine 
million as a normal measure of a nationality district – although it is unknown 
on what basis – he considers that it is “easy” to split the Little Russian 
district into three and the Great Russian into seven, separating for instance 
the Don, Astrakhazan, Kuban, Stavropol, and Black Sea gubernias and two 
counties of Tersk with a population of 6.7 million as a “Cossack” district, and 
the Kazan, Ufa, Orenburg, Samar gubernias and two counties of Symbir gubernia 
with nine million population as a Tatar Bashkir district, finally simply 
dividing the remaining territory of twenty-five gubernias with forty-two 
million people into five more or less symmetrical parts with eight million 
people, with no regard to the nationality principle.

In this way we obtain the plan of the division of the whole of Russia into the 
following sixteen “states” or autonomous districts on the basis of 
nationalities:

In setting up the above scheme the author was obviously not restrained by any 
historical or economic considerations, or by the divisions of production or 
commercial communication created by modern development and natural conditions. 
It is well known that such pedestrian considerations can only hamper the 
political concoctions of people professing the “Marxist” doctrine and a 
materialistic world view. They do not exist for the theorists and politicians 
of “truly revolutionary socialism,” who have in mind only the “rights” of 
nations, freedom, equality, and other such lofty matters. The separation of two 
Lithuanian gubernias – Kovno and Suwalki – with the exclusion of the Polish 
counties – from the historico-cultural heart of Lithuania, the Vilna gubernia 
and other neighboring regions with which economic relations were of long 
standing, and on the other hand the joining of these two curtailed gubernias 
with Livonia, Courland, and Estonia, with which the historical links, as well 
as present-day economic ones, are quite loose, clearly demonstrates this point. 
Although the cutting up of the Ukraine for the sake of symmetry into various 
divisions, despite the continuity of its natural and economic character, and on 
the other hand, combining into one autonomous region of Siberia a country 
comprising 12.5 million square kilometers, i.e., by one-third bigger than the 
whole of Europe, a country representing the greatest natural economic and 
cultural contrasts, is a demonstration that that method is free of any 
“dogmas.” At the same time, the nationality autonomy in this scheme is treated 
free of any connection with the economic and social structure of the given 
nationality. From this standpoint other peoples are equally prepared for 
regional autonomy – that is, they evince a certain permanent territory and 
administration, legislation, and cultural life centralized in that territory. 
There are, on the one hand, the Poles, and on the other the Kirgis, the Yakuts, 
and the Buriats, who are still partly nomadic and are still living according to 
the traditions of tribal organization, thwarting to this very day the efforts 
of the territorial administration of Russian absolutism. The autonomous 
regional construction, in accordance with the “socialist-revolutionary” views, 
is thus entirely “free,” unconnected with any real bases in time and space, and 
all the existing historical, economic, and cultural conditions play only the 
role of material out of which, by means of “revolutionary” scissors, artful 
nationality plots are to be cut out.

What is the result of this solely and exclusively ethnographic method of the 
political dismemberment of Russia? Mr. Fortunatov’s scheme reduces the 
principle of nationality to an absurdity. Although the Lithuanians are cut off 
from the Polish nationality with which they coalesce culturally, still they are 
linked on the basis of ethnographic affinity into one “Baltic” nationality with 
the Latvians and the Estonians with whom they identify as little as with the 
Poles: thus they gravitate toward the completely Germanized cultural centers of 
Livonia and Estonia. Combining the Georgians, Armenians, Tatars, and a few 
dozen other tribes of the Caucasus into one “Caucasian” nationality smacks of a 
malicious satire against national autonomous aspirations. No greater regard for 
these aspirations is evidenced by the inclusion of the Moldavians, situated in 
Bessarabia, in the Little Russian nationality, of the Crimean Tatars in the 
very same nationality, and finally by the combining of Samoyeds, Ostiaks, 
Tunguz, Buriats, Yakuts, Chuckchees, Kamchadals, and many other tribes, each 
living an entirely separate life, differing among themselves in the level of 
cultural development, language, religion, even partly race, with the Russian 
population of Siberia into one mysterious “Siberian” nationality with common 
legislative, administrative, and cultural institutions. Fortunatov’s scheme is 
basically a simple negation of the nationality principle. It is also 
interesting as an example of the anarchistic approach to nationalism, 
unrestricted as it is by any considerations of objective social development. 
Having thrown its weight around in that valley of tears, it eventually returns 
to the results, very much resembling the same ugly history of reality which it 
had undertaken “to correct,” i.e., the systematic violations of the 
“nationality rights” and their equality. The whole difference consists in the 
fact that the trampling of the “rights” of nationalities imagined by the 
ideology of liberalism and anarchism is, in reality, the result of the process 
of historical development which has its inner sense and what is more important 
– its revolutionary dialectic, while revolutionary-nationalistic bungling 
tends, in its zealous cutting up of what had grown together socially, and in 
its gluing of what socially cannot be glued together, to trample eventually the 
nationality “rights” celebrated by it, merely for the sake of schematic 
pedantry deprived of any sense and blown up with political buffoonery.